
Leon Trotsky



THE THIRD INTERNATIONAL AFTER LENIN


The Draft Program of the Communist International: A Criticism of Fundamentals

(1928)

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Written: 1928.
First Published: In English in 1929, THE MILITANT.
Source: 1929, New York.
Translated: 1st version unknown translator in Russia, US edition, Max
Shachtman.
Transcription/HTML Markup: Sally Ryan, 1997, subsequent HTML updating by
David Walters, 2003.
Copyleft: Leon Trotsky Internet Archive (www.marxists.org) 2002, 2003.
Permission is granted to copy and/or distribute this document under the
terms of the GNU Free Documentation License.
Converted to eBook format:Kollektiv Yakov Perelman, from the on-line
version of _The Third International After Lenin_ available at Trotsky
Internet Archive in September 2013. Cover provided by Cm Nikas.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

+-----------------------------------------------------------------------+
| _Leon Trotsky wrote the two documents that comprise THE THIRD         |
| INTERNATIONAL AFTER LENIN_ [comintern]_in 1928, while involuntarily   |
| exiled in Alma Ata. The documents were meant to be used for           |
| discussion at the Sixth World Congress of the Communist               |
| International. Trotsky’s work – a sharp criticism against the         |
| opposing program supporting “socialism in one country” – was never    |
| distributed to or discussed by the main body at the Congress. The     |
| parts of it made available to a committee, but then recalled, were    |
| smuggled out of the country by James Cannon, a delegate and founding  |
| member of the Communist Party in the United States._                  |
|                                                                       |
| _Cannon – subsequently expelled from the CP – and his supporters      |
| formed a Trotskyist organization Communist League and first published |
| his smuggled sections in their newspaper, THE MILITANT. Shortly       |
| thereafter, it was published in book form. In the introduction to the |
| first edition, (1929) Cannon wrote, “The publication of this          |
| masterpiece of Bolshevik literature, written by the foremost living   |
| leader of world communism at the height of his powers, is a           |
| revolutionary event of great importance …”._                          |
|                                                                       |
| _The on-line version of THE THIRD INTERNATIONAL AFTER LENIN – “The    |
| Draft Program of the Communist International: A Criticism of          |
| Fundamentals” and Trotsky’s letter_ What Now _– has been divided into |
| fourteen sections of approximately equal length._                     |
+-----------------------------------------------------------------------+

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Contents

I. The Program of the International Revolution or a Program of Socialism
in One Country?

  Part 1
  Preface
  1. The General Structure of the Program
  2. The United States and Europe
  3. The Slogan of the Soviet United States of Europe
  4. The Criterion of Internationalism

  Part 2
  5. The Theoretical Tradition of the Party
  6. Where is the “Social Democratic Deviation”?
  7. The Dependence of the USSR on World Economy

  Part 3
  8. The Contradiction Between the Productive Forces and the National
  Boundaries as the Cause of the Reactionary Utopian Theory of
  “Socialism in One Country”
  9. The Question Can Be Solved Only on the Arena of World Revolution
  10. The Theory of Socialism in One Country as a Series of Social
  Patriotic Blunders

 

II. Strategy and Tactics in the Imperialist Epoch

  Part 1
  1. The Complete Bankruptcy of the Central Chapter of the Draft Program
  2. The Fundamental Peculiarities Inherent in the Strategy of the
  Revolutionary Epoch and the Role of the Party
  3. The Third Congress and the Question of the Permanence of the
  Revolutionary Process According to Lenin and According to Bukharin
  4. The German Events of 1923 and the Lessons of October

  Part 2
  5. The Basic Strategical Mistake of the Fifth Congress
  6. The “Democratic-Pacifist Era” and Fascism
  7. The Right Leaven of Ultra-Left Policy

  Part 3
  8. The Period of Right-Centrist Down-Sliding
  9. The Maneuverist Character of Revolutionary Strategy
  10. The Strategy of Civil War

  Part 4
  11. The Question of the Internal Party Regime
  12. The Causes of the Defeat of the Opposition and Its Perspectives

III. Summary and Perspectives of the Chinese Revolution:
Its Lessons for the Countries of the Orient and for the Whole of the
Comintern

  Part 1
  1. On the Nature of the Colonial Bourgeoisie
  2. The Stages of the Chinese Revolution

  Part 2
  3. Democratic Dictatorship or a Dictatorship of the Proletariat?
  4. Adventurism as the Product of Opportunism
  5. Soviets and Revolution

  Part 3
  6. The Question of the Character of the Coming Chinese Revolution
  7. On the Reactionary Idea of “Two-Class Workers’ and Peasants’
  Parties” for the Orient
  8. The Advantages Secured from the Peasants’ International Must be
  Probed
  Conclusion

IV. What Now?

  Part 1
  1. The Aim of This Letter
  2. Why Has No Congress of the Comintern Been Convoked for More Than
  Four Years?

  Part 2
  3. The Policy of 1923-1927
  4. Radicalization of the Masses and Questions of Leadership

  Part 3
  5. How the Current Swing Toward the Left in the CPSU was Prepared
  6. One Step Forward, Half a Step Backward

  Part 4
  7. A Maneuver or a New Course?
  8. The Social Basis of the Present Crisis
  9. The Party Crisis

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Third International After Lenin



I. THE PROGRAM OF THE INTERNATIONAL REVOLUTION OR A PROGRAM OF SOCIALISM IN ONE COUNTRY? (PART 1)


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

THE DRAFT PROGRAM, that is, the fundamental document which is to
determine the entire activity of the Comintern for many years to come,
was published only a few weeks prior to the convocation of the Congress
that is being held four years after the Fifth Congress. This tardiness
in publication cannot be justified by reference to the fact that the
first draft had been published even prior to the Fifth Congress, because
several years have since elapsed. The second draft differs from the
first in its entire structure and it endeavors to sum up the
developments of the last few years. Nothing could be more rash and
precipitate than to adopt this draft at the Sixth Congress, a draft
which bears obvious traces of hasty, even slipshod work, without any
preliminary serious and scientific criticism in the press or an
extensive discussion in all parties of the Comintern [Communist
International].

During the few days at our disposal between the receipt of the draft and
the dispatch of this letter, we could dwell only upon a few of the most
vital problems which must be treated in the program.

Due to lack of time, we have been compelled to leave entirely without
consideration a number of the most important problems touched upon in
the draft which are perhaps less burning today but which may become of
exceptional importance tomorrow. This does not at all imply that it is
less necessary to criticize them than those sections of the draft to
which the present work is devoted.

We must also add that we are compelled to work on the new draft under
conditions which make it impossible to obtain indispensable information.
Enough to mention the fact that we were unable to procure even the first
draft of the program, and in dealing with it, as well as in two or three
other cases, we have had to rely upon our memory. It goes without saying
that all quotations have been taken from the original sources and
checked carefully.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

 

THE MOST important question on the agenda of the Sixth Congress is the
adoption of a program. The nature of the latter may for a long time
determine and fix the physiognomy of the International. The importance
of a program does not lie so much in the manner in which it formulates
general theoretical conceptions (in the last analysis, this boils down
to a question of “codification,” i.e., a concise exposition of the
truths and generalizations which have been firmly and decisively
acquired); it is to a much greater degree a question of drawing up the
balance of the world economic and political experiences of the last
period, particularly of the revolutionary struggles of the last five
years – so rich in events and mistakes. For the next few years, the fate
of the Communist International – in the literal sense of the word –
depends upon the manner in which these events, mistakes, and
controversies are interpreted and judged in the program.

1. The General Structure of the Program

In our epoch, which is the epoch of imperialism, i.e., of _world_
economy and _world_ politics under the hegemony of finance capital, not
a single communist party can establish its program by proceeding solely
or mainly from conditions and tendencies of developments in its own
country. This also holds entirely for the party that wields the state
power within the boundaries of the USSR. On August 4, 1914, the death
knell sounded for national programs for all time. The revolutionary
party of the proletariat can base itself only upon an international
program corresponding to the character of the present epoch, the epoch
of the highest development and collapse of capitalism. An international
communist program is in no case the sum total of national programs or an
amalgam of their common features. The international program must proceed
directly from an analysis of the conditions and tendencies of world
economy and of the world political system taken as a whole in all its
connections and contradictions, that is, with the mutually antagonistic
interdependence of its separate parts. In the present epoch, to a much
larger extent than in the past, the national orientation of the
proletariat must and can flow only from a world orientation and not
_vice versa_. Herein lies the basic and primary difference between
communist internationalism and all varieties of national socialism.

Basing ourselves upon these considerations, we wrote in January of this
year: “We must begin work to draft a program of the Comintern
(Bukharin’s program is a bad program of a national section of the
Comintern and not a program of a world communist party).” [1]

We have kept insisting upon these considerations since 1923 -1924 when
the question of the United States of America arose in its full scope as
a problem of _world_ and, in the most direct sense of the term, of
_European_ politics.

In recommending the new draft, PRAVDA wrote that a communist program
“differs radically from the program of the international social
democracy not only in the substance of its central postulates but also
in the characteristic internationalism of its structure.” [2]

In this somewhat cloudy formulation is obviously expressed the idea
which we stated above and which was formerly stubbornly rejected. One
can only welcome the break with the first draft program presented by
Bukharin, which did not even provoke a serious exchange of opinion; nor,
for that matter, did it offer any grounds for one. Whereas the first
draft gave a bald schematic description of the development of one
abstract country towards socialism, the new draft seeks, unfortunately,
and, as we shall see, without consistency or success, to take world
economy as a whole as the basis for determining the fate of its
individual parts.

Linking up countries and continents that stand on different levels of
development into a system of mutual dependence and antagonism, leveling
out the various stages of their development and at the same time
immediately enhancing the differences between them, and ruthlessly
counterposing one country to another, world economy has become a mighty
reality which holds sway over the economic life of individual countries
and continents. This basic fact alone invests the idea of a world
communist party with a supreme reality. Bringing world economy as a
whole to the highest phase of development generally attainable on the
basis of private property, imperialism, as the draft states quite
correctly in its introduction, “aggravates to an extreme tension the
contradiction between the growth of the productive forces of world
economy and the national-state barriers.”

Without grasping the meaning of this proposition, which was vividly
revealed to mankind for the first time during the last imperialist war,
we cannot take a single step towards the solution of the major problems
of world politics and revolutionary struggle.

We could only welcome the radical shift of the very axis of the program
in the new draft were it not for the fact that the effort to reconcile
this, the only correct position, with tendencies of a directly contrary
character has resulted in turning the draft into an arena of the
cruelest contradictions, which entirely nullify the principled
significance of the new manner of approaching the question in its
fundamental aspects.

2. The United States of America and Europe

To characterize the first, fortunately discarded draft, it suffices to
say that, so far as we recall, the name of the United States of America
was not even mentioned in it. The essential problems of the imperialist
epoch – which, because of the very character of this epoch, must be
examined not only in their abstract and theoretical but also in their
concrete and historical cross-section – were dissolved in the first
draft into a lifeless schema of a capitalistic country “in general.”
However, the new draft – and this, of course, is a serious step forward
– now speaks of ”_the shift of the economic center of the world to the
United States of America”; and of “the transformation of the ‘Dollar
Republic’ into a world exploiter_”; and finally, that the rivalry (the
draft loosely says “conflict”) between North American and European
capitalism, primarily British capitalism, “_is becoming the axis of the
world conflicts_.” It is already quite obvious today that a program
which did not contain a clear and precise definition of these basic
facts and factors of the world situation would have nothing in common
with the program of the international revolutionary party.

Unfortunately, the essential facts and tendencies of world development
in the modern epoch which we have just indicated are merely mentioned by
name in the text of the draft, grafted on to it, as it were, by way of
theoretical back-writing, without having any internal connection with
its entire structure and without leading to any conclusions about
perspective or strategy.

America’s _new_ role in Europe since the capitulation of the German
Communist Party, and the defeat of the German proletariat in 1923, has
been left absolutely unevaluated. No attempt at all has been made to
explain that the period of the “stabilization,” “normalization,” and
“pacification” of Europe as well as the “regeneration” of the social
democracy, has proceeded in close material and ideological connection
with the first steps of American intervention in European affairs.

Moreover, it has not been shown that the inevitable further development
of American expansion, the contraction of the markets of European
capital, including the European market itself, entail the greatest
military, economic, and revolutionary convulsions, beside which all
those of the past fade into the background.

Again, neither has it been made clear that the further inexorable
pressure of the United States will reduce capitalist Europe to
constantly more limited rations in world economy; and this, of course,
implies not a mitigation, but on the contrary, a monstrous sharpening of
inter-state relations in Europe accompanied by furious paroxysms of
military conflict, for states as well as classes fight even more
fiercely for a meagre and a diminishing ration than for a lavish and
growing one.

The draft does not explain that the internal chaos of the state
antagonisms in Europe renders hopeless any sort of serious and
successful resistance to the constantly more centralized North American
republic; and that the resolution of the European chaos through the
Soviet United States of Europe is one of the first tasks of the
proletarian revolution. The latter (precisely because of the existence
of barriers) is immeasurably closer in Europe than in America and will,
therefore, most likely have to defend itself from the North American
bourgeoisie.

On the other hand, no mention at all has been made of the fact (and this
is just as important a phase of the same world problem) that it is
precisely the international strength of the United States and her
irresistible expansion arising from it, that compels her to include the
powder magazines of the whole world into the foundations of her
structure, i.e., all the antagonisms between the East and the West, the
class struggle in Old Europe, the uprisings of the colonial masses, and
all wars and revolutions. On the one hand, this transforms North
American capitalism into the basic counter-revolutionary force of the
modern epoch, constantly more interested in the maintenance of “order”
in every corner of the terrestrial globe; and on the other hand, this
prepares the ground for a gigantic revolutionary explosion in this
already dominant and still expanding world imperialist power. The logic
of world relations indicates that the time of this explosion cannot lag
very far behind that of the proletarian revolution in Europe.

Our elucidation of the dialectics of the interrelations between America
and Europe have made us the target in recent years of the most
diversified accusations, charging us with the pacifist denial of the
existence of European contradictions, with the acceptance of Kautsky’s
theory of ultra-imperialism, and many other sins. There is no need to
dwell here upon these “accusations,” which are at best due to a complete
ignorance of the real processes and of our attitude toward them. We
cannot refrain from observing, however, that it would be hard to waste
more effort in confusing and muddling up this most vital world problem
than was wasted (incidentally, by the authors of the draft program) in
their petty struggle against our formulation of the problem. Our
formulation has, however, been entirely confirmed by the course of
events.

Even recently, efforts have been made in leading communist organs to
minimize – on paper – the significance of American hegemony by alluding
to the impending commercial and industrial crisis in the United States.
We cannot here enter into an examination of the special problem of the
duration of the American crisis and its possible depth. This is a
question of conjuncture and not of program. It goes without saying that
in our opinion the inevitability of a crisis is entirely beyond doubt;
nor, considering the present world scope of American capitalism, do we
think it is out of the question that the very next crisis will attain
extremely great depth and sharpness. But there is no justification
whatsoever for the attempt to conclude from this that the hegemony of
North America will be restricted or weakened. Such a conclusion can lead
only to the grossest strategical errors.

Just the contrary is the case. _In the period of crisis the hegemony of
the United States will operate more completely, more openly, and more
ruthlessly than in the period of boom_. The United States will seek to
overcome and extricate herself from her difficulties and maladies
primarily at the expense of Europe, regardless of whether this occurs in
Asia, Canada, South America, Australia, or Europe itself, or whether
this takes place peacefully or through war.

We must clearly understand that if the first period of American
intervention had the effect of stabilization and pacification on Europe,
which to a considerable extent still remains in force today, and may
even recur episodically and become stronger (particularly in the event
of new defeats of the proletariat), the general line of American policy,
particularly in time of its own economic difficulties and crisis, will
engender the deepest convulsions in Europe as well as over the entire
world.

From this we draw the not unimportant conclusion that there will be no
more lack of revolutionary situations in the next decade than in the
past decade. That is why it is of utmost importance to understand
correctly the mainsprings of development so that we may not be caught
unawares by their action. If in the past decade the main source of
revolutionary situations lay in the direct consequences of the
imperialist war, in the second post-war decade the most important source
of revolutionary upheavals will be the interrelations of Europe and
America. A major crisis in the United States will strike the tocsin for
new wars and revolutions. We repeat: there will be no lack of
revolutionary situations. The entire question hinges upon the
international party of the proletariat, the maturity and fighting
ability of the Comintern, and the correctness of its strategical
position and tactical methods.

In the draft program of the Comintern absolutely no expression is to be
found of this trend of thought. A fact of such great importance, it
would seem, as “the shifting of the world economic center to the United
States,” is glossed over by a casual journalistic remark. It is, of
course, utterly impossible to justify this on the ground of lack of
space, for what should be allowed space in a program if not the
fundamental questions? Besides, it should be added that too much space
is devoted in the program to questions of secondary and tertiary
importance, to say nothing of the general literary looseness and
innumerable repetitions by elimination of which the program could be
reduced at least one-third.

3. The Slogan of the Soviet United States of Europe

There is no justifying the omission of the slogan of the Soviet United
States of Europe from the new draft program, a slogan which was accepted
by the Comintern back in 1923, after a rather protracted internal
struggle. Or is it, perhaps, that the authors want to “return” to
Lenin’s position of 1915 precisely on this question? If that is the
case, they must first understand it correctly.

Lenin, as is well known, was hesitant at the beginning of the war in
regard to the slogan of the United States of Europe. The slogan was
originally included in the theses of the SOTSIAL DEMOKRAT (the central
organ of the party at the time) and then rejected by Lenin. This in
itself indicates that the question involved here was not that of the
general acceptability of the slogan on principle, but merely a tactical
appraisal of it, a question of weighing its positive and negative
aspects from the standpoint of the given situation. Needless to say,
Lenin rejected the possibility that a _capitalist_ United States of
Europe could be realized. That was also my approach to the question when
I advanced the slogan of the United States of Europe exclusively as a
prospective state form of the proletarian dictatorship in Europe.

I wrote at that time: “A more or less complete economic unification of
Europe _accomplished from above_ through an agreement between capitalist
governments is a utopia. Along this road matters cannot proceed beyond
partial compromises and half measures. But this alone, an economic
unification of Europe, such as would entail colossal advantages both to
the producer and consumer and to the development of culture in general,
is becoming a _revolutionary task of the European proletariat_ in its
struggle against imperialist protectionism and its instrument –
militarism.” [3]

Further: “The United States of Europe represents first of all a form –
the only conceivable form – of the dictatorship of the proletariat in
Europe.” [4]

But even in this formulation of the question Lenin saw _at that time_ a
certain danger. In the absence of any experience of a proletarian
dictatorship in a single country and of theoretical clarity on this
question even in the Left wing of the social democracy of that period,
the slogan of the United States of Europe _might_ have given rise to the
idea that the proletarian revolution must begin simultaneously, at least
on the whole European continent. It was against this very danger that
Lenin issued a warning, but on this point there was not a shade of
difference between Lenin and myself. I wrote at the time: “Not a single
country must ‘wait’ for the other countries in its struggle. It will be
useful and necessary to repeat this elementary idea so that temporizing
international inaction may not be substituted for parallel international
action. Without waiting for the others, we must begin and continue the
struggle on national grounds with the full conviction that our
initiative will provide an impulse to the struggle in other countries.”
[5]

Then follow those words of mine which Stalin presented at the Seventh
Plenum of the ECCI as the most vicious expression of “Trotskyism,” i.e.,
as “lack of faith” in the inner forces of the revolution and the hope
for aid from without. “And if this [the development of the revolution in
other countries – _L.T._] were not to occur, it would be hopeless to
think (this is borne out both by historical experience and by
theoretical considerations) that a revolutionary Russia, for instance,
could hold out in face of conservative Europe, or that a socialist
Germany could remain isolated in a capitalist world.” [6]

On the basis of this and two or three similar quotations is founded the
condemnation pronounced against “Trotskyism” by the Seventh Plenum as
having allegedly held on this “fundamental question” a position “which
has nothing in common with Leninism.” Let us, therefore, pause for a
moment and listen to Lenin himself.

On March 7, 1918, he said _a propos_ of the Brest-Litovsk peace: “This
is a lesson to us because the absolute truth is that without a
revolution in Germany, we shall perish.” [7]

A week later he said: “World imperialism cannot live side by side with a
victorious advancing social revolution.” [8]

A few weeks later, on April 23, Lenin said: “Our _backwardness_ has
thrust us forward and _we will perish_ if we are unable to hold out
until we meet with the mighty support of the _insurrectionary_ workers
of other countries.” (Our emphasis) [9]

But perhaps this was all said under the special influence of the
Brest-Litovsk crisis? No ! In March 1919, Lenin again repeated: “We do
not live merely in a state but in a system of states and the existence
of the Soviet Republic side by side with imperialist states _for any
length of time is inconceivable_. In the end one or the other must
triumph.” [10]

A year later, on April 7, 1920, Lenin reiterates: “Capitalism, if taken
on an international scale, is even now, not only in a military but also
in an economic sense, stronger than the Soviet power. We must proceed
from this fundamental consideration and never forget it.” [11]

On November 27, 1920, Lenin, in dealing with the question of
concessions, said: “We have now passed from the arena of war to the
arena of peace and we have not forgotten that war will come again. As
long as capitalism and socialism remain side by side we cannot live
peacefully – the one or the other will be the victor in the end. An
obituary will be sung either over the death of world capitalism or the
death of the Soviet Republic. At present we have only a respite in the
war.” [12]

But perhaps the continued existence of the Soviet Republic impelled
Lenin to “recognize his mistake” and renounce his “lack of faith in the
inner force” of the October Revolution?

At the Third Congress of the Comintern in July 1921, Lenin declared in
the theses on the tactics of the Communist Party of Russia: “An
equilibrium has been created, which though extremely precarious and
unstable, nevertheless enables the socialist republic to maintain its
existence within capitalist surroundings, although of course not for any
great length of time.”

Again, on July 5, 1921, Lenin stated point-blank at one of the sessions
of the Congress: ‘It was clear to us that without aid from the
international world revolution, a victory of the proletarian revolution
is impossible. Even prior to the revolution, as well as after it, we
thought that the revolution would also occur either immediately or at
least _very soon_ in other backward countries and in the more highly
developed capitalist countries, _otherwise we would perish_.
Notwithstanding this conviction, we did our utmost to preserve the
Soviet system under any circumstances and at all costs, because we know
that we are working not only for ourselves but also for the
international revolution.” [13]

How infinitely removed are these words, so superb in their simplicity
and permeated with the spirit of internationalism, from the present smug
fabrications of the epigones!

In any case, we have the right to ask: wherein do all these statements
of Lenin differ from my conviction _in the year_ 1915 that the coming
revolution in Russia or the coming socialist Germany could not hold out
alone if “isolated in a capitalist world”? The time factor proved to be
different from that posited not only by myself but also in Lenin’s
forecasts; but the underlying idea retains its full force even today –
at the given moment perhaps more so than ever before. Instead of
condemning this idea, as the Seventh Plenum of the ECCI has done on the
basis of an incompetent and unscrupulous speech, it should be included
in the program of the Communist International.

Defending the slogan of the Soviet United States of Europe, we pointed
out in 1915, that the law of uneven development is in itself no argument
against this slogan, because the _unevenness_ of historical development
of different countries and continents _is in itself uneven_. European
countries develop unevenly in relation to one another. Nevertheless it
can be maintained with absolute historical certainty that not a single
one of these countries is fated, at least in the historical epoch under
review, to run so far ahead in relation to other countries as America
has run ahead of Europe. For America there is _one_ scale of unevenness,
for Europe there is _another_. Geographically and historically,
conditions have predetermined such a close organic bond between the
countries of Europe that there is no way for them to tear themselves out
of it. The modern bourgeois governments of Europe are like murderers
chained to a single cart. The revolution in Europe, as has already been
said, _will in the final analysis_ be of decisive importance for America
as well. But _directly_, in the immediate course of history, a
revolution in Germany will have an immeasurably greater significance for
France than for the United States of America. It is precisely from this
historically developed relationship that there flows the political
vitality of the slogan of the European Soviet Federation. We speak of
its _relative_ vitality because it stands to reason that this Federation
will extend, across the great bridge of the Soviet Union, to Asia, and
will then effect a union of the World Socialist Republics. But this will
constitute a second epoch or a subsequent great chapter of the
imperialist epoch, and when we approach it more closely, we will also
find the corresponding formulas for it.

It can be proven without any difficulty by further quotations that our
difference with Lenin in 1915 over the question of the United States of
Europe was of a restricted, tactical, and, by its very essence,
temporary character; but it is best proven by the subsequent course of
events. In 1923 the Communist International adopted the controversial
slogan. Were it true that the slogan of the United States of Europe was
inacceptable in 1915 on grounds of principle, as the authors of the
draft program now seek to maintain, then the Communist International
could not possibly have adopted it. The law of uneven development, one
would think, had not lost its effectiveness during these years.

The entire formulation of the questions as outlined above flows from the
dynamics of the revolutionary process taken as a whole. The
international revolution is regarded as an interconnected process which
cannot be predicted in all its concreteness, and, so to speak, its order
of occurrence, but which is absolutely clearcut in its general
historical outline. Unless the latter is understood, a correct political
orientation is entirely out of the question.

However, matters appear quite differently if we proceed from the idea of
a socialist development which is occurring and is even being completed
in one country. We have today a “theory” which teaches that it is
possible to build socialism completely in one country and that the
correlations of that country with the capitalist world can be
established on the basis of “neutralizing” the world bourgeoisie
(Stalin). The necessity for the slogan of a United States of Europe
falls away, or is at least diminished, if this essentially
national-reformist and not revolutionary-internationalist point of view
is adopted. But this slogan is, from our viewpoint, important and
vitally necessary because there is lodged in it the condemnation of the
idea of an isolated socialist development. For the proletariat of every
European country, even to a larger measure than for the USSR. – the
difference, however, is one of degree only – it will be most vitally
necessary to spread the revolution to the neighboring countries and to
support insurrections there with arms in hand, not out of any abstract
considerations of international solidarity, which in themselves cannot
set the classes in motion, but because of those vital considerations
which Lenin formulated hundreds of times – namely, that without _timely_
aid from the international revolution, we will be unable to hold out.
The slogan of the Soviet United States corresponds to the dynamics of
the proletarian revolution, which does not break out simultaneously in
all countries, but which passes from country to country and requires the
closest bond between them, especially on the European arena, both with a
view to defense against the most powerful external enemies, and with a
view to economic construction.

One may, to be sure, try to raise an objection by asserting that
following the period of the Ruhr crisis, which provided the latest
impulse for the adoption of that slogan, the latter has not played a
major role in the agitation for the communist parties of Europe and has,
so to speak, not taken root. But this is equally true of such slogans as
the workers’ state, Soviets, and so forth, i.e., all the _slogans of the
directly pre-revolutionary period_. The explanation for this lies in the
fact that since the end of 1923, notwithstanding the erroneous political
appraisals of the Fifth Congress, the revolutionary movement on the
European continent has been on the decline. But that is just why it is
fatal to base a program, in whole or in part, upon impressions received
only during that period. It was no mere accident that, despite all
prejudices, the slogan of a Soviet United States of Europe was adopted
precisely in 1923, at a time when a revolutionary explosion was expected
in Germany, and when the question of the state interrelationships in
Europe assumed an extremely burning character. Every new aggravation, of
the European and indeed of the world crisis is sufficiently sharp to
bring to the fore the main political problems and to invest the slogan
of the United States of Europe with attractive power. It is therefore
fundamentally wrong to pass over this slogan in silence in the program
without rejecting it, that is, to keep it somewhere in reserve, for use
“in case of emergency.” When questions of principle are involved, the
policy of making reservations is futile.

4. The Criterion of Internationalism

The draft, as we already know, seeks to proceed in its construction from
the standpoint of world economy and its internal tendencies – an attempt
which merits recognition. PRAVDA is absolutely correct in saying that
herein lies the basic difference in principle between us and the
national-patriotic social democracy. A program of the international
party of the proletariat can be built only if world economy, which
dominates its separate parts, is taken as the point of departure. But
precisely in analyzing the main tendencies of world development, the
draft not only reveals inadequacies which depreciate its value, as has
already been pointed out above, but it also is grossly one-sided, which
leads it to commit grave blunders.

The draft refers time and again, and not always in the proper place, to
the law of uneven development of capitalism as the main and almost
all-determining law of that development. A number of mistakes in the
draft, including one fundamental error, are theoretically based on the
one-sided and false non-Marxian and non-Leninist interpretation of the
law of uneven development.

In its first chapter the draft states that “the unevenness of economic
and political development is an unconditional law of capitalism. This
unevenness becomes still more accentuated and aggravated in the epoch of
imperialism.”

This is correct. This formulation in part condemns Stalin’s recent
formulation of the question, according to which both Marx and Engels
were ignorant of the law of uneven development which was allegedly first
discovered by Lenin. On September 15, 1925, Stalin wrote that Trotsky
has no reason whatever to refer to Engels because the latter wrote at a
time “when there could be _no talk_ [!!] about the knowledge of the law
of uneven development of capitalist countries.” Unbelievable as these
words may be, Stalin, one of the authors of the draft, has nevertheless
repeated them more than once. The text of the draft, as we have seen,
has taken a step forward in this respect. However, if we leave aside the
correction of this elementary mistake, what the draft says about the law
of uneven development remains in essence one-sided and inadequate.

In the first place, it would have been more correct to say that the
entire history of mankind is governed by the law of uneven development.
Capitalism finds various sections of mankind at different stages of
development, each with its profound internal contradictions. The extreme
diversity in the levels attained, and the extraordinary unevenness in
the rate of development of the different sections of mankind during the
various epochs, serve as the _starting point_ of capitalism. Capitalism
gains mastery only gradually over the inherited unevenness, breaking and
altering it, employing therein its own means and methods. In contrast to
the economic systems which preceded it, capitalism inherently and
constantly aims at economic expansion, at the penetration of new
territories, the surmounting of economic differences, the conversion of
self-sufficient provincial and national economies into a system of
financial interrelationships. Thereby it brings about their
_rapprochement_ and equalizes the economic and cultural levels of the
most progressive and the most backward countries. Without this main
process, it would be impossible to conceive of the relative leveling
out, first, of Europe with Great Britain, and then, of America with
Europe; the industrialization of the colonies, the diminishing gap
between India and Great Britain, and all the consequences arising from
the enumerated processes upon which is based not only the program of the
Communist International but also its very existence.

By drawing the countries economically closer to one another and leveling
out their stages of development, capitalism, however, operates by
methods of its _own_, that is to say, by anarchistic methods which
constantly undermine its own work, set one country against another, and
one branch of industry against another, developing some parts of world
economy while hampering and throwing back the development of others.
Only the correlation of these two fundamental tendencies – both of which
arise from the nature of capitalism – explains to us the living texture
of the historical process.

Imperialism, thanks to the universality, penetrability, and mobility and
the break-neck speed of the formation of finance capital as the driving
force of imperialism, lends vigor to _both these tendencies_.
Imperialism links up incomparably more rapidly and more deeply the
individual national and continental units into a single entity, bringing
them into the closest and most vital dependence upon each other and
rendering their economic methods, social forms, and levels of
development more identical. At the same time, it attains this “goal” by
such antagonistic methods, such tiger-leaps, and such raids upon
backward countries and areas that the unification and leveling of world
economy which it has effected, is upset by it even more violently and
convulsively than in the preceding epochs. Only such a dialectical and
not purely mechanical understanding of the law of uneven development can
make possible the avoidance of the fundamental error which the draft
program, submitted to the Sixth Congress, has failed to avoid.

Immediately after its one-sided characterization of the law of uneven
development pointed out by us, the draft program says:

“Hence it follows that the international proletarian revolution must not
be regarded as a single, simultaneous, and universal act. Hence it
follows that the victory of socialism is at first possible in a few, or
even in one isolated capitalist country.”

That the international revolution of the proletariat cannot be a
simultaneous act, of this there can of course be no dispute at all among
grown-up people after the experience of the October Revolution, achieved
by the proletariat of a backward country under pressure of historical
necessity, without waiting in the least for the proletariat of the
advanced countries “to even out the front.” Within these limits, the
reference to the law of uneven development is absolutely correct and
quite in place. But it is entirely otherwise with the second half of the
conclusion – namely, the hollow assertion that the victory of socialism
is possible “in one isolated capitalist country.” To prove its point the
draft program simply says: “Hence it follows …” One gets the impression
that this follows from the law of uneven development. But this does not
follow at all. “Hence follows” something quite the contrary. If the
historical process were such that some countries developed not only
unevenly but even _independently of each other_, isolated from each
other, then from the law of uneven development would indubitably follow
the possibility of building socialism in one capitalist country – at
first in the most advanced country and then, as they mature, in the more
backward ones. Such was the customary and, so to speak, average idea of
the transition to socialism within the ranks of the pre-war social
democracy. This is precisely the idea that formed the theoretical basis
of social-patriotism. Of course, the draft program does not hold this
view. But it inclines towards it.

The theoretical error of the draft lies in the fact that it seeks to
deduce from the law of uneven development something which the law does
not and cannot imply. Uneven or sporadic development of various
countries acts constantly to _upset_ but in no case to _eliminate_ the
growing economic bonds and interdependence between those countries which
the very next day, after four years of hellish slaughter, were compelled
to exchange coal, bread, oil, powder, and suspenders with each other. On
this point, the draft posits the question as if historical development
proceeds only on the basis of sporadic leaps, while the economic basis
which gives rise to these leaps, and upon which they occur, is either
left entirely out of sight by the authors of the draft, or is forcibly
eliminated by them. This they do with the sole object of defending the
indefensible theory of socialism in one country.

After what has been said it is not difficult to understand that the only
correct formulation of the question should read that Marx and Engels,
even prior to the imperialist epoch, had arrived at the conclusion that
on the one hand, unevenness, i.e., sporadic historical development,
stretches the proletarian revolution through an entire epoch in the
course of which nations will enter the revolutionary flood one after
another; while, on the other hand, the organic interdependence of the
several countries, developing toward an international division of labor,
excludes the possibility of building socialism in one country. This
means that the Marxian doctrine, which posits that the socialist
revolution can begin only on a national basis, while the building of
socialism in one country is impossible, has been rendered _doubly and
trebly true_, all the more so now, in the modern epoch when imperialism
has developed, deepened, and sharpened both, of these antagonistic
tendencies. On this point, Lenin merely developed and concretized Marx’s
own formulation and Marx’s own answer to this question.

Our party program is based entirely upon the international conditions
underlying the October Revolution and the socialist construction. To
prove this, one need only transcribe the entire theoretical part of our
program. Here we will confine ourselves merely to pointing out that
when, during the Eighth Congress of our party, the late Podbelsky
inferred that some formulations of the program had reference only to the
revolution in Russia, Lenin replied as follows in his concluding speech
on the question of the party program (March 19, 1919):

“Podbelsky has raised objections to a paragraph which speaks of the
_pending_ social revolution … His argument is obviously unfounded
because _our program deals with the social revolution on a world
scale_.” [14]

It will not be out of place here to point out that at about the same
time Lenin suggested that our party should change its name from the
Communist Party of Russia to the Communist Party, so as to emphasize
still further that it is a party of _international_ revolution. I was
the only one voting for Lenin’s motion in the Central Committee.
However, he did not bring the matter before the Congress in view of the
foundation of the Third International. This position is proof of the
fact that there was not even an inkling of socialism in one country at
that time. That alone is the reason why the party program does not
_condemn_ this “theory” but merely _excludes_ it.

But the program of the Young Communist League, adopted two years later,
had to issue a direct warning against home-bred illusions and national
narrow-mindedness on the question of the proletarian revolution, in
order to train the youth in the spirit of internationalism. We will have
more to say on this point later.

The new draft program of the Comintern puts the matter quite
differently. In harmony with the revisionist evolution of its authors
since 1924, the draft, as we have seen, chooses the directly opposite
path. But the manner in which the question of socialism in one country
is solved determines the nature of the _entire_ draft as a Marxian or a
revisionist document.

Of course, the draft program carefully, persistently, and severally
presents, emphasizes, and explains the difference between the communist
and reformist formulation of questions. But these assurances do not
solve the problem. We have here a situation similar to that on board a
ship which is equipped and even overloaded with numerous Marxian
mechanisms and appliances, while its mainsail is so raised as to be
purposely swelled by every revisionist and reformist wind.

Whoever has learned from the experiences of the last three decades and
particularly from the extraordinary experience in China during the
recent years, understands the powerful dialectical interdependence
between the class struggle and the programmatic party documents and will
understand our statement that the new revisionist sail can nullify all
the safety appliances of Marxism and Leninism. That is why we are
compelled to dwell in greater detail upon this cardinal question, which
will for a long time determine the development and destiny of the
Communist International.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. PRAVDA, Jan. 15, 1928.

2. PRAVDA, May 29, 1928.

3. Trotsky, _The Peace Program_, WORKS, Vol.III, part 1, p.85, Russian
ed.

4. IBID., p.92.

5. IBID., pp.89-90.

6. IBID., p.90.

7. (Lenin, WORKS, Vol.XV, p.132, Russian [old] ed.

8. IBID., p.175.

9. IBID., p.187.

10. WORKS, Vol.XVI, p.102.

11. WORKS, Vol.XVII, p.102.

12. IBID., p.398.

13. WORKS, Vol.XVIII, part 1, p.321.

14. WORKS, Vol.XVI, p.131.

The Third International After Lenin



I. THE PROGRAM OF THE INTERNATIONAL REVOLUTION OR A PROGRAM OF SOCIALISM IN ONE COUNTRY? (PART 2)


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

5. The Theoretical Tradition of The Party

The draft program, in the foregoing quotation, deliberately uses the
expression “victory of socialism in one country” so as to secure an
external and purely verbal similarity between its text and Lenin’s
article of 1915, which has been misused so ruthlessly, not to say
criminally, during the discussion on the question of building a
socialist society in one country. The draft resorts to the same method
elsewhere by “referring” to Lenin’s words as a confirmation. Such is the
scientific “methodology of the draft.”

Of the great wealth of Marxian literature and the treasure of Lenin’s
works – directly ignoring everything Lenin said and wrote and everything
he did, ignoring the party program and the program of the Young
Communist League, ignoring the opinions expressed by all party leaders,
without exception, during the epoch of the October Revolution, when the
question was posed categorically (and how categorically!) ignoring what
the authors of the program themselves, Stalin and Bukharin, said up to
and including 1924 – two quotations all told from Lenin, one from his
article on the United States of Europe, written in 1915, and another
from his unfinished posthumous work on cooperation, written in 1923,
have been used in defense of the theory of national socialism, which was
created to meet the exigencies of the struggle against so-called
“Trotskyism” at the end of 1924 or the beginning of 1925. Everything
that contradicts these two quotations of a couple of lines each – the
whole of Marxism and Leninism – has simply been set aside. These two
artificially extracted, and grossly and epigonically misinterpreted
quotations are taken as the basis of the new and purely revisionist
theory which is unbounded from the viewpoint of its political
consequences. We are witnessing the efforts to graft, by methods of
scholasticism and sophistry, to the Marxian trunk an absolutely alien
branch, which, if grafted, will inexorably poison and kill the whole
tree.

At the Seventh Plenum of the ECCI, Stalin declared (not for the first
time): “The question of the construction of a socialist economy in one
country was for the first time advanced in the party by Lenin back in
1915.” [15]

Thus an admission is here made that _prior_ to 1915 no mention was ever
made of the question of socialism in one country. Ergo, Stalin and
Bukharin do not venture to encroach upon the entire tradition of Marxism
and of the party on the question of the international character of the
proletarian revolution. Let us bear this in mind.

However, let us see what Lenin did say “for the first time” in 1915 in
contradistinction to what Marx, Engels, and Lenin himself had said
previously.

In 1915 Lenin said: “Uneven economic and political development is an
unconditional law of capitalism. Hence it follows that the triumph of
socialism is, to begin with, possible in a few, or even in a single
capitalist country. The victorious proletariat of that country, having
expropriated the capitalists and having organized socialist production
at home, would be up in arms against the rest of the capitalist world,
attracting oppressed classes of other countries to its side, causing
insurrections in those countries against the capitalists, and acting, in
case of need, even with military power against the exploiting classes
and their governments.” [16]

What did Lenin have in mind? Only that the victory of socialism in the
sense of the establishment of a dictatorship of the proletariat is
possible at first in one country, which because of this very fact, will
be counterposed to the capitalist world. The proletarian state, in order
to be able to resist an attack and to assume a revolutionary offensive
of its own, will first have to “organize socialist production at home,”
i.e., it will have to organize the operation of the factories taken from
the capitalists. That is all. Such a “victory of socialism” was, as is
shown, first achieved in Russia, and the first workers’ state, in order
to defend itself against world intervention, had first of all to
“organize socialist production at home,” or to create trusts of “a
consistently socialist type.” By the victory of socialism in one
country, Lenin consequently did not cherish the fantasy of a
self-sufficient socialist society, and in a backward country at that,
but something much more realistic, namely, what the October Revolution
had achieved in our country during the first period of its existence.

Does this, perhaps, require proof? So many proofs can be adduced that
the only difficulty lies in making the best choice.

In his theses on war and peace (January 7, 1918) Lenin spoke of the
“necessity of a certain period of time, _at least several months, for
the victory of socialism_ in Russia …” [17]

At the beginning of the same year, i.e., 1918, Lenin, in his article
entitled “On Left Wing Childishness and Petty Bourgeois Tendencies,”
directed against Bukharin, wrote the following: “ If, let us say, state
capitalism could be established in our country within six months, that
would be a tremendous achievement and the surest guarantee that within a
year socialism will be definitely established and will have become
invincible.” [18]

How could Lenin have set so short a period for the “definite
establishment of socialism”? What material-productive and social content
did he put into these words?

This question will at once appear in a different light if we recall that
on April 29, 1918, Lenin said in his report to the All-Russian Central
Executive Committee of the Soviet government: “It is hardly to be
expected that our next generation, which will be more highly developed,
will effect a complete transition to socialism.” [19]

On December 3, 1919, at the Congress of Communes and Artels, Lenin spoke
even more bluntly, saying: “We know that we cannot establish a socialist
order at the present time. It will be well if our children and perhaps
our grandchildren will be able to establish it.” [20]

In which of these two cases was Lenin right? Was it when he spoke of the
“definite establishment of socialism” within twelve months, or when he
left it not for our children but our grandchildren to “establish the
socialist order”?

Lenin was right in both cases, for he had in mind two entirely different
and incommensurable stages of socialist construction.

By the “definite establishment of socialism” in the first case, Lenin
meant not the building of a socialist society within a year’s time or
even “several months,” that is, he did not mean that the classes will be
done away with, that the contradictions between city and country will be
eliminated; he meant the _restoration of production in mills and
factories in the hands of the proletarian state_, and thus the assuring
of the possibility to exchange products between city and country. The
very shortness of the term is in itself a sure key to an understanding
of the whole perspective.

Of course, even for this elementary task, too short a term was set at
the beginning of 1918. It was this purely practical “miscalculation”
that Lenin derided at the Fourth Congress of the Comintern when he said
“we were more foolish then than we are now.” But “we had a correct view
of the general perspectives and did not for a moment believe that it is
possible to set up a complete ’socialist order’ in the course of twelve
months and in a backward country at that.” The attainment of this main
and final goal – the construction of a socialist society – was left by
Lenin to three whole generations – ourselves, our children, and our
grandchildren.

Is it not clear that in his article of 1915, Lenin meant by the
organization of “socialist production,” not the creation of a socialist
society but an immeasurably more elementary task which has already been
realized by us in the USSR? Otherwise, one would have to arrive at the
absurd conclusion that, according to Lenin, the proletarian party,
having captured power, “postpones” the revolutionary war until the third
generation.

Such is the sorry position of the main stronghold of the new theory in
so far as the 1915 quotation is concerned. However, what is sadder still
is the fact that Lenin wrote this passage not in application to Russia.
He was speaking of Europe in contrast to Russia. This follows not only
from the content of the quoted article devoted to the question of the
United States of Europe, but also from Lenin’s entire position at the
time. A few months later, November 20, 1915, Lenin wrote specially on
Russia, saying:

“The task of the proletariat follows obviously from this actual state of
affairs. This task is a bold, heroic, revolutionary struggle against the
monarchy (the slogans of the January conference of 1912 – the ’Three
Whales’s), a struggle which would attract all democratic masses, that
is, first and foremost the peasantry. At the same time, a relentless
struggle must be waged against chauvinism, a struggle for the socialist
revolution in Europe in alliance with its proletariat. The war crisis
has strengthened the economic and political factors impelling the petty
bourgeoisie, including the peasantry, towards the Left. Therein lies the
objective basis of the absolute possibility of the victory of the
democratic revolution in Russia. That the objective conditions for a
socialist revolution have fully matured in Western Europe, was
recognized before the war by all influential socialists of all advanced
countries.” [21]

Thus, in 1915, Lenin clearly spoke of a democratic revolution in Russia
and of a socialist revolution in Western Europe. In passing, as if
speaking of something which is self-evident, he mentions that in Western
Europe, distinct from Russia, in contrast to Russia, the conditions for
a socialist revolution have “fully matured.” But the authors of the new
theory, the authors of the draft program, simply ignore this quotation –
one of many – which squarely and directly refers to Russia, just as they
ignore hundreds of other passages, as they ignore all of Lenin’s works.
Instead of taking notice of this, they snatch, as we have seen, at
another passage that refers to Western Europe, ascribe to it a meaning
which it cannot and does not contain, attach this ascribed meaning to
Russia, a country to which the passage has no reference, and on this
“foundation” erect their new theory.

What was Lenin’s position on this question immediately before the
October period? On leaving Switzerland after the February 1917
revolution, Lenin addressed a letter to the Swiss workers in which he
declared:

“Russia is a peasant country, one of the most backward countries of
Europe. Socialism cannot be _immediately_ triumphant there but the
peasant character of the country with the huge tracts of land in the
hands of the feudal aristocracy and landowners, can, on the basis of the
experience of 1905, give a tremendous sweep to the bourgeois democratic
revolution in Russia and make our revolution a _prelude_ to the world
socialist revolution, a _step_ towards it … The Russian proletariat
cannot by its own forces _victoriously complete_ the socialist
revolution. But it can give the Russian revolution dimensions such as
will create the most favorable conditions for it, such as will in a
certain sense _begin_ it. It can facilitate matters for the entrance
into a decisive battle on the part of its _main_ and most reliable ally,
the _European_ and American socialist proletariat.” [22]

All the elements of the question are contained in these few lines. If
Lenin believed in 1915, in time of war and reaction, as they try to
convince us now, that the proletariat of Russia can build socialism by
itself so as to be able to declare war on the bourgeois states, after it
will have accomplished this work, how could Lenin, at the beginning of
1917, after the February revolution, speak so categorically about the
impossibility for backward peasant Russia to build socialism with its
own forces? One must at least be somewhat logical and, to put it baldly,
have some respect for Lenin.

It would be superfluous to add more quotations. To give an integral
outline of Lenin’s economic and political views conditioned by the
international character of the socialist revolution would require a
separate work that would cover many subjects, but not the subject of
building a self-sufficient socialist society in one country, because
Lenin did not know this subject.

However, we feel obliged to dwell here on another article by Lenin – _On
Cooperation_ – since the draft program appears to quote this posthumous
article extensively, i.e., utilizes some of its expressions for a
purpose which is entirely alien to the article. We have in mind the
fifth chapter of the draft program which states that the workers of the
Soviet Republics “possess all the necessary and sufficient material
prerequisites in the country … for the complete construction of
socialism”.

If the article dictated by Lenin during his illness and published after
his death really did say that the Soviet state possesses all the
necessary and _material_, that is, first of all, _productive_
prerequisites for an independent construction of complete socialism, one
would only have to surmise that either Lenin slipped in his dictation or
that the stenographer made a mistake in transcribing her notes. Either
conjecture is at any rate more probable than that Lenin abandoned
Marxism and his own life-long teaching in two hasty strokes.
Fortunately, however, there is not the slightest need for such an
explanation. The remarkable, though unfinished article _On Cooperation_,
which is bound up by unity of thought with other, no less remarkable
articles of his last period, constituting, as it mere, a chapter of an
unfinished book dealing with _the place occupied by the October
Revolution in the chain of revolutions in the West and East_ – this
article _On Cooperation_ does not at all speak of those things which the
revisionists of Leninism so light-mindedly ascribe to it.

In this article Lenin explains that the “trading” cooperatives can and
must entirely change their social role in the workers’ state and that by
a correct policy they may direct the merger of private peasant interests
with the general state interests along socialist channels. Lenin
substantiates this irrefutable idea as follows:

“As a matter of fact, the state power over all large-scale means of
production, state power in the hands of the proletariat, an alliance of
that proletariat with the many millions of peasants with small and petty
holdings, security of proletarian leadership in relationship to the
peasant – is this not all that is necessary for the cooperatives, the
cooperatives alone, which we have formerly treated as mere traders, and
which, from a certain viewpoint, we still have the right to treat as
such even now under the NEP, is this not all that is necessary for the
construction of a complete socialist society? It is not yet the
construction of a socialist society but it is all that is necessary and
sufficient for this construction.” [23]

The text of the passage which includes an unfinished phrase [“the
cooperatives alone”(?)] irrefutably proves that we have before us an
uncorrected draft which was dictated and written. It is all the more
inadmissible to cling to a few isolated words of the text rather than to
try to get a general idea of the article. Fortunately, however, even the
_letter_ of the cited passage and not only its _spirit_ grants no one
the right to misuse it as it is being misused by the authors of the
draft program. Speaking of the “necessary and sufficient” prerequisites,
Lenin strictly limits his subject in this article. In it he deals only
with the question as to the ways and means by which we will reach
socialism through the atomized and diffused peasant enterprises without
new class upheavals, having the prerequisites of the Soviet regime as
our basis. The article is entirely devoted to the _socio-organizational_
forms of the transition from small private commodity economy to
collective economy but not to the _material-productive_ conditions of
that: transition. Were the European proletariat to prove victorious
today and come to our assistance with its technology, the question of
cooperation raised by Lenin as a socio-organizational method of
coordinating private and social interests would still fully retain its
significance. Cooperation points the way through which advanced
technology, including electricity, can reorganize and unite the millions
of peasant enterprises, once a Soviet regime exists. But cooperation
cannot be substituted for technology and does not create that
technology. Lenin does not merely speak of the necessary and sufficient
prerequisites in general, but as we have seen, he definitely enumerates
them. They are: (1) “Power of the state over all large-scale means of
production” (an uncorrected phrase); (2) “State power in the hands of
the proletariat”; (3) “An alliance of that proletariat with millions of
peasants”; (4) “Security of proletarian leadership in relation to the
peasants.” It is only after enumerating these purely political
conditions – nothing is said here about material conditions – that Lenin
arrives at his conclusion, namely, that “this” (i.e., all the foregoing)
“is all that is necessary and sufficient” for the building of a
socialist society. “All that is necessary and sufficient” on the
_political plane,_ but no more. But, adds Lenin right there and then,
“it is not yet the construction of a socialist society.” Why not?
Because political conditions alone, although they be sufficient, do not
solve the problem. The cultural question still remains. “_Only_” this,
says Lenin, emphasizing the word “only” in order to show the tremendous
importance of the prerequisites we lack. Lenin knew as well as we that
culture is bound up with technology. “To be cultural” – he brings the
revisionists back to earth – “a certain _material_ basis is necessary.”
[24] Suffice to mention the problem of electrification which Lenin,
incidentally, purposely linked up with the question of the international
socialist revolution. The struggle for culture, given the “necessary and
sufficient” political (_but not material_) prerequisites, would absorb
all our efforts, were it not for the question of the uninterrupted and
irreconcilable economic, political, military, and cultural struggle of
the country engaged in the building of a socialist society on a backward
basis against world capitalism which is in its decline but is
technically powerful.

“I am ready to state [Lenin underscores with particular emphasis towards
the end of this article] that the center of gravity for us would be
transferred to cultural work were it not for our duty to fight for our
position on an international scale.” [25]

Such is Lenin’s real idea if we analyze the article on cooperation, even
apart from all his other works. How else, if not as a falsification, can
we style the formula of the authors of the draft program who
deliberately take Lenin’s words about our possession of the “necessary
and sufficient” prerequisites and add to them the basic material
prerequisites, although Lenin definitely speaks of the material
prerequisites in parentheses, saying that it is just what we do not have
and what we must still gain in our struggle “for our position on an
international scale,” that is, in connection with the international
proletarian revolution? That is how matters stand with the second, and
last stronghold of the theory.

We purposely did not deal here with innumerable articles and speeches
from 1905 to 1923 in which Lenin asserts and repeats most categorically
that without a victorious world revolution we are doomed to failure,
that it is impossible to defeat the bourgeoisie economically in one
country, particularly a backward country, that the task of building a
socialist society is in its very essence an international task – from
which Lenin drew conclusions which may be “pessimistic” to the
promulgators of the new national reactionary utopia but which are
sufficiently optimistic from the viewpoint of revolutionary
internationalism. We concentrate our argument here only on the passages
which the authors of the draft have themselves chosen in order to create
the “necessary and sufficient” prerequisites for their utopia. And we
see that their whole structure crumbles the moment it is touched.

However, we consider it in place to present at least one of Lenin’s
direct statements on the controversial question which does not need any
comment and will not permit any false interpretation.

“We have emphasized _in many of our works; in all our speeches, and in
our entire press_ that the situation in Russia is not the same as in the
advanced capitalist countries, that we have in Russia a minority of
industrial workers and an overwhelming majority of small agrarians. The
social revolution in such a country can be finally successful only on
two conditions: first, on the condition that it is given timely support
by the social revolution in one or more advanced countries … second,
that there be an agreement between the proletariat which establishes the
dictatorship or holds state power in its hands and the majority of the
peasant population …

“We know that only an agreement with the peasantry can save the
socialist revolution in Russia so long as the revolution in other
countries has not arrived.” [26]

We hope that this passage is sufficiently instructive. First, Lenin
himself emphasizes in it that the ideas advanced by him have been
developed “in many of our works, in all our speeches, and in our entire
press”; secondly, this perspective was envisaged by Lenin not in 1915,
two years prior to the October Revolution, but in 1921, the fourth year
after the October Revolution.

So far as Lenin is concerned, we venture to think that the question is
clear enough. There remains to inquire: what was formerly the opinion of
the authors of the draft program on the basic question now before us?

On this point, Stalin said in November 1926: “The party always took as
its starting point the idea that the victory of socialism in one country
means the possibility to build socialism in that country, and that this
task can be accomplished with the forces of a single country.” [27]

We already know that the party never _took this as its starting point_.
On the contrary, “in many of our works, in all our speeches, and in our
entire press,” as Lenin said, the party proceeded from the opposite
position, which found its highest expression in the program of the CPSU.
But one would imagine that at least Stalin himself “always” proceeded
from this false view that “ socialism can be built with the forces of
one country.” Let us check up.

What Stalin’s views on this question were in 1905 or 1915 we have
absolutely no means of knowing as there are no documents whatever on the
subject. But in 1924, Stalin outlined Lenin’s views on the building of
socialism, as follows:

“The overthrow of the power of the bourgeoisie and the establishment of
a proletarian government in one country does not yet guarantee the
complete victory of socialism. The main task of socialism – the
_organization of socialist production_ – still remains ahead. Can this
task be accomplished, can the final victory of socialism in one country
be attained, without the joint efforts of the proletariat of several
advanced countries? _No, this is impossible_. To overthrow the
bourgeoisie, the efforts of one country are sufficient – the history of
our revolution bears this out. For the final victory of socialism, _for
the organization of socialist production, the efforts of one country,
particularly of such a peasant country as Russia are insufficient_. For
this the efforts of the proletarians of several advanced countries are
necessary …

“Such, on the whole, are _the characteristic features of the Leninist
theory of the proletarian revolution._” [28]

One must concede that the “characteristic features of the Leninist
theory” are outlined here quite correctly. In the later editions of
Stalin’s book this passage was altered to read in just the opposite way
and the “characteristic features of the Leninist theory” were proclaimed
within a year as … Trotskyism. The Seventh Plenum of the ECCI passed its
decision, not on the basis of the 1924 edition but of the 1926 edition.

That is how the matter stands with Stalin. Nothing could be any sadder.
To be sure, we might reconcile ourselves with this if matters were not
just as sad with regard to the Seventh Plenum of the ECCI.

There is one hope left and that is that at least Bukharin, the real
author of the draft program, “always proceeded” from the possibility of
the realization of socialism in one country. Let us check up.

Here is what Bukharin wrote on the subject in 1917:

“Revolutions are the locomotives of history. Even in backward Russia,
the irreplaceable engineer of that locomotive can be only the
proletariat. But the proletariat can no longer remain within the
framework of the property relations of bourgeois society. It marches to
power and towards socialism. However, this task which is being ‘put on
the order of the day’ in Russia cannot be accomplished ‘within national
boundaries.’ Here the working class meets with an insurmountable wall
[Observe: “an insurmountable wall.” – _L.T._] which can be broken
through only by the battering ram of the _International Workers’
Revolution_.” [29]

He could not have expressed himself more clearly. Such were the views
held by Bukharin in 1917, two years after Lenin’s alleged “ change” in
1915. But perhaps the October Revolution taught Bukharin differently?
Again, let us check.

In 1919, Bukharin wrote on the subject of the _Proletarian Dictatorship
in Russia and the World Revolution_ in the theoretical organ of the
Communist International, saying:

“Under existing _world_ economy and the connection between its parts,
with the mutual interdependence of the various national bourgeois
groups, it is self-evident that the struggle in one country cannot end
without a decisive victory of one or the other side in _several_
civilized countries.”

At that time this was even “self-evident.” He goes on.

“In the Marxian and quasi-Marxian pre-war literature, the question was
many times raised as to whether the victory of socialism is possible in
one country. Most of the writers replied to this question in the
negative [and what about Lenin in 1915? – _L.T._] from which one does
not at all conclude that it is impossible or impermissible to start the
revolution and to seize the power in one country.”

Exactly! In the same article we read:

“The period of a rise in the productive forces can begin only with the
victory of the proletariat in several major countries. Hence it follows
that an all-round development of the world revolution and the formation
of a strong economic alliance of the industrial countries with Soviet
Russia is necessary.” [30]

Bukharin’s assertion that a rise in the productive forces, that is,
_real socialist development_, will begin in our country only after the
victory of the proletariat in the advanced countries of Europe is indeed
the very same statement that was used as a basis of all acts of
indictment against “Trotskyism,” including the indictment at the Seventh
Plenum of the ECCI The only thing peculiar is that Bukharin, who owes
his salvation to his short memory, stepped forward in the role of
accuser. Side by side with this comical circumstance, there is another
and a tragic one, namely, that among those indicted was also Lenin, who
expressed dozens of times the very same elementary idea.

Finally, in 1921, six years after Lenin’s alleged change of 1915, and
four years after the October Revolution, the Central Committee headed by
Lenin approved the program of the Young Communist League, which was
drawn up by a commission directed by Bukharin. Paragraph 4 of this
program reads:

“In the USSR state power is already in the hands of the working class.
In the course of three years of heroic struggle against world
capitalism, the proletariat has maintained and strengthened its Soviet
government. Russia, although it possesses enormous natural resources,
is, nevertheless, from an industrial point of view, a backward country,
in which a petty bourgeois population predominates. It can arrive at
socialism only through the world proletarian revolution, which epoch of
development we have now entered.”

This single paragraph from the program of the Young Communist League
(not a chance article but a program!) renders ridiculous and really
infamous the attempts of the authors of the draft to prove that the
party “always” held the construction of a socialist society to be
possible in one country and, moreover, precisely in Russia. If this was
“ always” so, then why did Bukharin formulate such a paragraph in the
program of the Young Communist League? Where was Stalin looking at the
time? How could Lenin and the whole Central Committee have approved such
a heresy? How was it that no one in the party noticed this “ trifle” or
raised a voice against it? Doesn’t this look like a sinister joke which
is turning into a downright mockery of the party, its history, and the
Comintern? Is it not high time to put a stop to this? Is it not high
time to tell the revisionists: don’t you dare hide behind Lenin and the
theoretical tradition of the party!?

At the Seventh Plenum of the ECCI, in order to provide the basis for the
resolution condemning “Trotskyism,” Bukharin, whose safety lies in the
shortness of his memory, made the following assertion:

“In comrade Trotsky’s theory of the permanent revolution – and comrade
Trotsky propounds this theory even today – there is also to be found an
assertion that because of our economic backwardness we must inevitably
perish without the world revolution.” [31]

At the Seventh Plenum I spoke about the gaps in the theory of the
permanent revolution as I had formulated it in 1905-1906. But naturally
it never even entered my mind to renounce anything in this theory which
was fundamental, which tended to and which did bring me close to Lenin,
and which made utterly inacceptable to me the present-day revision of
Leninism.

There were two fundamental propositions in the theory of the permanent
revolution. First, that despite the historical backwardness of Russia,
the revolution can transfer the power into the hands of the Russian
proletariat before the proletariat of advanced countries is able to
attain it. Secondly, that the way out of those contradictions which will
befall the proletarian dictatorship in a backward country, surrounded by
a world of capitalist enemies, will be found on the arena of world
revolution. The first proposition is based upon a correct understanding
of the law of uneven development. The second depends upon a correct
understanding of the indissolubility of the economic and political ties
between capitalist countries. Bukharin is correct in saying that even
today I still hold to these two basic propositions of the theory of the
permanent revolution. Today, more than ever before. For, in my opinion,
they have been completely verified and proven: in theory, by the works
of Marx and Lenin; in practice, by the experience of the October
Revolution.

6. Where is the “ Social Democratic Deviation”?

The quotations adduced are more than sufficient to characterize Stalin’s
and Bukharin’s theoretical positions of yesterday and today. But in
order to determine the character of their political methods one must
recall that, having selected from the documents written by the
Opposition those statements which are absolutely analogous with those
which they themselves made up to 1925 (_in this case_ in full agreement
with Lenin), Stalin and Bukharin erected on the basis of these
quotations the theory of our “social democratic deviation.” It appears
that in the central question of the relations between the October
Revolution and international revolution, the Opposition holds the same
views as Otto Bauer, who does not admit the possibility of socialist
construction in Russia. One might really think that the printing press
was invented only in 1929 and that everything that occurred prior to
this date is doomed to oblivion. The stakes are all put on short memory!

Yet, on the question of the nature of the October Revolution, the
Comintern settled its accounts with Otto Bauer and other philistines of
the Second International at the Fourth Congress. In my report on the New
Economic Policys and the prospects of world revolution, authorized by
the Central Committee, Otto Bauer’s position was appraised in a manner
which expressed the views of our then Central Committee; it did not meet
with any objections at the Congress and I think it fully holds good
today. So far as Bukharin himself is concerned, he declined to clarify
the political side of the problem since “many comrades, including Lenin
and Trotsky, have already spoken on the subject”; in other words,
Bukharin at that time agreed with my speech. Here is what I said at the
Fourth Congress about Otto Bauer:

“The social democratic theoreticians, who, on the one hand recognize in
their holiday articles that capitalism, particularly in Europe, has
outlived its usefulness and has become a brake on historical
development, and who on the other hand express the conviction that the
evolution of Soviet Russia inevitably leads to the triumph of bourgeois
democracy, fall into the most pitiful and banal contradiction of which
these stupid and conceited confusionists are entirely worthy. _The New
Economic Policy is calculated for certain definite conditions of time
and space. It is a maneuver of the workers’ state which exists in
capitalist surroundings and definitely calculates on the revolutionary
development of Europe_ … Such a factor as time cannot be left out of
consideration in political calculations. If we allow that capitalism
will really be able to continue existing in Europe for another century
or half a century and that Soviet Russia will have to adapt itself to it
in its economic policy, then the question solves itself automatically
because, by allowing this, we presuppose the collapse of the proletarian
revolution in Europe and the rise of a new epoch of capitalist revival.
On what grounds is this to be allowed? If Otto Bauer has discovered in
the life of present-day Austria any miraculous signs of capitalist
resurrection, then all that can be said is that the fate of Russia is
predetermined. But thus far we do not see any miracles, nor do we
believe in them. From our viewpoint, if the European bourgeoisie is able
to maintain itself in power in the course of several decades, it will
under the present world conditions signify not a new capitalist bloom,
but economic stagnation and the cultural decline of Europe. Generally
speaking it cannot be denied that such a process might draw Soviet
Russia into the abyss. Whether she would have then to go through a stage
of ’democracy,’ or decay in some other forms, is a question of secondary
importance. But we see no reason whatever for adopting Spengler’s
philosophy. We definitely count upon a revolutionary development in
Europe. _The New Economic Policy is merely an adaptation to the rate of
that development._” [32]

This formulation of the question brings us back to the point from which
we started the evaluation of the draft program, namely, that in the
epoch of imperialism it is impossible to approach the fate of one
country in any other way but by taking as a starting point the
tendencies of world development as a whole in which the individual
country, with all its national peculiarities, is included and to which
it is subordinated. The theoreticians of the Second International
exclude the USSR from the world unit and from the imperialist epoch;
they apply to the USSR, as an isolated country, the bald criterion of
economic “maturity”; they declare that the USSR is not ripe for
independent socialist’ construction and thence draw the conclusion of
the inevitability of a capitalist degeneration of the workers’ state.

The authors of the draft program adopt the same theoretical ground and
take over bag and baggage the metaphysical methodology of the social
democratic theoreticians. They too “ abstract” from the world entity and
from the imperialist epoch. They proceed from the fiction of isolated
development. They apply to the national phase of the world revolution a
bald economic criterion. But the “verdict” they bring in is different.
The “ leftism” of the authors of the draft lies in the fact that they
turn the social democratic evaluations inside out. Yet, the position of
the theoreticians of the Second International, remodel it as you may,
remains worthless. One must take Lenin’s position which simply
_eliminates_ Bauer’s evaluation and Bauer’s prognosis as kindergarten
exercises.

That is how matters stand with the “social democratic deviation.” Not we
but the authors of the draft should consider themselves related to
Bauer.

7. The Dependence of the USSR on World Economy

The precursor of the present prophets of the national socialist society
was no other than Herr Vollmar. Describing in his article entitled _The
Isolated Socialist State_ the prospect of independent socialist
construction in Germany, the proletariat of which country was much
further developed than that of advanced Britain, Vollmar, in 1878,
refers definitely and quite clearly in several places to the law of
uneven development with which, according to Stalin, Marx and Engels were
unacquainted. On the basis of that law Vollmar arrived in 1878 at the
irrefutable conclusion that:

“Under the prevailing conditions, which will retain their force also in
the future, it can be foreseen that a simultaneous victory of socialism
in all cultural countries is absolutely out of the question.”

Developing this idea still further, Vollmar says: “Thus we have come to
the _isolated_ socialist state which I hope I have proven to be the
_most probable_, although not the only possible way.”

In so far as by the term “isolated state” we may here understand a state
under a proletarian dictatorship, Vollmar expressed an irrefutable idea
which was well known to Marx and Engels, and which Lenin expressed in
the above quoted article of 1915.

But then follows something which is purely Vollmar’s own idea, which, by
the way, is by a long; shot not so one-sided and wrongly formulated as
the formulation of our sponsors of the theory of socialism in one
country. In his construction, Vollmar took as a starting point the
proposition that socialist Germany will have lively economic relations
with world capitalist economy, having at the same time the advantage of
possessing a much more highly developed technology and a much lower cost
of production. This construction is based on the perspective of a
_peaceful coexistence_ of the socialist and capitalist systems. But
inasmuch as socialism must, as it progresses, constantly reveal its
colossal productive superiority, the necessity for a world revolution
will fall away by itself: socialism will triumph over capitalism by
selling goods more cheaply on the market.

Bukharin, the author of the first draft program and one of the authors
of the second draft, proceeds in his construction of socialism in one
country entirely from the idea of an isolated self-sufficing economy. In
Bukharin’s article entitled _On the Nature of our Revolution and the
Possibility of Successful Socialist Construction in the USSR_ [33],
which is the last word in scholasticism multiplied by sophistry, all the
reasoning is done within the limits of isolated economy. The principal
and only argument is the following:

“Since we have ‘all that is necessary and sufficient’ for the building
of socialism, therefore, in the very process of building socialism there
can be no such point at which its further construction would become
impossible. If we have within our country such a combination of forces
that, in relation to each past year, we are marching ahead with a
greater preponderance of the socialist sector of our economy and the
socialized sectors of our economy grow faster than the private
capitalist sectors, then we are entering every subsequent new year with
a preponderance of forces.”

This reasoning is irreproachable: “_Since_ we have all that is necessary
and sufficient,” _therefore_ we have it. Starting out from a point which
must be proved, Bukharin builds up a complete system of a self-sufficing
socialist economy without any entrances to it or exits from it, As to
the external milieu, that is, the whole world, Bukharin, as well as
Stalin, reminds himself of it only from the angle of intervention. When
Bukharin speaks in his article about the necessity of “abstracting” from
the international factor, he has in mind not the world market but
military intervention. Bukharin does not have to abstract from the world
market because he simply forgets about it throughout his construction.
In harmony with this schema Bukharin championed the idea at the
Fourteenth Congress of the Russian party that if we are not hindered by
intervention we will build socialism “even if at the speed of a
tortoise.” The question of the uninterrupted struggle between the two
systems, the fact that socialism can be based only on the highest
productive forces; in a word, the Marxian dynamics of the displacement
of one social formation by another on the basis of the growing
productive forces – all this has been completely blotted out.
Revolutionary and historical dialectic has been displaced by a skinflint
reactionary utopia of self-sufficient socialism, built on a low
technology, developing with the “speed of a tortoise” within national
boundaries, connected with the external world only by its fear of
intervention. The refusal to accept this miserable caricature of Marx’s
and Lenin’s doctrine has been declared a “social democratic deviation.”
In the quoted article by Bukharin, this characterization of our views
was, for the first time, generally advanced and “substantiated.” History
will take note that we fell into a “social democratic deviation” because
we refused to accept an inferior rehash of Vollmar’s theory of socialism
in one country.

The proletariat of Czarist Russia could not have taken power in October
if Russia had not been a link – the weakest link, but a link,
nevertheless – in the chain of world economy. The seizure of power by
the proletariat has not at all excluded the Soviet republic from the
system of the international division of labor created by capitalism.

Like the wise owl which comes flying only in the dusk, the theory of
socialism in one country pops up at the moment when our industry, which
exhausts ever greater proportions of the old fixed capital, in
two-thirds of which there is crystallized the dependence of our industry
on world industry, has given indication of its urgent need to renew and
extend its ties with the world market, and at a moment when the problems
of foreign trade have arisen in their full scope before our economic
directors.

At the Eleventh Congress, that is, at the last Congress at which Lenin
had the opportunity to speak to the party, he issued a timely warning
that the party would have to undergo another test: “… a test to which we
shall be put by the Russian and _international market to which we are
subordinated, with which we are connected and from which we cannot
escape_.

Nothing deals the theory of an isolated “complete socialism” such a
death-blow as the simple fact that our foreign trade figures have in
most recent years become the keystone of the figures of our economic
plans. The “tightest spot” in our economy, including our industry, is
our import trade which depends entirely on our export. And inasmuch as
the power of resistance of a chain is always measured by its weakest
link, the dimensions of our economic plans are made to conform to the
dimensions of our imports.

In the journal PLANNED ECONOMY (the theoretical organ of the State
Planning Commission) we read an article devoted to the _system of
planning,_ that “… in drawing up our control figures for the current
year we had to take methodologically our export and import plans as a
starting point for the entire plan; we had to orient ourselves on that
in our plans for the various branches of industry and consequently for
industry in general and particularly for the construction of new
industrial enterprises,” etc., etc. [34]

This methodological approach of the State Planning Commission states
flatly, for all who have ears to hear, that the control figures
determine the direction and tempo of our economic development, but that
these control figures are already controlled by world economy; not
because having become stronger we have broken free from the vicious
circle of isolation.

The capitalist world shows us by its export and import figures that it
has other instruments of persuasion than those of military intervention.
To the extent that productivity of labor and the productivity of a
social system as a whole are measured on the market by the correlation
of prices, it is not so much military intervention as the intervention
of cheaper capitalist commodities that constitutes perhaps the greatest
immediate menace to Soviet economy. This alone shows that it is by no
means merely a question of an isolated economic victory over “one’s own”
bourgeoisie: “The socialist revolution which is impending for the whole
world will by no means consist merely in a victory of the proletariat of
each country over its own bourgeoisie.” [35] Involved here is a rivalry
and a life-and-death struggle between two social systems, one of which
has only just begun building on backward productive forces, while the
other still rests today on productive forces of immeasurably greater
strength.

Anyone who sees “pessimism” in an admission of our dependence on the
world market (Lenin spoke bluntly of our _subordination_ to the world
market) reveals thereby his own provincial petty bourgeois timorousness
in the face of the world market, and the pitiful character of his
homebred optimism which hopes to hide from world economy behind a bush
and to manage somehow with its own resources.

The new theory has made a point of honor of the freakish idea that the
USSR can perish from military intervention but never from its own
economic backwardness. But inasmuch as in a socialist society the
readiness of the toiling masses to defend their country must be much
greater than the readiness of the slaves of capitalism to attack that
country, the question arises: why should military intervention threaten
us with disaster? Because the enemy is infinitely stronger in his
technology. Bukharin concedes the preponderance of the productive forces
only in their military technical aspect. He does not want to understand
that a Ford tractor is just as dangerous as a Creusot gun, with the sole
difference that while the gun can function only from time to time, the
tractor brings its pressure to bear upon us constantly. Besides, the
tractor knows that a gun stands behind it, as a last resort.

We are the first workers’ state, a section of the world proletariat, and
together with the latter we _depend_ upon world capital. The
indifferent, neutral, and bureaucratically castrated word,
“connections,” is put into circulation only with the object of
concealing the extremely onerous and dangerous nature of these
’connections.” If we were producing at the prices of the world market,
our dependence on the latter, without ceasing to be a dependence, would
be of a much less severe character than it is now. But unfortunately
this is not the case. Our monopoly of foreign trade itself is evidence
of the severity and the dangerous character of our dependence. The
decisive importance of the monopoly in our socialist construction is a
result precisely of the existing correlation of forces which is
unfavorable to us. But we must not forget for a moment that the monopoly
of foreign trade only regulates our dependence upon the world market,
but does not eliminate it.

“So long as our Soviet Republic [says Lenin] remains an isolated
borderland surrounded by the entire capitalist world, so long will it be
an absolutely ridiculous fantasy and utopianism to think of our complete
economic independence and of the disappearance of any of our dangers.”
[36]

The chief dangers arise consequently from the objective position of the
USSR as the “isolated borderland” in a capitalist economy which is
hostile to us. These dangers may, however, diminish or increase. This
depends on the action of two factors: our socialist construction on the
one hand, and the development of capitalist economy on the other hand.
In the last analysis, the second factor, that is, the fate of world
economy as a whole, is, of course, of decisive significance.

Can it happen – and in what particular case – that the productivity of
our socialist system will constantly lag behind that of the capitalist
system – which would unfailingly lead in the end to the downfall of the
socialist republic? If we ably manage our economy in this new phase when
it becomes necessary to create independently an industrial basis with
its incomparably higher demands upon the leadership, then our
productivity of labor will grow. Is it, however, inconceivable that the
productivity of labor in the capitalist countries, or more correctly, in
the predominant capitalist countries, will grow faster than in our
country? Without a clear answer to this question, there is no basis
whatever for the vapid assertions that our tempo “ is in itself”
sufficient (let alone the absurd philosophy of the “speed of a
tortoise”). But the very attempt to provide an answer to the question of
the rivalry of two systems leads us to the arena of world economy and
world politics, that is, to the arena of action and decision of the
revolutionary International which includes the Soviet republic, but not
by any means a self-sufficing Soviet republic which from time to time
secures the support of the International.

Speaking of the state economy of the USSR the draft program says that it
“is developing large scale industry at a tempo _surpassing_ the tempo of
development in capitalist countries.” This attempt to juxtapose the two
tempos represents, we must allow, a principled step forward in
comparison to that period when the authors of the program categorically
rejected the very question of the comparative coefficient between our
development and world development. There is no need of “intruding the
international factor,” said Stalin. Let us build socialism “even if at
the speed of a tortoise,” said Bukharin. It was precisely along this
line that the principled controversies occurred over a period of several
years. _Formally_ – we have won along this line. But if we do not merely
insert into the text comparisons between the tempos of economic
development, but penetrate to the root of the matter, it will become
apparent that it is impermissible to speak in another section of the
draft about “a sufficient minimum of industry,” without any relation to
the capitalist world, taking as a starting point only the internal
relations; and that it is equally impermissible not only to pass a
decision on but even to pose the question of whether it is “possible or
impossible” for any given country to build socialism independently. The
question is decided by the dynamics of the struggle between the two
systems, between the two world classes; and in this struggle, regardless
of the high coefficients of growth of our _restoration period_, one
incontestable and basic fact remains, namely, that:

“Capitalism, if taken on an international scale, is even now, not only
in a military but also in an economic sense, stronger than the Soviet
power. _We must proceed front this fundamental consideration and never
forget it._” [37]

The question of the interrelation between the different tempos of
development remains an open question for the future. It depends not only
upon our capacity to really achieve the “_smychka,_” to assure the grain
collections, and to increase our export and import; in other words, not
only upon our internal successes which, of course, are extremely
important factors in this struggle but also upon the fate of world
capitalism, upon its stagnation, upsurge, or collapse, that is to say,
upon the course of world economy and world revolution. Consequently, the
question is decided not within the national framework but on the arena
of world economic and political struggle.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

15. MINUTES, Seventh Plenum of the ECCI, p.14.

16. WORKS:, Vol.XIII, p.133. Aug. 23, 1915.

17. WORKS, Vol.XV, p.64.

18. WORKS, Vol.XV, part 2, p.263.

19. IBID., p.280.

20. WORKS, Vol.XVI, p.398.

21. WORKS, Vol.XIII, pp.212f.

22. WORKS, Vol.XI, part 2, pp.407f.

23. WORKS, Vol.XVIII, part 2, p.140.

24. IBID., p. 185.

25. IBID., p.144.

26. WORKS, Vol.XVIII, part 1, pp.137f.)

27. PRAVDA, Nov. 12, 1926.)

28. Stalin, LENIN AND LENINIST, pp.40f., Russian ed., 1928.)

29. Bukharin, THE CLASS STRUGGLE AND REVOLUTION IN RUSSIA, pp.3f.,
Russian ed., 1917.)

30. N. Bukharin, _The Proletarian Dictatorship in Russia and the World
Revolution_, COMMUNIST INTERNATIONAL, No.5, p.614, 1919.)

31. MINUTES, p.115.)

32. L. Trotsky, _On Social Democratic Criticisms_, FIVE YEARS OF THE
COMINTERN, p.491.

33. BOLSHEVIK, No.19-20, 1926.

34. Jan. 1927, p.27.

35. Lenin, WORKS, Vol.XVI, p.388, 1919.

36. WORKS, Vol.XVII, p.409.

37. Lenin, WORKS, Vol.XVII, p.102.

The Third International After Lenin



I. THE PROGRAM OF THE INTERNATIONAL REVOLUTION OR A PROGRAM OF SOCIALISM IN ONE COUNTRY? (PART 3)


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

8. The Contradiction Between The Productive Forces and the National Boundaries as the Cause of the Reactionary Utopian Theory of “Socialism in One Country”

The basis for the theory of socialism in one country, as we have seen,
sums up to sophistic interpretations of several lines from Lenin on the
one hand, and to a scholastic interpretation of the “law of uneven
development” on the other. By giving a correct interpretation of the
historic law as well as of the quotations in question we arrive at a
directly opposite conclusion, that is, the conclusion that was reached
by Marx, Engels, Lenin, and all of us, including Stalin and Bukharin, up
to 1925.

From the uneven sporadic development of capitalism flows the
non-simultaneous, uneven, and sporadic character of the socialist
revolution; from the extreme tensity of the interdependence of the
various countries upon each other flows not only the political but also
the economic impossibility of building socialism in one country.

Let us examine once again from this angle the text of the program a
little closer. We have already read in the introduction that:

“Imperialism … aggravates to an exceptional degree the contradiction
between the growth of the national productive forces of world economy
and national state barriers.”

We have already stated that this proposition is, or rather was meant to
be, the keystone of the international program. But it is precisely this
proposition which excludes, rejects, and sweeps away _a priori_ the
theory of socialism in one country as a reactionary theory because it is
irreconcilably opposed not only to the fundamental _tendency_ of
development of the productive forces but also to the _material results_
which have already been attained by this development. The productive
forces are incompatible with national boundaries. Hence flow not only
foreign trade, the export of men and capital, the seizure of
territories, the colonial policy, and the last imperialist war, but also
the economic impossibility of a self-sufficient socialist society. The
productive forces of _capitalist_ countries have long since broken
through the national boundaries. Socialist society, however, can be
built only on the most advanced productive forces, on the application of
electricity and chemistry to the processes of production including
agriculture; on combining, generalizing, and bringing to maximum
development the highest elements of modern technology. From Marx on, we
have been constantly repeating that capitalism cannot cope with the
spirit of new technology to which it has given rise and which tears
asunder not only the integument of bourgeois private property rights
but, as the war of 1914 has shown, also the national hoops of the
bourgeois state. Socialism, however, must not only take over from
capitalism the most highly developed productive forces but must
immediately carry them onward, raise them to a higher level and give
them a state of development such as has been unknown under capitalism.
The question arises: how then can socialism drive the productive forces
back into the boundaries of a national state which they have violently
sought to break through under capitalism? Or, perhaps, we ought to
abandon the idea of “unbridled” productive forces for which the national
boundaries, _and consequently also the boundaries of the theory of
socialism in one country_, are too narrow, and limit ourselves, let us
say, to the curbed and domesticated productive forces, that is, to the
technology of economic backwardness? If this is the case, then in many
branches of industry we should stop making progress right now and
decline to a level even lower than our present pitiful technical level
which managed to link up bourgeois Russia with world economy in an
inseparable bond and to bring it into the vortex of the imperialist mar
for an _expansion of its territory for the productive forces_ that had
outgrown the state boundaries.

Having inherited and restored these productive forces the workers’ state
is _compelled_ to import and export.

The trouble is that the draft program injects mechanically into its text
the thesis of the incompatibility of modern capitalist technology with
the national boundaries, and then the argument proceeds as if there were
no question at all of this incompatibility. Essentially the whole draft
is a combination of ready-made revolutionary theses taken from Marx end
Lenin and of opportunist or centrist conclusions which are absolutely
incompatible with these revolutionary theses. That is why it is
necessary _without becoming allured by the isolated revolutionary
formulas contained in the draft to watch closely whither its main
tendencies lead_.

We have already quoted that part of the first chapter which speaks of
the possibility of the victory of socialism “in one isolated capitalist
country.” This idea is still more crudely and sharply formulated in the
fourth chapter, which says that:

“The dictatorship [?] of the world proletariat … can be realized only as
a result of the victory of socialism [?] in individual countries when
the newly formed proletarian republics will establish a federation with
those already in existence.”

If we are to interpret the words “victory of socialism” merely as
another expression for the dictatorship of the proletariat, then we will
arrive at a general statement which is irrefutable for all and which
should be formulated less equivocally. But this is not what the authors
of the draft have in mind. By a victory of socialism, they do not mean
simply the capture of power and the nationalization of the means of
production but the building of a socialist society in one country. If we
were to accept this interpretation then we would obtain not a world
socialist economy based on an international division of labor but a
federation of self-sufficing socialist communes in the spirit of
blissful anarchism, the only difference being that these communes would
be enlarged to the size of the present national states.

In its uneasy urge to cover up eclectically the new formulation by means
of old and customary formulas, the draft program resorts to the
following thesis:

“Only after the complete world victory of the proletariat and the
consolidation of its world power will there ensue a prolonged epoch of
intense construction of world socialist economy.” (Ch.4)

Used as a theoretical shield, this postulate in reality only serves to
expose the basic contradiction. If we are to interpret the thesis to
mean that the epoch of genuine socialist construction can begin only
after the victory of the proletariat, at least in several advanced
countries, then it is simply a rejection of the theory of building
socialism in one country, and a return to the position of Marx and
Lenin. But if we are to take our point of departure from the new theory
of Stalin and Bukharin which is lodged in the various sections of the
draft program, then we obtain the following perspective: up to the
complete world victory of the world proletariat a number of individual
countries build complete socialism in their respective countries, and
subsequently out of these socialist countries there will be built a
world socialist economy, after the manner in which children erect
structures with ready-made blocks. As a matter of fact, world socialist
economy will not at all be a sum total of national socialist economies.
It can take shape in its fundamental aspects only on the soil of the
worldwide division of labor which has been created by the entire
preceding development of capitalism. In its essentials, it will be
constituted and built not after the building of “complete socialism” in
a number of individual countries, but in the storms and tempests of the
world proletarian revolution which will require a number of decades. The
economic successes of the first countries of the proletarian
dictatorship will be measured not by the degree of their approximation
to a self-sufficing “complete socialism” but by the political stability
of the dictatorship itself and by the successes achieved in preparing
the elements of the future world socialist economy.

This revisionist idea is still more definitely and therefore still more
grossly expressed, if that is possible, in the fifth chapter where,
hiding behind one and a half lines of Lenin’s posthumous article they
have distorted, the authors of the draft declare that the USSR

“… possesses the necessary and sufficient _material_ prerequisites
within the country not only for the overthrow of the feudal landlords
and the bourgeoisie but also for the complete construction of
socialism.”

Thanks to what circumstances have we obtained such extraordinary
historical advantages? On this point we find a reply in the second
chapter of the draft:

“The imperialist front was broken at its weakest link, Czarist Russia.”

This is Lenin’s splendid formula. Its meaning is that Russia was the
most backward and economically weakest of all the imperialist states.
That is precisely why her ruling classes were the first to collapse as
they had loaded an unbearable burden on the _insufficient_ productive
forces of the country. Uneven, sporadic development thus compelled the
proletariat of the most backward imperialist country to be the first to
seize power. Formerly we were taught that it is precisely for this
reason that the working class of the “weakest link” will encounter the
greatest difficulties in its progress towards socialism as compared with
the proletariat of the advanced countries, who will find it more
difficult to seize power but who, having seized power long before we
have overcome our backwardness, will not only surpass us but will carry
us along so as to bring us towards the point of real socialist
construction on the basis of the highest world technology and
international division of labor. This was our idea when we ventured upon
the October Revolution. The party has formulated this idea tens, nay,
hundreds and thousands of times in the press and at meetings, but since
1925 attempts have been made to substitute just the opposite idea. Now
we learn that the fact that the former Czarist Russia was “the weakest
link” gives the proletariat of the USSR, the inheritor of Czarist Russia
with all its weaknesses, an inestimable advantage, to wit, of possessing
no more and no less than its own national prerequisites for the
“complete construction of socialism.”

Unfortunate Britain does not possess this advantage because of the
_excessive_ development of her productive forces which require almost
the whole world to furnish the necessary raw materials and to dispose of
her products. Were the productive forces of Great Britain more
“moderate” and had they maintained a relative equilibrium between
industry and agriculture, then the British proletariat would apparently
be able to build complete socialism on its own “isolated” island,
protected from foreign intervention by its navy.

The draft program, in its fourth chapter, divides the capitalist states
into three groups:

-   “Countries of highly developed capitalism (United States, Germany,
    Great Britain, etc.)”;
-   “Countries of a middle level of capitalist development (Russia prior
    to 1917, Poland, etc.)”;
-   “Colonial and semi-colonial countries (China, India, etc.).”

Despite the fact that “Russia prior to 1917” was far closer to
present-day China than to present-day United States, one might refrain
from any serious objections to this schematic division were it not for
the fact that, in relation to other parts of the draft, it serves as a
source of false conclusions. Inasmuch as the countries “of middle level”
are declared in the draft to possess “sufficient industrial minimums”
for independent socialist construction, this is all the more true of
countries of high capitalist development. It is _only_ the colonial and
semi-colonial countries that need outside assistance. As we shall see
later, that is precisely how they are characterized in another chapter
of the draft program.

If, however, we approach the problems of socialist construction only
with this criterion, abstracting from other conditions, such as the
natural resources of the country, the correlation between industry and
agriculture within it, its place in the world economic system, then we
will fall into new, no less gross errors and contradictions. We have
just spoken about Great Britain. Being no doubt a highly developed
capitalist country, it has _precisely because of that_ no chance for
successful socialist construction within the limits of its own island.
Great Britain, if blockaded, would simply be strangled in the course of
a few months.

To be sure, all other conditions being equal, the more highly developed
productive forces are of enormous advantage for the purposes of
socialist construction. They endow economic life with an exceptional
flexibility even when the latter is hemmed in by a blockading ring, as
was evidenced by bourgeois Germany during the war. But the building of
socialism on a national basis would imply for these advanced countries a
general decline, a wholesale cutting down of productive forces, that is
to say, something directly opposed to the tasks of socialism.

The draft program forgets the fundamental thesis of the incompatibility
between the present productive forces and the national boundaries, from
which it follows that highly developed productive forces are by no means
a lesser obstacle to the construction of socialism in one country than
low productive forces, although for the reverse reason, namely, that
while the latter are insufficient to serve as the basis, it is the basis
which will prove inadequate for the former. The law of uneven
development is forgotten precisely at the point where it is most needed
and most important.

The problem of building socialism is not settled merely by the
industrial “maturity” or “immaturity” of a country. This immaturity is
itself _uneven_. In the USSR, some branches of industry are extremely
inadequate to satisfy the most elementary domestic requirements
(particularly machine construction), other branches on the contrary
cannot develop under present conditions without extensive and increasing
exports. Among the latter are such branches of major importance as
timber, oil, and manganese, let alone agriculture. On the other hand,
even the “inadequate” branches cannot seriously develop if the
“super-abundant” (relatively) are unable to export. The impossibility of
building an isolated socialist society, not in a Utopia or an Atlantis
but in the concrete geographical and historical conditions of our
terrestrial economy, is determined for various countries in different
ways—by the insufficient development of some branches as well as by the
“excessive” development of others. On the whole, this means that the
modern productive forces are incompatible with national boundaries.

“What was the imperialist war? It was the revolt of the productive
forces not only against the bourgeois forms of property, but also
against the boundaries of capitalist states. The imperialist war
expressed the fact that the productive forces are unbearably constrained
within the confines of national states. We have always maintained that
capitalism is incapable of controlling the productive forces it itself
develops and that only socialism is capable of incorporating the
productive forces which have outgrown the boundaries of capitalist
states within a higher economic entity. All roads that lead back to the
isolated state have been blocked …” [38]

Endeavoring to prove the theory of socialism in one country the draft
program commits a double, triple, and quadruple mistake: it exaggerates
the productive forces in the USSR; it shuts its eyes to the law of
uneven development of the various branches of industry; it ignores the
international division of labor, and, finally, it forgets the most
important contradiction inherent in the imperialist epoch, the
contradiction between the productive forces and the national barriers.

In order not to leave a single argument unanalyzed, there remains for us
to recall another and, moreover, a generalized proposition of Bukharin’s
in defense of the new theory.

On a world scale, says Bukharin, the correlation between the proletariat
and the peasantry is not any more favorable than that existing in the
USSR. Consequently, if due to reasons of backwardness it is impossible
to build socialism in the USSR, then it would be equally impossible of
realization on the scale of world economy.

This argument deserves being included in all the textbooks on the
dialectic, as a classic example of scholastic thinking.

In the first place, it is quite probable that the correlation of forces
between the proletariat and the peasantry on the world scale is not very
much different from the correlation within the USSR. But the world
revolution is not at all accomplished in accordance with the method of
the arithmetical mean, and, incidentally, neither is the national
revolution. Thus the October Revolution occurred and intrenched itself
first of all in the proletarian Petrograd, instead of choosing such a
region where the correlation between the workers and peasants would
correspond to the average for the whole of Russia. After Petrograd and
later Moscow had created the revolutionary government and the
revolutionary army, they had to overthrow the bourgeoisie in the
outlying country, in the course of several years; and only as a result
of this process, called revolution, was there established within the
boundaries of the USSR the present correlation between the proletariat
and the peasantry. The revolution does not occur in accordance with the
method of the arithmetical mean. It can begin in a less favorable
sector, but until it intrenches itself in the decisive sectors of both
the national and the world frontiers, it is impermissible to speak about
its complete victory.

Secondly, the correlation between the proletariat and the peasantry,
given an “average” level of technology, is not the only factor for the
solution of the problem. There exists in addition the class war between
the proletariat and the bourgeoisie. The USSR is surrounded not by a
workers’ and peasants’ world but by a capitalist world. If the
bourgeoisie were overthrown throughout the entire world, then this fact,
by itself, would still change neither the correlation between the
proletariat and the peasantry, nor the average level of technology
within the USSR and in the entire world. But, nevertheless, the
socialist construction in the USSR would immediately acquire entirely
different possibilities and different proportions, which are absolutely
incomparable with the present possibilities and proportions.

Thirdly, if the productive forces of every advanced country have to some
degree outgrown national boundaries, then according to Bukharin, it
should hence follow that the productive forces of all countries taken
together have outgrown the limits of our planet, and that consequently
socialism must be built not otherwise than on the scale of the solar
system.

We repeat that the Bukharinistic argument from the average proportion of
workers and peasants must be included in all political primers,
naturally not as it is now included in order to defend the theory of
socialism in one country, but as proof of the utter incompatibility
between scholastic casuistry and Marxist dialectics.

 

9. The Question Can Be Solved Only on the Arena of World Revolution

The new doctrine proclaims that socialism can be built on the basis of a
national state _if only there is no intervention_. From this there can
and must follow (notwithstanding all pompous declarations in the draft
program) a collaborationist policy towards the foreign bourgeoisie with
the object of averting intervention, as this will guarantee the
construction of socialism, that is to say, will solve the main
historical question. The task of the parties in the Comintern assumes,
therefore, an auxiliary character; their mission is to protect the USSR
from intervention and not to fight for the conquest of power. It is, of
course, not a question of the subjective intentions but of the objective
logic of political thought.

“The difference in views lies in the fact,” says Stalin, “that the party
considers that these [internal] contradictions and possible _conflicts
can be entirely overcome_ on the basis of the inner forces of our
revolution, whereas comrade Trotsky and the Opposition think that these
contradictions and conflicts can be overcome ‘only on an international
scale, on the arena of the world-wide proletarian revolution’.” [39]

Yes, this is precisely the difference. One could not express better and
more correctly the difference between national reformism and
revolutionary internationalism. If our internal difficulties, obstacles,
and contradictions, which are fundamentally a reflection of world
contradictions, can be settled merely by “the inner forces of our
revolution” without entering “the arena of the world-wide proletarian
revolution” then the International is partly a subsidiary and partly a
decorative institution, the Congress of which can be convoked once every
four years, once every ten years, or perhaps not at all. Even if we were
to add that the proletariat of the other countries must protect our
construction from military interventions, the International according to
this schema must play the role of a pacifist instrument. Its main role,
the role of an instrument of world revolution, is then inevitably
relegated to the background. And this, we repeat, does not flow from
anyone’s deliberate intentions (on the contrary, a number of points in
the program testify to the very best intentions of its authors), but it
does flow from the internal logic of the new theoretical position which
is a thousand times more dangerous than the worst subjective intentions.

As a matter of fact, even at the Seventh Plenum of the ECCI, Stalin
became so bold as to develop and defend the following idea:

“Our party has no right to fool [!] the working class; it should declare
openly that the lack of assurance [!] in the possibility of building
socialism in our country leads to the abdication of power and to the
passing of our party from its position as a ruling party to the position
of an opposition party.” [40]

This means that we have only the right to place assurance on the scanty
resources of national economy but that we must not dare to place any
assurance upon the inexhaustible resources of the international
proletariat. If we cannot get along without an international revolution,
then give up the power, give up that October power which we conquered in
the interests of the international revolution. Here is the sort of
ideological debacle we arrive at if we proceed from a formulation which
is false to the core!

The draft program expresses an incontrovertible idea when it says that
the economic successes of the USSR constitute an inseparable part of the
world-wide proletarian revolution. But the political danger of the new
theory lies in the false comparative evaluation of the two levers of
world socialism—the lever of our economic achievements and the lever of
the world-wide proletarian revolution. Without a victorious proletarian
revolution, we will not be able to build socialism. The European workers
and the workers the world over must clearly understand this. The lever
of economic construction is of tremendous significance. Without a
correct leadership, the dictatorship of the proletariat would be
weakened; and its downfall would deal a blow to the international
revolution from which the latter would not recover for a good many
years. But the conclusion of the main historical struggle between the
socialist world and the world of capitalism depends on the second lever,
that is, the world proletarian revolution. The colossal importance of
the Soviet Union lies in that it is the disputed base of the world
revolution and not at all in the presumption that it is able to build
socialism independently of the world revolution.

In a tone of supreme superiority, entirely unfounded, Bukharin has asked
us more than once:

“If there already exist pre-conditions, and starting points, and a
sufficient base, and even certain successes in the work of building
socialism, then where is the limit beyond which everything ‘turns
topsy-turvy’? There is no such limit.” [41]

This is bad geometry but not historical dialectics. There can be such a
“limit.” There can be several such limits, internal as well as
international, political as well as economic, as well as military. The
most important and dire “limit” could turn out to be a serious and
prolonged stabilization of world capitalism and a new boom.
Consequently, the question shifts politically and economically over to
the world arena. Will the bourgeoisie be able to secure for itself a new
epoch of capitalist growth and power? Merely to deny such a possibility,
counting on the “hopeless position” in which capitalism finds itself
would be mere revolutionary verbiage. “There are no absolutely hopeless
situations” (Lenin). The present unstable class equilibrium in the
European countries cannot continue indefinitely precisely because of its
instability.

When Stalin and Bukharin maintain that the USSR can get along without
the “state” aid of the proletariat of the other countries, that is,
without its victory over the bourgeoisie, because the present active
sympathy of the working masses protects us from intervention, they
betray the same blindness as is revealed in the entire ramification of
their principled mistake.

It is absolutely incontestable that after the social democracy had
sabotaged the post-war insurrections of the European proletariat against
the bourgeoisie, the active sympathy of the working masses saved the
Soviet republic. During these years, the European bourgeoisie proved
unable to wage war against the workers’ state on a large scale. But to
think that this correlation of forces will continue for many years, say,
until socialism is built in the USSR, is to be so utterly shortsighted
as to judge the entire curve of development by one of its tiny segments.
A situation so unstable that the proletariat cannot take power while the
bourgeoisie does not feel firmly enough the master of its own home, must
sooner or later be abruptly resolved in one way or another, either in
favor of the proletarian dictatorship or in favor of a serious and
prolonged capitalist stabilization on the backs of the popular masses,
on the bones of the colonial peoples and perhaps on our own bones.
“There are no absolutely hopeless situations!” The European bourgeoisie
can find a lasting way out its grave contradictions only through the
defeats of the proletariat and the mistakes of the revolutionary
leadership. But the converse is equally true. There will be no new boom
of world capitalism (of course, with the prospect of a new epoch of
great upheavals) only in the event that the proletariat will be able to
find a way out of the present unstable equilibrium on the revolutionary
road.

“It is necessary to ‘prove’ now by the practical work of the
revolutionary parties,” said Lenin on July 19, 1920 at the Second World
Congress, “that they are sufficiently conscious and organized, and that
they have sufficient contact with the exploited masses, and
determination and ability to utilize the crisis for a successful and
victorious revolution.” [42]

Our internal contradictions, however, which depend directly on the trend
of the European and world struggle, may be rationally regulated and
abated by a correct internal policy based on Marxian foresight. But they
can be finally overcome only when the class contradictions will be
overcome, which is out of the question without a victorious revolution
in Europe. Stalin is right. The difference lies precisely on this point
and this is the fundamental difference between national reformism and
revolutionary internationalism.

10. The Theory of Socialism in One Country as a Series of Social Patriotic Blunders

The theory of socialism in one country inexorably leads to an
underestimation of the difficulties which must be overcome and to an
exaggeration of the achievements gained. One could not find a more
anti-socialist and anti-revolutionary assertion than Stalin’s statement
to the effect that “socialism has already been 90 percent realized in
the USSR” This statement seems to be especially meant for a smug
bureaucrat. In this way one can hopelessly discredit the idea of a
socialist society in the eyes of the toiling masses. The Soviet
proletariat has achieved grandiose successes, if we take into
consideration the conditions under which they have been attained and the
low cultural level inherited from the past. But these achievements
constitute an extremely small magnitude on the scales of the socialist
ideal. Harsh truth and not sugary falsehood is needed to fortify the
worker, the agricultural laborer, and the poor peasant, who see that in
the eleventh year of the revolution, poverty, misery, unemployment,
bread lines, illiteracy, homeless children, drunkenness, and
prostitution have not abated around them. Instead of telling them fibs
about having realized 90% socialism, we must say to them that our
economic level, our social and cultural conditions, approximate today
much closer to capitalism, and a backward and uncultured capitalism at
that, than to socialism. We must tell them that we will enter on the
path of real socialist construction only when the proletariat of the
most advanced countries will have captured power; that it is necessary
to work unremittingly for this, using both levers—the short lever of our
internal economic efforts and the long lever of the international
proletarian struggle.

In short, instead of the Stalinist phrases about socialism which has
already been 90% accomplished, we must speak to them the words of Lenin:

“Russia (the land of poverty) will become such a land (the land of
plenty) if we cast away all pessimism and phrasemongering; if clenching
our teeth, we gather all our might, strain every nerve and muscle, if we
understand that salvation is possible _only_ along the road of
international socialist revolution that we have entered.” [43]

From prominent leaders of the Comintern we have had to hear such an
argument as: the theory of socialism in one country, of course, is
unfounded, but it provides the Russian workers with a perspective in the
difficult conditions under which. they labor and thus gives them
courage. It is difficult to plumb the depths of the theoretical debacle
of those who seek in a program not for a scientific basis for their
class orientation but for moral consolation. Consoling theories which
contradict facts pertain to the sphere of religion and not science; and
religion is opium for the people.

Our party has passed through its heroic period with a program which was
entirely oriented on the international revolution and not on socialism
in one country. Under a programmatic banner on which was inscribed that
backward Russia alone, with her own forces, will not build socialism,
the YCL has passed through the most strenuous years of civil war,
hunger, cold, hard Saturday-ings and Sunday-ings, epidemics, studies on
hunger rations, and the numberless sacrifices which were paid for every
forward step taken. The members of the party and the YCL fought at the
front or lugged logs to the railroad stations, not because they hoped to
build national socialism out of those logs, but because they served in
the cause of international revolution which made it essential that the
Soviet fortress hold out—and every additional log is important for the
Soviet fortress. That is how we used to approach the question. Times
have changed, things have altered (yet, not so very radically), but the
principled approach retains its full force even now. The worker, the
poor peasant and partisan, and the young communist, have previously
shown by their entire conduct up to 1925, when the new gospel was for
the first time proclaimed, that they have no need of it. But in need of
it is the functionary who looks down on the masses from above; the petty
administrator who does not want to be disturbed; the apparatus retainer
who seeks to dominate under cover of an all-saving and consoling
formula. It is they who think that the ignorant people need the “good
tidings,” and that there is no dealing with the people without consoling
doctrines. It is they who catch up the false words about “90%
socialism,” for this formula sanctions their privileged position, their
right to dominate and command, their need to be rid of criticisms on the
part of “skeptics” and men of “little faith.”

Complaints and accusations to the effect that the denial of the
possibility of building socialism in one country dampens the spirit and
kills enthusiasm are theoretically and psychologically closely related
to those accusations which the reformists have always hurled at the
revolutionists, notwithstanding the entirely different conditions under
which they originate. Said the reformists: “You are telling the workers
that they cannot really improve their lot within the framework of
capitalist society; and by this alone you kill their incentive to
fight.” It was, indeed, only under the leadership of revolutionists that
the workers really fought for economic gains and for parliamentary
reforms.

The worker who understands that it is impossible to build a socialist
paradise, like an oasis in the hell of world capitalism; that the fate
of the Soviet Republic and therefore his own fate depend entirely on the
international revolution, will fulfill his duties toward the USSR much
more energetically than the worker who is told that what we already
possess is presumably 90% socialism. “If so, is it worth while to strive
toward socialism?” Here, too, the reformist orientation works as always
not only against revolution but also against reform.

In the article written in 1915 dealing with the slogan of the United
States of Europe, which has already been quoted, we wrote:

“To approach the prospects of a social revolution within national
boundaries is to fall victim to the same national narrowness which
constitutes the substance of social-patriotism. Vaillant to his dying
day considered France the promised land of social revolution; and it is
precisely from this standpoint that he stood for national defense to the
end. Lensch and Co. (some hypocritically and others sincerely) consider
that Germany’s defeat means first of all the destruction of the basis of
social revolution … In general it should not be forgotten that in
social-patriotism there is, along-side of the most vulgar reformism, a
national revolutionary Messianism which deems that its own national
state, whether because of its industrial level or because of its
‘democratic’ form and revolutionary conquests, is called upon to lead
humanity towards socialism or towards ‘democracy.’ If the victorious
revolution mere really conceivable within the boundaries of a single
more developed nation, this Messianism together with the program of
national defense would have some relative historical justification. But
as a matter of fact this is inconceivable. To fight for the preservation
of a national basis of revolution by such methods as undermine the
international ties of the proletariat, actually means to undermine the
revolution itself, which can begin on a national basis but which cannot
be completed on that basis under the present economic, military, and
political interdependence of the European states, which was never before
revealed so forcefully as during the present war. This interdependence
which will directly and immediately condition the concerted action on
the part of the European proletariat in the revolution is expressed by
the slogan of the United States of Europe.” [44]

Proceeding from a false interpretation of the polemics of 1915, Stalin
has many times endeavored to show that under “national narrowness” I was
here alluding to Lenin. No greater absurdity could be imagined. In my
polemic with Lenin I always argued openly because I was guided only by
ideological considerations. In the given case Lenin was not involved at
all. The article mentions by name the people against whom these
accusations were hurled—Vaillant, Lensch, and others. One must recall
that the year 1915 was a year of social-patriotic orgy and the crushing
of our struggle against it. This was our touchstone for every question.

The fundamental question raised in the foregoing passage was undoubtedly
formulated correctly: _the conception of the building of socialism in
one country is a social-patriotic conception._

The patriotism of the German social democrats began as a legitimate
patriotism to their own party, the most powerful party of the Second
International. On the basis of the highly developed German technology
and the superior organizational qualities of the German people, the
German social democracy prepared to build its “own” socialist society.
If we leave aside the hardened bureaucrats, careerists, parliamentary
sharpers, and political crooks in general, the social-patriotism of the
rank and file social democrat was derived precisely from the belief in
building German socialism. It is impossible to think that hundreds of
thousands of rank and file social democrats (let alone the millions of
rank and file workers) wanted to defend the Hohenzollerns or the
bourgeoisie. No. They wanted to protect German industry, the German
railways and highways, German technology and culture, and especially the
organizations of the German working class, as the “necessary and
sufficient” national prerequisites for socialism.

A similar process also took place in France. Guesde, Vaillant, and
thousands of the best rank and file party members with them, and
hundreds of thousands of ordinary workers believed that precisely France
with her revolutionary traditions, her heroic proletariat, her highly
cultured, flexible, and talented people, was the promised land of
socialism. Old Guesde and the Communard Vaillant, and with them hundreds
of thousands of sincere workers, did not fight to protect the bankers or
the rentiers. They sincerely believed that they were defending the soil
and the creative power of the future socialist society. They proceeded
entirely from the theory of socialism in one country and in the name of
this idea they sacrificed international solidarity, believing this
sacrifice to be “temporary.”

This comparison with the social-patriots will, of course, be answered by
the argument that patriotism to the Soviet state is a revolutionary duty
whereas patriotism to a bourgeois state is treachery. Very true. Can
there be any dispute on this question among grown-up revolutionists?
But, as we proceed, this incontrovertible postulate is turned more and
more into a scholastic screen for a deliberate falsehood.

Revolutionary patriotism can only have a class character. It begins as
patriotism to the party organization, to the trade union, and rises to
state patriotism when the proletariat seizes power. Whenever the power
is in the hands of the workers, patriotism is a revolutionary duty. But
this patriotism must be, an inseparable part of revolutionary
internationalism. Marxism has always taught the workers that even their
struggle for higher wages and shorter hours cannot be successful unless
waged as an international struggle. And now it suddenly appears that the
ideal of the socialist society may be achieved with the national forces
alone. This is a mortal blow to the International.

The invincible conviction that the fundamental class aim, even more so
than the partial objectives, cannot be realized by national means or
within national boundaries, constitutes the very heart of revolutionary
internationalism. If, however, the ultimate aim is realizable within
national boundaries through the efforts of a national proletariat, then
the backbone of internationalism has been broken. The theory of the
possibility of realizing socialism in one country destroys the inner
connection between the patriotism of the victorious proletariat and the
defeatism of the proletariat of the bourgeois countries. The proletariat
of the advanced capitalist countries is still traveling on the road to
power. How and in what manner it marches towards it depends entirely
upon whether it considers the task of building the socialist society a
national or an international task.

If it is at all possible to realize socialism in one country, then one
can believe in that theory not only _after_ but also _before_ the
conquest of power. If socialism can be realized within the national
boundaries of backward Russia, then there is all the more reason to
believe that it can be realized in advanced Germany. Tomorrow the
leaders of the Communist Party of Germany will undertake to propound
this theory. The draft program empowers them to do so. The day after
tomorrow the French party will have its turn. It will be the beginning
of the disintegration of the Comintern along the lines of
social-patriotism. The communist party of any capitalist country, which
will have become imbued with the idea that its particular country
possesses the “necessary and sufficient” prerequisites for the
independent construction of a “complete socialist society,” will not
differ in any substantial manner from the revolutionary social democracy
which also did not begin with a Noske but which stumbled decisively on
August 4, 1914, over this very same question.

When the statement is made that the very existence of the USSR is a
guarantee against social-patriotism because in relation to a workers’
republic patriotism is a revolutionary duty, then in this one-sided
application of a correct idea there is expressed national
narrow-mindedness, Those who say so have in mind only the USSR, closing
their eyes to the entire world proletariat. It is possible to lead the
proletariat to the position of defeatism in relation to the bourgeois
state only by means of an international orientation in the program on
this central question and by means of a ruthless rejection of the
social-patriotic contraband which is masked as yet but which seeks to
build a theoretical nest for itself in the program of Lenin’s
International.

It is not yet too late to return to the path of Marx and Lenin. It is
this return that opens up the only conceivable road to progress. We
address this criticism of the draft program to the Sixth Congress of the
Comintern, in order to make possible the realization of this turn in
which salvation lies.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

38. MINUTES, Seventh Plenum of the ECCI, Trotsky’s speech, p.100.

39. PRAVDA, No.262, Nov. 12, 1926.

40. WORKS, Vol.II, p.10.

41. MINUTES, Seventh Plenum of the ECCI, p.116.

42. WORKS, Vol.XVII, p.264.

43. WORKS, Vol.XV, p.165.

44. WORKS, Vol.III, part 1, pp.90f.

The Third International After Lenin



II. STRATEGY AND TACTICS IN THE IMPERIALIST EPOCH (PART 1)


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

 1. The Complete Bankruptcy of the Central Chapter of the Draft Program

THE DRAFT PROGRAM Of the Comintern contains a chapter devoted to the
questions of revolutionary _strategy._ It must be acknowledged that its
intention is quite correct and corresponds to the aim and spirit of an
international program of the proletariat in the imperialist epoch.

The conception of revolutionary strategy took root only in the post-war
years, and in the beginning undoubtedly under the influence of military
terminology. But it did not by any means take root accidentally. Prior
to the war we spoke only of the tactics of the proletarian party; this
conception conformed adequately enough to the then prevailing trade
union, parliamentary methods which did not transcend the limits of the
day-to-day demands and tasks. By the conception of tactics is understood
the system of measures that serves a single current task or a single
branch of the class struggle. Revolutionary strategy on the contrary
embraces a combined system of actions which by their association,
consistency, and growth must lead the proletariat to the conquest of
power.

The basic principles of revolutionary strategy were naturally formulated
since the time when Marxism first put before the revolutionary parties
of the proletariat the task of the conquest of power on the basis of the
class struggle. The First International, however, succeeded in
formulating these principles, properly speaking, only theoretically, and
could test them only partially in the experience of various countries.
The epoch of the Second International led to methods and views according
to which, in the notorious expression of Bernstein, “the movement is
everything, the ultimate goal nothing.” In other words, the strategical
task disappeared, becoming dissolved in the day-to-day “movement” with
its partial tactics devoted to the problems of the day. Only the Third
International re-established the rights of the revolutionary strategy of
communism and completely subordinated the tactical methods to it. Thanks
to the invaluable experience of the first two Internationals, upon whose
shoulders the Third rests, thanks to the revolutionary character of the
present epoch and the colossal historic experience of the October
Revolution, the strategy of the Third International immediately attained
a full-blooded militancy and the widest historical scope. At the same
time, the first decade of the new International reveals to us a panorama
not only of great battles but also of the greatest defeats of the
proletariat, beginning with 1918. That is why the questions of strategy
and tactics should have constituted, in a certain sense, the central
point in the program of the Comintern. As a matter of fact, however, the
chapter in the draft program devoted to the strategy and tactics of the
Comintern, bearing the sub-title _The Road to the Dictatorship of the
Proletariat_, is one of the weakest chapters, almost devoid of meaning.
The section of this chapter that deals with the East really consists
only of a generalization of the mistakes made and the preparation of new
ones.

The introductory section of this chapter is devoted to a criticism of
anarchism, revolutionary syndicalism, constructive socialism, Guild
socialism, etc. Here we have a purely literary imitation of the
COMMUNIST MANIFESTO which in its time inaugurated the era of the
scientifically established policy of the proletariat through an
ingeniously terse characterization of the most important varieties of
Utopian socialism. But to engage now, on the tenth anniversary of the
Comintern, in a desultory and anemic criticism of the “theories” of
Cornelissen, Arturo Labriola, Bernard Shaw, or lesser known Guild
socialists, means that instead of answering political needs one becomes
a victim of purely literary pedantry. This ballast could easily be
transferred from the program to the field of propaganda literature.

So far as the strategical problems are concerned, in the proper sense of
the word, the draft program limits itself to such ABC wisdom as:

“The extension of its influence over the majority of its own class …

“The extension of its influence over the broad section of the toiling
masses in general …

“The day-to-day work of conquering the trade unions is of an especially
high importance …

“The winning of the broadest section of the poorest peasantry is also
[?] of enormous importance …”

All these commonplaces, indisputable enough in themselves, are merely
set down in rotation here, that is to say, they are brought in without
any connection with the character of the historical epoch and,
therefore, in their _present_ abstract, scholastic form, could be
introduced without difficulty into a resolution of the Second
International. Quite dryly and sketchily the central problem of the
program is considered here in a single schematic passage which is much
shorter than the passage dealing with “constructive” and “Guild”
socialism. This means that the strategy of the revolutionary overturn,
the conditions and the roads to the armed insurrection itself, and the
seizure of power – all this is presented abstractly and pedantically,
and without the slightest regard to the living experience of our epoch.

We find here mention made of the great struggles of the proletariat in
Finland, Germany, Austria, the Hungarian Soviet Republic, the September
days in Italy, the events of 1923 in Germany, the general strike in
England, and so forth, only in the form of a bald, chronological
enumeration. Yet even this is to be found not in the sixth chapter,
which deals with the strategy of the proletariat, but in the second on
_The General Crisis of Capitalism and the First Phase of Development of
the World Revolution_. In other words, the great struggles of the
proletariat are approached here only as objective occurrences, as an
expression of the “general crisis of capitalism” but not as strategical
experiences of the proletariat. It is sufficient to refer to the fact
that the rejection, necessary in itself, of revolutionary adventurism
(putschism) is made in the program without any attempt to answer the
question whether, for example, the uprising in Esthonia, or the bombing
of the Sofia cathedral in 1924, or the last uprising in Canton were
heroic manifestations of revolutionary adventurism or, on the contrary,
planned actions of the revolutionary strategy of the proletariat. A
draft program which in dealing with the problem of “putchism” gives no
answer to this burning question is only a diplomatic office job and not
a document of communist strategy.

Obviously, this abstract, supra-historical formulation of the questions
of the revolutionary struggle of the proletariat is no accident for this
draft. In addition to the Bukharinistic manner of treating questions in
general in a literary, pedantic, didactic, and not in an actively
revolutionary way, there is another reason for it: the authors of the
draft program, for reasons easily understood, prefer generally not to
deal too closely with the strategical lessons of the last five years.

But a program of revolutionary action naturally cannot he approached as
a bare collection of abstract propositions without any relation to all
that has occurred during these epoch-making years. A program cannot, of
course, go into a description of the events of the past, but it must
proceed from these events, base itself upon them, encompass them, and
relate to them. A program, by tile position it takes, must make it
possible to understand all the major facts of the struggle of the
proletariat and all the important facto relating to the ideological
struggle inside the Comintern. If this is true with regard to the
program as a whole, then it is all the truer with regard to that part of
it which is specifically devoted to the question of strategy and
tactics. Here, in the words of Lenin, in addition to what has been
_conquered_ there must also be registered that which has been lost, that
which can be transformed into a “conquest,” if it has been understood
and assimilated. The proletarian vanguard needs not a catalog of truisms
but a manual of action. We will, therefore, consider here the problems
of the “strategic” chapter in closest connection with the experiences of
the struggles of the post-war period, especially of the last five years,
the years of tragic mistakes of the leadership.

 

2. The Fundamental Peculiarities Inherent in the Strategy of the Revolutionary Epoch and the Role of the Party

The chapter devoted to strategy and tactics does not so much as give a
“strategical” characterization, coherent to any degree, of the
imperialist epoch as an epoch of proletarian revolutions ia
contradistinction to the pre-war epoch.

To be sure, the period of industrial capitalism as a whole is
characterized in the first chapter of the draft program as a “period of
relatively continuous evolution and propagation of capitalism over the
whole terrestrial globe through the division of still unoccupied
colonies and the armed seizure of them.”

This characterization is certainly quite contradictory and it obviously
idealizes the whole epoch of industrial capitalism, which was an epoch
of colossal convulsions, of wars and revolutions by far surpassing in
this sphere the entire preceding history of mankind. This idyllic
characterization was apparently necessary so as to provide at least a
partial justification for the recent absurd contention of the authors of
the draft program that at the time of Marx and Engels “there could not
be any talk as yet” of the law of unequal development. But while it is
false to characterize the entire history of industrial capitalism as a
“continuous evolution,” it is extremely important to demarcate a special
European epoch which comprises the years 1871 to 1914, or at least to
1905. This was an epoch of the organic accumulation of contradictions
which, so far as the internal class relations of Europe are concerned,
almost never overstepped the bounds of legal struggle and so far as
international relations are concerned, adjusted themselves to the
framework of an armed peace. This was the epoch of the origin, the
development, and the ossification of the Second International, whose
progressive historical role completely terminated with the outbreak of
the imperialist war.

Politics, considered as a mass historical force, always lags behind
economics. Thus, while the reign of finance capital and trust monopolies
already began towards the end of the nineteenth century, the new epoch
in international politics which reflects this fact, first begins in
world politics with the imperialist war, with the October Revolution,
and the founding of the Third International.

The explosive character of this new epoch, with its abrupt changes of
the political flows and ebbs, with its constant spasmodic class struggle
between Fascism and communism, is lodged in the fact that the
international capitalist system has already spent itself and is no
longer capable of progress as a whole. This does not mean to imply that
individual branches of industry and individual countries are incapable
of growing and will not grow any more, and even at an unprecedented
tempo. Nevertheless, this development proceeds and will have to proceed
to the detriment of the growth of other branches of industry and of
other countries. The expenditures incurred by the productive system of
world capitalism devour its world income to an ever increasing degree.
And inasmuch as Europe, accustomed to world domination, with the inertia
acquired from its rapid, almost uninterrupted growth in the pre-war
period, now collides more sharply than the other continents with the new
relation of forces, the new division of the world market, and the
contradictions deepened by the war, it is precisely in Europe that the
transition from the “organic” epoch to the revolutionary epoch was
particularly precipitous.

Theoretically, to be sure, even a new chapter of a _general_ capitalist
progress in the most powerful, ruling, and leading countries is not
excluded. But for this, capitalism would first have to overcome enormous
barriers of a class as well as of an inter-state character. It would
have to strangle the proletarian revolution for a long time; it would
have to enslave China completely, overthrow the Soviet republic, and so
forth. We are still a long way removed from all this. Theoretical
eventualities correspond least of all to political probabilities.
Naturally, a great deal also depends upon us, that is, upon the
revolutionary strategy of the Comintern. In the final analysis, this
question will be settled in the struggle of international forces. Still,
in the present epoch for which the program was created, capitalist
development as a whole is faced with insurmountable obstacles and
contradictions and beats in frenzy against them. It is precisely this
that invests our epoch with its revolutionary character and the
revolution with its permanent character.

The revolutionary character of the epoch does not lie in that it permits
of the accomplishment of the revolution, that is, the seizure of power
at every given moment. Its revolutionary character consists in profound
and sharp fluctuations and abrupt and frequent transitions from an
immediately revolutionary situation; in other words, such as enables the
communist party to strive for power, to a victory of the Fascist or
semi-Fascist counter-revolution, and from the latter to a provisional
regime of the golden mean (the “Left bloc,” the inclusion of the social
democracy into the coalition, the passage of power to the party of
MacDonald, and so forth), immediately thereafter to force the
antagonisms to a head again and acutely raise the question of power.

What did we have in Europe in the course of the last decades before the
war? In the sphere of economy – a mighty advance of productive forces
with “normal” fluctuations of the conjuncture. In politics – the growth
of social democracy at the expense of liberalism and “democracy” with
quite insignificant fluctuations. In other words, a process of
systematic intensification of economic and political contradictions, and
in this sense, the creation of the prerequisites for the proletarian
revolution.

What have we in Europe in the post-war period? In economy – irregular,
spasmodic curtailments and expansions of production, which gravitate in
general around the pre-war level despite great technical successes in
certain branches of industry. In politics – frenzied oscillations of the
political situation towards the Left and towards the Right. It is quite
apparent that the sharp turns in the political situation in the course
of one, two, or three years are not brought about by any changes in the
basic economic factors, but by causes and impulses of a purely
superstructural character, thereby indicating the extreme instability of
the entire system, the foundation of which is corroded by irreconcilable
contradictions.

This is the sole source from which flows the full significance of
revolutionary strategy in contradistinction to tactics. Thence also
flows the new significance of the party and the party leadership.

The draft confines itself to purely formal definitions of the party
(vanguard, theory of Marxism, embodiment of experiences, and so forth)
which might not have sounded badly in a program of the Left social
democracy prior to the war. Today it is utterly inadequate.

In a period of growing capitalism even the best party leadership could
do no more than only accelerate the formation of a workers’ party.
Inversely, mistakes of the leadership could retard this process. The
objective prerequisites of a proletarian revolution matured but slowly,
and the work of the party retained a preparatory character.

Today, on the contrary, every new sharp change in the political
situation to the Left places the decision in the hands of the
revolutionary party. Should it miss the critical situation, the latter
veers around to its opposite. Under these circumstances the role of the
party leadership acquires exceptional importance. The words of Lenin to
the effect that two or three days can decide the fate of the
international revolution would have been almost incomprehensible in the
epoch of the Second International. In our epoch, on the contrary, these
words have only too often been confirmed and, with the exception of the
October, always from the negative side. Only out of these general
conditions does that exceptional position become understandable which
the Comintern and its leadership occupy with respect to the whole
mechanics of the present historical epoch.

One must understand clearly that the initial and basic cause – the
so-called “stabilization” – lies in the contradiction between the
general disorganization of the economic and social position of
capitalist Europe and the colonial East on the one hand, and the
weaknesses, unpreparedness, irresolution of the communist parties and
the vicious errors of their leadership on the other.

It is not the so-called stabilization, arriving from nowhere, that
checked the development of the revolutionary situation of 1918-1919, or
of the recent years, but on the contrary, the unutilized revolutionary
situation was transformed into its opposite and thus guaranteed to the
bourgeoisie the opportunity to fight with relative success for
stabilization. The sharpening contradictions of this struggle for
“stabilization” or rather of the struggle for the further existence and
development of capitalism prepare at each new stage the prerequisites
for new international and class upheavals, that is, for new
revolutionary situations, the development of which depends entirely upon
the proletarian party.

The role of the subjective factor in a period of slow, organic
development can remain quite a subordinate one. Then diverse proverbs of
gradualism arise, as: “slow but sure,” and “one must not kick against
the pricks,” and so forth, which epitomize all the tactical wisdom of an
organic epoch that abhorred “leaping over stages.” But as soon as the
objective prerequisites have matured, the key to the whole historical
process passes into the hands of the subjective factor, that is, the
party. Opportunism which consciously or unconsciously thrives upon the
inspiration of the past epoch, always tends to underestimate the role of
the subjective factor, that is, the importance of the party and of
revolutionary leadership. All this was fully disclosed during the
discussions on the lessons of the German October, on the Anglo-Russian
Committee, and on the Chinese revolution. In all these cases, as well as
in others of lesser importance, the opportunistic tendency evinced
itself in the adoption of a course that relied solely upon the “masses”
and therefore completely scorned the question of the “tops” of the
revolutionary leadership. Such an attitude, which is false in general,
operates with positively fatal effect in the imperialist epoch.

The October Revolution was the result of a particular relation of class
forces in Russia and in the whole world and their particular development
in the process of the imperialist war. This general proposition is ABC
to a Marxist. Nevertheless, there is no contradiction whatever between
Marxism and posing, for instance, such a question as: would we have
seized power in October had not Lenin arrived in Russia in time? There
is much to indicate that we might not have been able to seize power. The
resistance of the party heads – for the most part, incidentally, they
are the same people who determine policies today – was very strong even
under Lenin. And without Lenin it would undoubtedly have been infinitely
stronger. The party might have failed to adopt the necessary course in
time, and there was very little time left at our disposal. During such
periods, a few days sometimes decide. The working masses would indeed
have pressed upwards from below with great heroism but without a
leadership certain of itself and leading consciously to the goal,
victory would have been little probable. In the meantime, however, the
bourgeoisie could have surrendered Petrograd to the Germans and after a
suppression of the proletarian uprising could have reconsolidated its
power most probably in the form of Bonapartism, by means of a separate
peace with Germany and through other measures. The entire course of
events might have taken a different direction for a number of years.

In the German revolution of 1918, in the Hungarian revolution of 1919,
in the September movement of the Italian proletariat in 1920, in the
English general strike of 1926, in the Vienna uprising of 1927, and in
the Chinese revolution of 1925-1927 – everywhere, one and the same
political contradiction of the entire past decade, even if at different
stages and in different forms, was manifested. In an objectively ripe
revolutionary situation, ripe not only with regard to its social bases
but not infrequently also with regard to the mood for struggle of the
masses, the subjective factor, that is, a revolutionary mass party, was
lacking or else this party lacked a farsighted and intrepid leadership.

Of course, the weaknesses of the communist parties and of their
leadership did not fall from the sky, but are rather a product of the
entire past of Europe. But the communist parties could develop at a
swift pace in the present existing maturity of the objectively
revolutionary contradictions provided, of course, there was a correct
leadership on the part of the Comintern speeding up this process of
development instead of retarding it. If contradiction is, in general,
the most important mainspring of progress then the clear understanding
of the contradiction between a general revolutionary maturity of the
objective situation (despite ebbs and flows) and the immaturity of the
international party of the proletariat ought now to constitute the
mainspring for the forward movement of the Comintern, at least of its
European section.

Without an extensive and generalized dialectical comprehension of the
present epoch as an epoch of abrupt turns, a real education of the young
parties, a correct strategical leadership of the class struggle, a
correct combination of tactics, and, above all, a sharp and bold and
decisive re-arming at each successive breaking point of the situation is
impossible. And it is just at such an abrupt breaking point that two or
three days sometimes decide the fate of the international revolution for
years to come.

The chapter of the draft program devoted to strategy and tactics speaks
of a struggle of the party for the proletariat _in general_, and of a
general strike, and of the armed insurrection _in general_. But it does
not at all dissect the peculiar character and the inner rhythm of the
present epoch. Without comprehending these theoretically and “sensing”
them politically, a real revolutionary leadership is impossible.

That is why this chapter is so pedantic, so thin, so bankrupt from
beginning to end.

 

3. The Third Congress and the Question of the Permanence of the Revolutionary Process According to Lenin and According to Bukharin

Three periods can be established in the political development of Europe
after the war. The first period runs from 1917 to 1921, the second from
March 1921 to October 1923, and the third from October 1923 up to the
English general strike, or even up to the present moment.

The post-war revolutionary movement of the masses was strong enough to
overthrow the bourgeoisie. But there was no one to bring this to a
consummation. The social democracy, which held the leadership of the
traditional organizations of the working class, exerted all its efforts
to save the bourgeois regime. When we looked forward at that time to an
immediate seizure of power by the proletariat, we reckoned that a
revolutionary party would mature rapidly in the fire of the civil war.
But the two terms did not coincide. The revolutionary wave of the
post-war period ebbed before the communist parties grew up and reached
maturity in the struggle with the social democracy so as to assume the
leadership of the insurrection.

In March 1921, the German Communist Party made the attempt to avail
itself of the declining wave in order to overthrow the bourgeois state
with a single blow. The guiding thought of the German Central Committee
in this was to save the Soviet republic (the theory of socialism in one
country had not yet been proclaimed at that time). But it turned out
that the determination of the leadership and the dissatisfaction of the
masses do not suffice for victory. There must obtain a number of other
conditions, above all, a close bond between the leadership and the
masses and the confidence of the latter in the leadership. This
condition was lacking at that time.

The Third Congress of the Comintern was a milestone demarcating the
first and second periods. It set down the fact that the resources of the
communist parties, politically as well as organizationally, were not
sufficient for the conquest of power. It advanced the slogan: “To the
masses,” that is, to the conquest of power through _a previous conquest
of the masses_, achieved on the basis of the daily life and struggles.
For the mass also continues to live its daily life in a revolutionary
epoch, even if in a somewhat different manner.

This formulation of the problem met with a furious resistance at the
Congress which was inspired theoretically by Bukharin. At that time he
held a viewpoint of his own permanent revolution and not that of Marx.
“Since capitalism had exhausted itself, _therefore_ the victory must be
gained through an uninterrupted revolutionary offensive.” Bukharin’s
position always reduces itself to syllogisms of this sort.

Naturally, I never shared the Bukharinist version of the theory of the
“permanent” revolution, according to which no interruptions, periods of
stagnation, retreats, transitional demands, or the like, are at all
conceivable in the revolutionary process. On the contrary, from the
first days of October, I fought against this caricature of the permanent
revolution.

When I spoke as did Lenin of the incompatibility between Soviet Russia
and the world of imperialism, I had in mind the great strategically
curve and not its tactical windings. Bukharin, on the contrary, prior to
his transformation into his own antipode, invariably expounded a
scholastic caricature of the Marxian conception of a continuous
revolution. Bukharin opined in the days of his “Left Communism,” that
the revolution allows neither of retreats nor temporary compromises with
the enemy. Long after the question of the Brest-Litovsk Peace, in which
my position had nothing in common with Bukharin’s, the latter together
with the entire ultra-Left wing of the Comintern of that time advocated
the line of the March 1921 days in Germany, being of the opinion that
unless the proletariat in Europe was “galvanized,” unless there were
ever new revolutionary eruptions, the Soviet power was threatened with
certain destruction. The consciousness that real dangers actually
threatened the Soviet power did not prevent me from waging an
irreconcilable struggle shoulder to shoulder with Lenin at the Third
Congress against this putschistic parody of a Marxian conception of the
permanent revolution. During the Third Congress, we declared tens of
times to the impatient Leftists: “Don’t be in too great a hurry to save
us. In that way you will only destroy yourselves and, therefore, also
bring about our destruction; Follow systematically the path of the
struggle for the masses in order thus to reach the struggle for power.
We need your victory but not your readiness to fight under unfavorable
conditions. We will manage to maintain ourselves in the Soviet republic
with the help of the NEP and we will go forward. You will still have
time to come to our aid at the right moment if you will have gathered
your forces and will have utilized the favorable situation.”

Although this took place after the Tenth Party Congress which prohibited
factions, Lenin nevertheless assumed the initiative at that time to
create the top nucleus of a new faction for the struggle against the
ultra-leftists who were strong at that time. In our intimate
conferences, Lenin flatly put the question of how to carry on the
subsequent struggle should the Third World Congress accept Bukharin’s
viewpoint. Our “faction” of that time did not develop further only
because our opponents “folded up” considerably during the Congress.

Bukharin, of course, swung further to the Left of Marxism than anybody
else. At this same Third Congress and later, too, he led the fight
against my view that the economic conjuncture in Europe would inevitably
rise; and that despite a whole series of defeats of the proletariat I
expected after this inevitable rise of the conjuncture not a blow at the
revolution, but, on the contrary, a new impetus to revolutionary
struggle. Bukharin, who held to his standpoint of the scholastic
permanence of both the economic crisis and the revolution as a whole,
waged a long struggle against me on this viewpoint, until facts finally
forced him, as usual, to a very belated admission that he was in error.

At the Third and Fourth Congresses Bukharin fought against the policy of
the united front and the transitional demands, proceeding from his
mechanical understanding of the permanence of the revolutionary process.

The struggle between these two tendencies, the synthesized, Marxian
conception of the continuous character of the proletarian revolution and
the scholastic parody of Marxism which was by no means an individual
quirk of Bukharin’s, can be followed through a whole series of other
questions, big as well as small. But it is superfluous to do so.
Bukharin’s position today is essentially the self-same ultra-left
scholasticism of the “permanent revolution,” only, this time, turned
inside out. If, for example, Bukharin was of the opinion until 1923 that
without a permanent economic crisis and a permanent civil war in Europe
the Soviet republic would perish, he has today discovered a recipe for
building socialism without any international revolution at all. To be
sure, the topsy-turvy Bukharinist permanency has not improved any by the
fact that the present leaders of the Comintern far too frequently
combine their adventurism of yesterday with their opportunist position
of today, and vice versa.

The Third Congress was a great beacon. Its teachings are still vital and
fruitful today. The Fourth Congress only concretized these teachings.
The slogan of the Third Congress did not simply read: _“To the masses!”_
but:_“To power through a previous conquest of the masses!”_ After the
faction led by Lenin (which he characterized demonstratively as the
“Right” wing) had to curb intransigently the entire Congress throughout
its duration, Lenin arranged a private conference toward the end of the
Congress in which he warned prophetically: “Remember, it is only a
question of getting a good running start for the revolutionary leap. The
struggle for the masses is the struggle for power.”

The events of 1923 demonstrated that this Leninist position was not
grasped, not only by “those who are led” but also by many of the
leaders.

 

4. The German Events of 1923 and the Lessons of October

The German events of 1923 form the breaking point that inaugurates a
new, post-Leninist period in the development of the Comintern. The
occupation of the Ruhr by French troops early in 1923 signified Europe’s
relapse into war chaos. Although the second attack of this disease was
incomparably weaker than the first, violent revolutionary consequences
were nevertheless to be expected from the outset, since it had seized
the already completely debilitated organism of Germany. The leadership
of the Comintern did not take this into consideration at the right time.
The German Communist Party still continued to follow its one-sided
interpretation of the slogan of the Third Congress which had firmly
drawn it away from the threatening road to putschism. We have already
stated above that in our epoch of abrupt turns the greatest difficulty
for a revolutionary leadership lies in being able to feel the pulse of
the political situation at the proper moment, so as to catch the abrupt
contingency and to turn the helm in due time. Such qualities of a
revolutionary leadership are not acquired simply by swearing fealty to
the latest circular letter of the Comintern. They can be acquired, if
the necessary theoretical prerequisites exist, by personally acquired
experience and genuine self-criticism. It was not easy to achieve the
sharp turn from the tactics of the March days of 1921 to a systematic
revolutionary activity in the press, meetings, trade unions, and
parliament. After the crisis of this turn had been weathered, there
arose the danger of the development of a new one-sided deviation of a
directly opposite character. The daily struggle for the masses absorbs
all attention, creates its own tactical routine, and diverts attention
away from the strategical tasks flowing from changes in the objective
situation.

In the summer of 1923, the internal situation in Germany, especially in
connection with the collapse of the tactic of passive resistance,
assumed a catastrophic character. It became quite clear that the German
bourgeoisie could extricate itself from this “hopeless” situation only
if the communist party failed to understand in due time that the
position of the bourgeoisie was “hopeless” and if the party failed to
draw all the necessary revolutionary conclusions. Yet it was precisely
the communist party, holding the key in its hands, that opened the door
for the bourgeoisie with this key.

Why didn’t the German revolution lead to a victory? The reasons for it
are all to be sought in the tactics, not in the existing conditions.
Here we had a classic example of a missed revolutionary situation. After
all the German proletariat had gone through in recent years, it could be
led to a decisive struggle only if it were convinced that this time the
question would be decisively resolved and that the communist party was
ready for the struggle and capable of achieving the victory. But the
communist party executed the turn very irresolutely and after st very
long delay. Not only the Rights but also the Lefts, despite the fact
that they had fought each other very bitterly, viewed rather
fatalistically the process of revolutionary development up to
September-October 1923.

Only a pedant and not a revolutionist would investigate now, after the
event, how far the conquest of power would have been “assured” had there
been a correct policy. We confine ourselves here to quoting a remarkable
testimonial from PRAVDA bearing on this point, a testimonial which is
purely accidental and unique because it is contradictory to all the
other pronouncements of this organ:

“If in May 1923, when the mark was comparatively stabilized and the
bourgeoisie had achieved a certain degree of consolidation, after the
middle class and the petty bourgeoisie went over to the Nationalists,
after a deep crisis in the party, and after a heavy defeat of the
proletariat, if after all this the communists are able to rally
3,700,000 votes, then it is clear that in October 1923, during the
unprecedented economic crisis, during the complete disintegration of the
middle classes, during a frightful confusion in the ranks of the social
democracy resulting from the powerful and sharp contradictions within
the bourgeoisie itself and an unprecedented militant mood of the
proletarian masses in the industrial centers, the communist party had
the majority of the population on its side; it could and should have
fought and had all the chances for success.” [1]

And here are the words of a German delegate (name unknown) at the Fifth
World Congress:

“There is not a single class conscious worker in Germany who is unaware
that the party should have engaged in a battle and not have shunned it.

“The leaders of the CPG forgot all about the independent role of the
party; this was one of the main reasons for the October defeat.” [2]

A great deal has already been related in discussions concerning what
took place in the upper leadership of the German party and the Comintern
in 1923, particularly during the latter part of the year, even though
many of the things said did not correspond by far to what really took
place. Kuusinen in particular has brought much confusion into these
questions; the same Kuusinen whose job from 1924 to 1926 was to prove
that salvation lay only in the leadership of Zinoviev, just as he
applied himself from a certain date in 1926 to prove that the leadership
of Zinoviev was ruinous. The necessary authority to pass such
responsible judgments is probably conferred upon Kuusinen by the fact
that he himself in 1918 did everything that lay in his modest resources
to doom the revolution of the Finnish proletariat to destruction.

There have been several attempts, after the event, to attribute to me a
solidarity with the line of Brandler. In the USSR these attempts were
camouflaged because too many of those on the scene knew the real state
of affairs. In Germany this was done openly because no one knew anything
there. Quite accidentally, I find in my possession a printed fragment of
the ideological struggle that occurred at that time in our Central
Committee over the question of the German revolution. In the documents
of the January 1928 conference, I am directly accused by the Political
Bureau of a hostile and distrustful attitude towards the German Central
Committee in the period prior to its capitulation. Here is what we find
said there:

“… Comrade Trotsky, before leaving the session of the Central Committee
[September 1923 Plenum], made a speech which profoundly disturbed all
the members of the Central Committee and in which he alleged that the
leadership of the German Communist Party was worthless and that the
Central Committee of the German CP was permeated with fatalism,
sleepy-headedness, etc. Comrade Trotsky then declared that the German
revolution was doomed to failure. This speech had a depressing effect on
all those present. But the great majority of the comrades were of the
opinion that this phillipic was called forth by an episode [?!], in no
way connected with the German revolution, which occurred during the
Plenum of the Central Committee and that this speech _did not correspond
to the objective state of affairs_.” [3]

No matter how the members of the Central Committee may have sought to
explain my warning, which was not the first one, it was dictated only by
concern over the fate of the German revolution. Unfortunately, events
fully confirmed my position; in part because the majority of the Central
Committee of the leading party, according to their own admission, did
not grasp in time that my warning fully “corresponded to the objective
state of affairs.” Of course, I did not propose hastily to replace
Brandler’s Central Committee by some other (on the eve of decisive
events such a change would have been sheerest adventurism), but I did
propose from the summer of 1923 that a much more timely and resolute
position be taken on the question of the preparation of the armed
insurrection and of the necessary mobilization of forces for the support
of the German Central Committee. The latter-day attempts to ascribe to
me a solidarity with the line of the Brandlerite Central Committee,
whose mistakes were only a reflection of the general mistakes of tile
Comintern leadership, were chiefly due to the fact that _after the
capitulation_ of the German party, I was opposed to making a scapegoat
of Brandler, _although_, or more correctly, _because_ I judged the
German defeat to be much more serious than did the majority of the
Central Committee. In this case as in others, I fought against the
inadmissible system which only seeks to maintain the infallibility of
the central leadership by periodic removals of national leaderships,
subjecting the latter to savage persecutions and even expulsions from
the party.

In the LESSONS OF OCTOBER, written by me under the influence of the
capitulation of the German Central Committee, I developed the idea that
under the conditions of the present epoch, a revolutionary situation can
be lost for several years in the course of a few days. It may be hard to
believe, but this opinion was stamped as “blacklist” and
“individualism.” The innumerable articles written against the LESSONS OF
OCTOBER reveal how completely the experiences of the October Revolution
have been forgotten and how little its lessons have penetrated the
consciousness. It is a typical Menshevist dodge to shift responsibility
for the mistakes of the leaders on the “masses” or to minimize the
importance of leadership _in general_, in order thus to diminish its
guilt. It arises from the total incapacity to arrive at the dialectic
understanding of the “superstructure” in general, of the superstructure
of the class which is the party, and the superstructure of the party in
the shape of its central leadership. There are epochs during which even
Marx and Engels could not drive historical development forward a single
inch; there are other epochs during which men of much smaller caliber,
standing at the helm, can check the development of the international
revolution for a number of years.

The attempts made recently to represent the matter as though I had
repudiated the LESSONS OF OCTOBER are entirely absurd. To be sure, I
have “admitted” one “mistake” of secondary importance. When I wrote my
LESSONS OF OCTOBER, that is, in the summer of 1924, it seemed to me that
Stalin held a position further to the Left (i.e., Left-Centrist) than
Zinoviev in the Autumn of 1923. I was not quite abreast of the inner
life of the group that played the role of the secret center of the
majority faction apparatus. The documents published after the split of
this factional grouping, especially the purely Brandlerist letter of
Stalin to Zinoviev and Bukharin, convinced me of the incorrectness of my
estimation of these personal groupings, which, however, had nothing to
do with the essence of the problems raised. But even this error as to
personalities is not a major one. Centrism is quite capable, it is true,
of making big zigzags to the Left but as the “evolution” of Zinoviev has
once again demonstrated, it is utterly incapable of conducting a
revolutionary line in the least systematic.

The ideas developed by me in the LESSONS OF OCTOBER retain their full
force today. Moreover, they have been confirmed over and over again
since 1928.

Among the numerous difficulties in a proletarian revolution, there is a
particular, concrete, and specific difficulty. It arises out of the
position and tasks of the revolutionary party leadership during a sharp
turn of events. Even the most revolutionary parties run the risk of
lagging behind and of counterposing the slogans and measures of struggle
of yesterday to the new tasks and new exigencies. And there cannot,
generally, be a sharper turn of events than that which creates the
necessity for the armed insurrection of the proletariat. It is here that
the danger arises that the policy of the party leadership and of the
party as a whole does not correspond to the conduct of the class and the
exigencies of the situation. During a relatively languid course of
political life, such incongruities are remedied, even if with losses,
but without a catastrophe. But in periods of acute revolutionary crisis,
it is precisely _time_ that is lacking to eliminate the incongruity and
to redress the front, as it were, under fire. The periods of the maximum
sharpening of a revolutionary crisis are by their very nature
transitory. The incongruity between a revolutionary leadership
(hesitation, vacillation, temporizing in the face of the furious assault
of the bourgeoisie) and the objective tasks, can lead in the course of a
few weeks and even days to a catastrophe and to a loss of what took
years of work to prepare.

Of course, the incongruity between the leadership and the party or
between the party and the class can also be of an opposite character,
that is to say, in cases when the leadership runs ahead of the
development of the revolution and confounds the fifth month of pregnancy
with the ninth. The dearest example of such an incongruity was to be
observed in Germany in March 1921. There we had in the party the extreme
manifestation of the “infantile disease of Leftism,” and as a
consequence of it – putschism (revolutionary adventurism). This danger
is quite actual for the future as well. That is why the teachings of the
Third Congress of the Comintern retain their full force. But the German
experience of 1923 brought before us the opposite danger in harsh
reality: the situation is ripe and the leadership lags behind. By the
time the leadership succeeds in accommodating itself to the situation,
the latter has already changed; the masses are in retreat and the
relationship of forces worsens abruptly.

In the German defeat of 1923, there were, of course, many national
peculiarities but there also were profoundly typical features which
indicate a general danger. This danger may be termed as _the crisis of
the revolutionary leadership on the eve of the transition to the armed
insurrection._ The rank and file of the proletarian party are by their
very nature far less susceptible to the pressure of bourgeois public
opinion. But certain elements of the party tops and the middle stratum
of the party will unfailingly succumb in larger or smaller measure to
the material and ideological terror of the bourgeoisie at the decisive
moment. To dismiss this danger is not to cope with it. To be sure, there
is no panacea against it suitable for all cases. But the first necessary
step in fighting a peril is to understand its source and its nature. The
inevitable appearance or development of a Right wing grouping in every
communist party during the “pre-October” period reflects on the one hand
the immense objective difficulties and dangers inherent in this “leap”
and on the other hand the furious pressure of bourgeois public opinion.
Herein lies the gist and the import of the Right wing grouping. And this
is precisely why hesitations and vacillations arise inevitably in the
communist parties at the very moment when they are most dangerous. In
our party, only a minority of the party tops was seized by vacillations
in 1917, and they were overcome, thanks to the harsh energy of Lenin. In
Germany, the leadership as a whole vacillated and this irresolution was
transmitted to the party and through it to the class. The revolutionary
situation was thereby missed. In China where the workers and poor
peasants were fighting for the seizure of power, _the central leadership
worked against this struggle_. All these, of course, are not the last
crises of the leadership in the most decisive historical moments. To
reduce these inevitable crises to a minimum is one of the most important
tasks of each communist party and of the Comintern as a whole. This
cannot be achieved except by arriving at a complete understanding of the
experiences of October 1917 and the political content of the then Right
opposition inside our party in contrast to the experiences of the German
party in 1923.

Herein precisely is the gist of the LESSONS OF OCTOBER.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. PRAVDA, May 25, 1924.

2. PRAVDA, June 26, 1924.

3. DOCUMENTS OF THE CONFERENCE OF THE CPSU, January 1929, p.14.

The Third International After Lenin



II. STRATEGY AND TACTICS IN THE IMPERIALIST EPOCH (PART 2)


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

5. The Basic Strategical Mistake of the Fifth Congress

We have had, beginning with the end of 1923, a whole series of documents
of the Comintern as well as declarations of its leaders on the subject
of the “mistake in tempo” committed in the Autumn of 1923, all
accompanied by the invariable references to Marx, who, you see, also had
miscalculated in his dates. At the same time, they passed in deliberate
silence over the question whether the “mistake in tempo” of the
Comintern consisted in underestimating or, on the contrary,
overestimating the proximity of the critical moment of the seizure of
power. In conformity with the regime of double bookkeeping that has
become traditional for the leadership in recent years, a blank space was
left for either the former or latter construction.

It is not difficult, however, to draw the conclusion from the entire
policy of the Comintern during this period that throughout 1924 and for
the greater part of 1925 the leadership of the Comintern held the view
that the high point of the German crisis was still ahead. The reference
to Marx was, therefore, hardly in place. For while Marx, owing to his
foresight, occasionally perceived the impending revolution closer than
it really was, he never had the occasion of failing to recognize the
lineaments of revolution when it stood directly before him or of
subsequently stubbornly accepting the backside for the face of the
revolution, after the latter had already turned its rear.

At the Thirteenth Conference of the CPSU, Zinoviev, upon putting in
circulation the equivocal formula on the “mistake in tempo,” declared:

“The Executive Committee of the Communist International must say to you
that should similar events repeat themselves, we would do the very same
thing in the very same situation.” [4]

This promise had the earmarks of a threat.

On February 20, 1924, Zinoviev declared at a conference of the
International Red Aid that the situation in the whole of Europe was such
that “we must not expect there a period now, no matter how brief, of
even an external pacification, any lull whatever; … Europe is entering
into the phase of decisive events. Germany is apparently marching
towards a sharpened civil war …” [5]

Early in February 1924, the Presidium of the ECCI said in its resolution
on the lessons of the German events:

“The Communist Party of Germany must not remove from the agenda the
question of the uprising and the seizure of power. _On the contrary_ [!]
this question must stand before us in all its concreteness and urgency
…” [6]

On March 26, 1924, the ECCI wrote to the German Communist Party:

“The mistake in the evaluation of the tempo of events [what kind of a
mistake? – _L.T._] made in October 1923, caused the party great
difficulties. Nevertheless, it is _only an episode_. The fundamental
estimate remains the same as before.” [7]

From all this the ECCI drew the following conclusion:

“The German Communist Party must continue as hitherto to exert all its
forces in the work to arm the working class … .” [8]

The great historical tragedy of 1923 – the surrender without a struggle
of the great revolutionary position – was appraised six months later as
an episode. “Only an episode!” Europe is still suffering today from the
gravest consequences of this “episode.” The fact that the Comintern did
not have to convoke a Congress for four years like the fact that the
Left wing was crushed in one party of the Comintern after the other, is
in the same measure a result of this “episode” of 1923.

The Fifth Congress met eight months after the defeat of the German
proletariat, when all the consequences of this catastrophe were already
manifest. Here it was not even the case of having to forecast something
coming but to see that which is. The fundamental tasks of the Fifth
Congress were: first, to call this defeat clearly and relentlessly by
its name, and to lay bare its “subjective” cause, allowing no one to
hide behind the pretext of objective conditions; secondly, to establish
the beginning of a new stage during which the masses would temporarily
drift away, the social democracy grow, and the communist party lose in
influence; thirdly, to prepare the Comintern for all this so that it
would not be caught unawares and to equip it with the necessary methods
of defensive struggle and organizational consolidation until the arrival
of a new change in the situation.

But in all these questions the Congress adopted a directly opposite
attitude.

Zinoviev defined the import of the German events at the Congress in the
following manner: “We expected the German revolution but it did not
come.” [9]

In reality, however, the revolution had the right to answer: “I did come
but you, gentlemen, arrived too late at the rendezvous.”

The leaders of the Congress reckoned together with Brandler that we had
“overestimated” the situation, when, in reality, “we” had estimated it
far too lightly and too late. Zinoviev reconciled himself very easily
with this so-called “overestimation” of his. He saw the chief evil
elsewhere.

“Overestimating the situation was not the worst thing. What is much
worse, as the example of Saxony showed, is the fact that there are still
many social democratic survivals left in the ranks of our party.” [10]

Zinoviev did not see the catastrophe, and he was not alone. Together
with him the whole Fifth Congress simply passed over this greatest
defeat of the world revolution. The German events were analyzed
principally from the angle of the policies of the communists … in the
Saxon Landtag. In its resolution, the Congress lauded the ECCI for
having

“… condemned the opportunistic conduct of the German Central Committee
and, _above all_, its perverted application of the united front tactic
during the Saxon government experiment.” [11]

This is somewhat like condemning a murderer “above all” for failing to
take off his hat upon entering the home of his victim.

“The Saxon experience,” insisted Zinoviev, “created a new situation. It
carried a threat of beginning the liquidation of the revolutionary
tactic of the Communist International.” [12]

And inasmuch as the “Saxon experience” was condemned and Brandler
deposed, nothing else remained except to pass on to the next business on
the agenda.

“The general political perspectives,” said Zinoviev, and the Congress
with him, “remain essentially as before. The situation is pregnant with
revolution. New class struggles are already unfolding again. A gigantic
struggle is on the march …” etc. [13]

How flimsy and unreliable is a “Leftism” that strains at a gnat and
cooly swallows a camel.

Those who were wide awake to the situation and pushed the significance
of the October defeat to the foreground, those who pointed out the
inevitable subsequent lengthy period of revolutionary ebb and temporary
consolidation (“stabilization”) of capitalism (with all the ensuing
political consequences), the leadership of the Fifth Congress endeavored
to brand as opportunists and liquidators of the revolution. This is what
Zinoviev and Bukharin set as their main task. Ruth Fischer, who together
with them underestimated the defeat of the previous year, saw in the
Russian Opposition “_the loss of the perspective of world revolution,
the lack of faith in the proximity of the German and European
revolution_, a hopeless pessimism and the liquidation of the European
revolution, etc.” [14]

It is needless to explain that those who were most directly to blame for
the defeat howled loudest against the “liquidators,” that is, against
those who refused to label defeats as victories. Thus Kolarov thundered
against Radek who had the audacity to consider the defeat of the
Bulgarian party as a decisive one:

“The defeats of the party were decisive neither in June nor in
September. The CP of Bulgaria stands firm and is preparing itself for
new battles.” [15]

Instead of a Marxian analysis of the defeats – irresponsible
bureaucratic bluster triumphing all along the line. Yet Bolshevik
strategy is incompatible with smug and soulless Kolarovism.

A good deal of the work of the Fifth World Congress was correct and
necessary. The struggle against the Right tendencies, which sought to
raise their head, was absolutely urgent. But this struggle was
sidetracked, confused, and distorted by the radically false estimate of
the situation, as a result of which everything was jumbled and those
were classed in the camp of the Right who were able to see better and
more clearly the events of yesterday, today, and tomorrow. Had the Lefts
of that time triumphed at the Third World Congress, Lenin would have
been classed together with Levi, Clara Zetkin, and others in the Right
wing on the same grounds. The ideological muddle engendered by the false
political orientation of the Fifth Congress became subsequently the
source of new great misfortunes.

The estimate adopted by the Congress in the political sphere was
likewise carried over completely to the economic field. The symptoms of
the economic consolidation of the German bourgeoisie, which were already
manifest, were either denied or ignored. Varga, who always dishes up the
economic facts to conform with the current reigning political tendency,
brought in a report this time, too, that “… there are no perspectives of
the recovery of capitalism.” [16]

But a year later, after the “recovery” had been _belatedly_ rechristened
“stabilization,” Varga painstakingly made the discovery after the event.
By that time, the Opposition had already to bear up under the accusation
of not recognizing the stabilization because it had the audacity to
establish the commencement of it a year and a half before, while in 1925
it already discerned tendencies undermining this stabilization. [17]

The Fifth Congress perceived political processes and ideological
groupings as they were reflected in the distorted mirror of a false
orientation; and this also gave birth to its resolution classifying the
Russian Opposition as a “petty bourgeois deviation.” History has
corrected this mistake in its own fashion by forcing Zinoviev, the chief
prosecuting attorney at the Fifth Congress, to admit publicly” two years
later that the central nucleus of the Opposition in 1923 had been
correct in all the fundamental questions at issue.

From the basic strategical mistake of the Fifth Congress necessarily had
also to arise a lack of understanding of the processes occurring within
the German and the international social democracy. At the Congress there
were speeches only of its decay, disintegration, and collapse. Zinoviev
had the following to say with regard to the last Reichstag elections in
which the Communist Party of Germany received 3,700,000 votes:

“If on the parliamentary field in Germany, we have a proportion of 62
communists to 100 social democrats, then this should serve as proof to
every one of _how close we are to winning_ the majority of the German
working class.” [18]

Zinoviev understood absolutely nothing of the dynamics of the process;
the influence of the CPG during that year and the following years did
not grow but declined. The 3,700,000 votes represented only an
impressive _remnant_ of the decisive influence that the party had over
the majority of the German proletariat towards the end of 1923. This
number would undoubtedly diminish in the subsequent elections.

In the meantime, the social democracy which was going to pieces in 1923
like a rotted mat of straw, began to recover systematically after the
defeat of the revolution at the end of 1923, to start up and to grow,
and chiefly at the expense of communism. Inasmuch as we had foreseen
this – and how could one have failed to foresee it? – our forecast was
attributed to our “pessimism.” Is it still necessary now, after the last
elections in May 1928 in which the social democrats received more than
9,000,000 votes, to prove that we were correct when at the beginning of
1924 we spoke and wrote that there must inevitably follow a revival of
the social democracy for a certain period, while the “optimists” who
were already chanting the requiem over the social democracy were grossly
mistaken? Above all, the Fifth Congress of the Comintern was grossly
mistaken.

The second youth of the social democracy, exhibiting all the traits of
doddering senility, is naturally not lasting. The demise of the social
democracy is inevitable. But how long it will be before it dies is
nowhere established. This, too, depends on us. To bring it closer, we
must be able to face the facts, to recognize in due time the turning
points of a political situation, to call a defeat a defeat, and to learn
to foresee the coming day.

If the German social democracy still represents a force of many millions
today, and this, too, within the working class, then there are two
immediate causes for it. First, the defeat of the German party which
capitulated in the Fall of 1923, and second, the false strategical
orientation of the Fifth Congress.

In January 1924 the ratio between the communists and the social
democratic voters was almost 2 to 3, but four months later this
proportion fell badly to slightly more than 1 to 3; in other words,
during this period, taken as a whole, we did not draw closer to the
conquest of the majority of the working class but drew further away from
it. And this despite an indubitable strengthening of our party during
the past year which, with a correct policy, can and must become the
point of departure for a real conquest of the majority.

We shall take the occasion later to dwell on the political consequences
of the position adopted by the Fifth Congress. But isn’t it already
clear that there cannot be serious talk of Bolshevik strategy without
the ability to survey both the basic curve of our epoch as a whole, and
its individual segments which are at every given moment of the same
importance for the party leadership as railway curves are for the
locomotive engineer? To open wide the throttle on a steeply banked curve
is surely to run the train over the embankment.

Yet, only a few months ago PRAVDA had to acknowledge more or less
distinctly the correctness of the estimate we made as early as the end
of 1923. On January 28, 1928, PRAVDA wrote:

“The phase of a certain [!] apathy and depression which set in after the
defeat of 1923 and permitted German capital to strengthen its positions,
is _beginning_ to pass.”

A “certain” depression which set in the fall of 1923 is first beginning
to pass only in 1928. These words published after a delay of four years
are a ruthless condemnation of the false orientation established by the
Fifth Congress and also of that system of leadership which does not lay
bare and illumine the errors committed but covers them up and thereby
extends the radius of the ideological confusion.

A draft program which passes by without evaluating either the events of
1923 or the basic mistake of the Fifth Congress simply turns its back on
the real questions of a revolutionary strategy of the proletariat in the
imperialist epoch.

 

6. The “Democratic-Pacifist Era” and Fascism

The capitulation of German communism in the Autumn of 1923, which
removed the threatening proletarian danger with a minimum of civil war,
inevitably had to weaken the position not only of the communist party
but also of Fascism. For even a civil war in which the bourgeoisie is
victorious undermines the conditions of capitalist exploitation. Already
at that time, that is, at the end of 1923, we fought against the
exaggeration of the strength and the danger of German Fascism. We
insisted that Fascism would be relegated to the background while the
political stage in the whole of Europe would be occupied for a certain
period by the democratic and pacifist groupings: the Left bloc in
France, the Labour party in England. And the strengthening. of these
groupings would in turn provide an impetus for a new growth of the
German social democracy. Instead of understanding this inevitable
process and organizing the struggle against it along a n·ere, front, the
official leadership continued to identify Fascism with the social
democracy and to prophecy their joint collapse in an imminent civil war.

The problem of the interrelations between the United States and Europe
was very intimately bound up with the question of Fascism and the social
democracy. Only the defeat of the German revolution in 1923 made it
possible for American capital to begin with the realization of its plans
for the (momentarily) “peaceful” subjugation of Europe. Under these
circumstances, the American problem should have been considered in its
full magnitude. Instead, the leadership of the Fifth Congress simply
passed it by. It proceeded entirely from the internal situation in
Europe without even noticing that the long postponement of the European
revolution had immediately shifted the axis of international relations
towards the side of an American offensive upon Europe. This offensive
assumed the shape of an economic “consolidation” of Europe, its
normalization and pacification, and a “recovery” of democratic
principles. Not only the ruined petty bourgeoisie but also the average
worker said to himself: since the communist party failed to achieve
victory, then maybe the social democracy will bring us not victory
(nobody expects that of it), but a piece of bread through a revival of
industry with the aid of American gold. It was necessary to understand
that the vile fiction of American pacifism with the dollar lining –
after the defeat of the German revolution – would and did become the
most important factor in the life of Europe. Not only did the German
social democracy rise again, thanks to this leaven, but to a great
extent also the French Radicals and the English Labour Party.

As a counterpoise to this new enemy front, it should have been pointed
out that bourgeois Europe will be able to exist and maintain itself only
as a financial vassal of the United States and that the pacifism of the
latter is tantamount to an endeavor to put Europe on hunger rations.
Instead of making this very perspective the point of departure of the
new struggle against the social democracy with its new religion of
Americanism, the leadership of the Comintern turned its fire in the
opposite direction. It imputed to us the asinine theory of a normalized
imperialism, without wars and revolutions, placed on American rations.

During the very same February sessions at which the Presidium of the
ECCI – four months prior to the Congress – declared that the armed
insurrection “stood concretely and urgently” on the order of the day for
the German party, it also gave the following estimation of the situation
in France, which was just at that time approaching the “Left”
parliamentary elections:

“This pre-election fever also affects only the most insignificant and
weakest parties and _dead political groupings. The socialist party_ has
been aroused and stirred back to life under the rays of the approaching
elections …“ [19]

At a time when a wave of petty bourgeois pacifist Leftism was quite
obviously ascending in France, carrying away broad sections of the
workers and weakening both the party of the proletariat and the Fascist
detachments of capital; in a word, in face of the victory of the “Left
bloc,” the leadership of the Comintern proceeded from a directly
opposite perspective. It flatly denied the possibility of a pacifist
phase and, on the eve of the May 1924 elections, spoke of the French
Socialist Party, the Left banner-bearer of petty bourgeois pacifism, as
an already “dead political grouping.” At that time we protested against
this light-minded estimation of the social-patriotic party in a special
letter addressed to the delegation of the CPSU. But all in vain. The
leadership of the Comintern stubbornly persisted in considering as
“Leftism” its disregard of these facts. Hence arose that distorted and
sordid polemic, as always in recent years, over democratic pacifism
which brought so much confusion into the parties of the Comintern. The
spokesmen of the Opposition were accused of pacifist prejudices only
because they did not share the prejudices of the leadership of the
Comintern and foresaw at the right time that the defeat suffered by the
German proletariat without a struggle (after a brief strengthening of
the Fascist tendencies), would inevitably bring the petty bourgeois
parties to the fore and strengthen the social democracy.

We have already mentioned above that Zinoviev, at a conference of the
International Red Aid some three or four months before the victory of
the Labour party in England and the Left bloc in France, declared in an
obvious polemic against me:

“In practically the whole of Europe the situation is such that we need
expect no period now, no matter how brief, of even an external pacifism,
or any kind of lull … Europe is entering into the stage of decisive
events … Germany is apparently heading towards a violent civil war …”
[20]

Zinoviev, to all appearances, had completely forgotten that back at the
Fourth Congress in 1922 I was successful, despite rather stubborn
opposition by Zinoviev himself and Bukharin, in introducing at a
commission an amendment (considerably modified, it is true) to the
resolution of the Congress; this amendment speaks of the impending
approach of a “pacifist-democratic” era as a probable stage on the road
of the political decline of the bourgeois state and as a first step to
the rule of communism or – Fascism.

At the Fifth Congress, which met already after the rise of the “Left”
governments in England and France, Zinoviev recalled – very
appropriately – this amendment of mine and proclaimed loudly as follows:

“At the present moment the international situation is characterized by
Fascism, by martial law, and by a rising wave of the white terror
against the proletariat. But this does not exclude the possibility that
in the near future the open reaction of the bourgeoisie will be replaced
in the most important countries by a ’democratic-pacifist era.”

And Zinoviev went on to add with satisfaction:

“This was said in 1922. Thus the Comintern, a year and a half ago,
definitely predicted a democratic-pacifist era.” [21]

It’s the truth. The prognosis which had so long been held against me as
a “pacifist” deviation (as _my deviation_ and not that of the historical
course of development) came in very handy at the Fifth Congress during
the honeymoon weeks of the MacDonald and Herriot ministries. That is
how, unfortunately, matters stood with prognoses in general.

We ought to add that Zinoviev and the majority of the Fifth Congress
construed too literally the old perspective of the “democratic-pacifist
era” as a stage on the road of capitalist decay. Thus Zinoviev declared
at the Fifth Congress: “The democratic-pacifist era is a symptom of
capitalist decay.”

And in his conclusion he said again: “_I repeat that precisely the
democratic-pacifist era is a symptom of the decay and the incurable
crisis._” ([22]

This would have been correct had there been no Ruhr crisis and if
evolution had proceeded more smoothly without such an historical “leap.”
This would have been doubly and trebly correct had the German
proletariat achieved the victory in 1923. In that case, the regimes of
MacDonald and Herriot would only have meant an English and French
“Kerensky period.” But the Ruhr crisis did break out and posed
point-blank the question of who was to be the master in the house. The
German proletariat did not achieve the victory but suffered a decisive
defeat and in such a way as was bound to encourage and consolidate the
German bourgeoisie to the highest degree. Faith in the revolution was
shattered throughout Europe for a number of years. Under such conditions
the governments of MacDonald and Herriot by no means implied either a
Kerensky period or generally the decay of the bourgeoisie. On the
contrary, they would and could become only the ephemeral precursors of
more serious, more solid, and more self-assured bourgeois governments.
The Fifth Congress failed to understand this because by failing to
estimate the extent of the German catastrophe and by reducing the latter
merely to a question of the comedy in the Saxon Landtag, it remained
unaware of the fact that the proletariat of Europe was already in a
political retreat all along the front, and that our task consisted not
in an armed insurrection but in a new orientation, in rear-guard
engagements, and in the strengthening of the party’s organizational
positions, above all in the trade unions.

In connection with the question of the “era,” a polemic arose over
Fascism, no less distorted and unscrupulous. The Opposition maintained
that the bourgeoisie advances its Fascist shoulder only at the moment
when an immediate revolutionary danger threatens the foundations of its
regime and when the normal organs of the bourgeois state prove
inadequate. In this sense active Fascism signifies a state of civil war
on the part of capitalist society waged against the rebelling
proletariat. Contrariwise, the bourgeoisie is forced to advance its
Left, the social democratic shoulder, either in a period that precedes
that of the civil war, so as to deceive, lull, and demoralize the
proletariat, or in a period following upon a serious and lasting victory
over the proletariat, i.e., when it is forced to lay hold of the broad
masses of the people parliamentarily, among them also the workers
disappointed by the revolution, in order to reestablish the normal
regime. In opposition to this analysis, which is absolutely irrefutable
theoretically and which was confirmed by the entire course of the
struggle, the leadership of the Comintern set up the senseless and
over-simplified contention of the _identity_ of the social democracy
with Fascism. Proceeding from the incontestable fact that the social
democracy is no less servile towards the foundations of bourgeois
society than Fascism and is always ready to volunteer its Noske at the
moment of danger, the leadership of the Comintern entirely expunged the
political difference between the social democracy and Fascism, and
together with that also the difference between a period of open civil
war and the period of the “normalization” of the class struggle. In a
word, everything was turned on its head, entangled and muddled up, only
in order to maintain the sham of an orientation upon the immediate
development of the civil war. Just as though nothing out of the ordinary
had happened in Germany and Europe in the Fall of 1923; an episode – and
that was all!

In order to show the course and the level of this polemic we must quote
from the article by Stalin _On the International Situation_ [23]:

“Many believe,” Stalin said, polemizing against me, “that the
bourgeoisie came to ‘pacifism’ and ‘democracy’ not out of necessity but
of its own free will, of free choice, so to speak.”

This basic historico-philosophical thesis which it is positively
embarrassing to dwell upon, is followed by two principal conclusions:

“First, it is false that Fascism is only a combat organization of the
bourgeoisie. Fascism is not merely a military-technical category [?!].”

It is incomprehensible why the combat organization of bourgeois society
must be considered a technical and not a political “category.” But what
is Fascism? Stalin’s indirect answer reads: “The social democracy is
objectively a moderate wing of Fascism.”

One might say that the social democracy is the Left wing of bourgeois
society and this definition would be quite correct if one does not
construe it so as to over-simplify it and thereby forget that the social
democracy still leads millions of workers behind it and within certain
limits is constrained to reckon not only with the will of its bourgeois
master but also with the interests of its deluded proletarian
constituency. But it is absolutely senseless to characterize the social
democracy as the “moderate wing of Fascism.” What becomes of bourgeois
society itself in that case? In order to orient oneself in the most
elementary manner in politics, one must not throw everything into a
single heap but instead distinguish between the social democracy and
Fascism which represent two poles of the bourgeois front – _united at
the moment of danger_ – but two _poles_, nevertheless. Is it still
necessary to emphasize this now, after the May 1928 elections,
characterized at one and the same time by the decline of Fascism and the
growth of the social democracy, to which, incidentally, the communist
party in this case, too, proposed a united front of the working class?

“Secondly,” the article continues: “it is falser that the decisive
battles have already occurred; that the proletariat has suffered a
defeat in these battles; and the bourgeoisie has become consolidated as
a result. The decisive struggles have not yet taken place at all, even
if [?] only because there have not been real Bolshevik mass parties as
yet.”

So, the bourgeoisie could not consolidate itself because there have been
no struggles as yet, and there have been no struggles “even if only”
because there has not yet been a Bolshevik party. Thus what hinders the
bourgeoisie from consolidating itself is … the absence of a Bolshevik
party. In reality, however, it was precisely the absence – not so much
of the party as of a Bolshevik leadership – that helped the bourgeoisie
to consolidate itself. If an army capitulates to the enemy in a critical
situation without a battle, then this capitulation completely takes the
place of a “decisive battle,” in politics as in war. Back in 1850 Engels
taught that a party which has missed a revolutionary situation
disappears from the scene for a long time. But is there anybody still
unaware that Engels, who lived “before imperialism,” is obsolete today?
So, Stalin writes as follows: “Without such [Bolshevik] parties no
struggles for the dictatorship are possible under the conditions of
imperialism.”

One is, therefore, compelled to assume that such struggles were quite
possible in the epoch of Engels, when the law of uneven development had
not yet been discovered.

This whole chain of thought is crowned, appropriately enough, by a
political prognosis:

“Finally, it is also false … that out of this ‘pacifism’ must arise the
consolidation of the power of the bourgeoisie and a postponement of the
revolution for an indeterminate period of time.”

Nevertheless, such a postponement did result, not according to Stalin,
it is true, but according to Engels. A year later, when it became clear
even to the blind that the position of the bourgeoisie had become
stronger and that the revolution was adjourned for an indefinite time,
Stalin set himself to accuse us of refusing to recognize stabilization.
This accusation became particularly insistent in the period when the
“stabilization” already began to crack anew, when a new revolutionary
wave drew near in England and China. And this whole hopeless muddle
served to fulfill the functions of a leading line ! It should be
remarked that the definition of Fascism and its relations to the social
democracy contained in the draft (Chapter 2), despite the ambiguities
deliberately introduced (so as to tie up the past), is far more rational
and correct than the schema of Stalin quoted above, which was
essentially the schema of the Fifth Congress. But this insignificant
step forward does not solve the question. A program of the Comintern,
after the experiences of the last decade, cannot be left without a
characterization of the revolutionary situation, of its origin and
disappearance, without pointing out the classic mistakes committed in
the evaluation of such a situation, without explaining how the
locomotive engineer must act at the curves, and without inculcating into
the parties the truth that there are such situations in which the
success of the world revolution depends upon two or three days of
struggle.

 

7. The Right Leaven of Ultra-Left Policy

After the period of turbulent high tide in 1923, began the period of a
long-lasting ebb. In the language of strategy this meant an orderly
retreat, rearguard battles, the strengthening of our positions within
the mass organizations, the re-inspection of our own ranks, and the
cleansing and sharpening of our theoretical and political weapons. This
position was branded as liquidationism. The latter concept, as well as
other concepts of the Bolshevik lexicon in late years, met with the
grossest abuse; there was no longer any teaching and training but only
the sowing of confusion and error. Liquidationism is the renunciation of
the revolution, the attempt to substitute the roads and methods of
reformism for the roads and methods of revolution. The Leninist policy
has nothing in common with liquidationism; but it has just as little to
do with a disregard of the changes in the objective situation and with
maintaining verbally the course towards the armed insurrection after the
revolution has already turned its back upon us, and when it is necessary
to resume the road of long, stubborn, systematic, and laborious work
among the masses in order to prepare the party for a new revolution
ahead.

On ascending the stairs a different type of movement is required from
that which is needed to descend. Most dangerous is such a situation as
finds a man, with the lights out, raising his foot to ascend when the
steps bkfore him lead downward. Falls, injuries, and dislocations are
then inevitable. The leadership of the Comintern in 1924 did everything
in its power to suppress both the criticism of the experiences of the
German October and all criticism in general. And it kept stubbornly
repeating: the workers are heading directly for the revolution – the
stairs lead upward. Small wonder that the directives of the Fifth
Congress, applied during the revolutionary ebb, led to cruel political
falls and dislocations!

Number 5-6 of the INFORMATION BULLETIN OF THE GERMAN OPPOSITION, March
1, 1927, stated:

“The greatest mistakes of the Lefts at this party congress [the
Frankfurt Congress in the spring of 1924, when they took over the
leadership], consisted in their _not speaking relentlessly enough to the
party of the gravity of the defeat of 1923; in their not drawing the
necessary conclusions, in not explaining to the party, soberly and
without embellishment, the tendencies of relative stabilization of
capitalism, and in not formulating a corresponding program for the
impending period with its struggles and slogans_. It was entirely
possible to do this and to underscore sharply the theses of the program,
as was correct and absolutely necessary.”

These lines were to us an indication at that time that a section of the
German Left, who participated during the Fifth Congress in the struggle
against our alleged “liquidationism,” had seriously understood the
lessons of 1924-25. And this brought us subsequently closer on the basis
of principle.

The key year of the _sharp turn in the situation was the year_ 1924. Yet
the recognition that this sharp turn had occurred (“stabilization”)
followed only a year and a half later. It is hardly astonishing,
therefore, that the years 1924-1925 were the years of Left mistakes and
putschist experiments. The Bulgarian terrorist adventure, like the
tragic history of the Esthonian armed uprising of December 1924, was an
outburst of despair resulting from a false orientation. The fact that
these attempts to rape the historical process by means of a putsch were
left without a critical investigation led to a relapse in Canton towards
the end of 1927. In politics not even the smallest mistakes pass
unpunished, much less the big ones. And the greatest mistake is to cover
up mistakes, seeking mechanically to suppress criticism and a correct
Marxian evaluation of the mistakes.

We are not writing a history of the Comintern for the last five years.
We bring here only a factual illustration of the two strategical lines
at the fundamental stages of this period, and at the same time an
illustration of the lifelessness of the draft program for which all
these questions do not even exist. We cannot, therefore, give here a
description, however general, of the inextricable contradictions which
befell the parties of the Comintern, placed between the directives of
the Fifth Congress on the one hand and political reality on the other.
Of course, not everywhere were the contradictions resolved by such fatal
convulsions as was the case in Bulgaria and Esthonia in 1924. But always
and everywhere the parties felt themselves bound, failed to respond to
the aspirations of the masses, went about with eye-flaps, and stumbled.
In the purely party propaganda and agitation, in the work in the trade
unions, on the parliamentary tribune – everywhere the communists had to
drag the heavy ball and chain of the false position of the Fifth
Congress. Each party, to a lesser or greater degree, fell a victim of
the false points of departure. Each chased after phantoms, ignored the
real processes, transformed revolutionary slogans into noisy phrases,
compromised itself in the eyes of the masses and lost all the ground
under its feet. To crown all this, the press of the Comintern was, then
as now, deprived of every possibility of assembling, arranging, and
publishing facts and figures on the work of the communist parties in
recent years. After the defeats, mistakes, and failures, the epigone
leadership prefers to execute the retreat and to deal with opponents
with all lights turned out.

Finding itself in a cruel and constantly growing contradiction with real
factors, the leadership has had to cling ever more to fictitious
factors. Losing the ground under its feet the ECCI was constrained to
discover revolutionary forces and signs where there were no traces of
any. To maintain its balance, it had to clutch at rotten ropes.

In proportion as obvious and growing shifts to the night were going on
in the proletariat, there began in the Comintern the phase of idealizing
the peasantry, a wholly uncritical exaggeration of every symptom of its
“break” with bourgeois society, an embellishment of every ephemeral
peasant organization and a downright adulation of “peasant” demagogues.

The _task_ of a long and stubborn struggle of the proletarian vanguard
against the bourgeoisie and pseudo-peasant demagoguery for influence
over the most disinherited strata of the peasant poor was being more and
more displaced by the _hope_ that the peasantry would play a direct and
an independent revolutionary role on a national as well as on an
international scale.

During 1924, i.e., in the course of the basic gear of the
“stabilization,” the communist press was filled with absolutely
fantastic data on the strength of the recently organized Peasants’
International. Dombal, its representative, reported that the Peasants’
International, six months after its formation, already embraced several
million members.

Then there was enacted the scandalous incident with Radic, who was the
leader of the Croatian Peasants” Party and who, _en route_ from Green
Zagreb, thought it advisable to show himself in Red Moscow in order to
strengthen his chances to become minister in White Belgrade. On July 9,
1924, Zinoviev in his report to the Leningrad party workers on the
results of the Fifth Congress, told of his new “victory”:

“At this moment important shifts are taking place within the peasantry.
You have all probably heard of the Croatian Peasants’ party of Radic.
Radic is now in Moscow. He – is a real leader of the people … Behind
Radic stands united the entire poor and middle peasantry of Croatia …
Radic now has decided in the name of his party to join the Peasants’
International. We consider this a very important event … The formation
of the Peasants’ International is an event of the greatest importance.
Certain comrades did not believe that a large organization would grow
out of it … Now we are getting a great auxiliary mass – the peasantry …”
[24]

And so forth and so on, and more of it.

The leader, LaFollette, corresponded, on the other side of the ocean, to
the “genuine people’s leader,” Radic. The representative of the
Comintern, Pepper, in order to set the “auxiliary mass” – the American
farmers – into motion at an accelerated tempo, drew the young and weak
American Communist Party onto the senseless and infamous adventure of
creating a “Farmer-Labor party” around LaFollette in order to overthrow
quickly American capitalism.

The glad tidings of the proximity of the revolution in the United States
based on the farmers filled the speeches and articles of the official
leaders of the ECCI at that time. At a session of the Fifth Congress,
Kolarov reported:

“In the United States the small farmers have founded a Farmer-Labor
party, which is becoming ever more radical, drawing closer to the
communists, and becoming permeated with the idea of the creation of a
workers’ and peasants’ government in the United States.” [25]

No more, no less!

From Nebraska came Green – one of the leaders of LaFollette’s
organization – to the Peasants’ Congress in Moscow. Green also “joined”
something or other, and then, as is customary, he later assisted at the
St. Paul conference in laying low the communist party when it made a
feeble attempt to proceed to the realization of Pepper’s great plans –
the same Pepper who was counsellor to Count Karolyi, an extreme Left
winger at the Third Congress, a reformer of Marxism, one of those who
slit the throat of the revolution in Hungary.

In its issue of August 29, 1929, PRAVDA complained:

“The American proletariat _en masse_ has not even risen to the level of
consciousness of the need for even so collaborationist a party as the
English Labour Party is.”

And about a month and a half previously, Zinoviev reported to the
Leningrad party workers:

“_Several million farmers are being voluntarily or involuntarily pushed
by the agrarian crisis all at once [!] to the side of the working
class._” [26]

“And to a workers’ and peasants’ government!” immediately added Kolarov.

The press kept repeating that a Farmer-Labor party would soon be formed
in America, “not a purely proletarian, but a class” Farmer-Labor party
for the overthrow of capitalism. What the “not a proletarian, but class”
character was supposed to mean, no astrologist on either side of the
ocean could possibly explain. In the long run it was only a Pepperized
edition of the idea of a “two-class workers’ and peasants’ party,” of
which we will have occasion to speak again in greater detail in
connection with the lessons of the Chinese revolution. Suffice here to
remark that this reactionary idea of non-proletarian but class parties
arose entirely from the pseudo-“Left” policy of 1924 which, losing the
ground from under its feet, clutched at Radic, LaFollette, and the
inflated figures of the Peasants’ International.

“We are now witnessing,” retailed the academician of commonplaces,
Miliutin, “an extraordinarily important and significant process of the
splitting away of the peasant masses from the bourgeoisie, of the
peasantry on march against the bourgeoisie, and of the increasing
strengthening of the united front between the peasantry and the working
class in the capitalist countries in struggle against the capitalist
system.” [27]

In the course of the whole year of 1924, the press of the Comintern did
not weary of telling about the universal “radicalization of the peasant
masses,” as though something independent could be expected from this, in
most cases, only imaginary radicalization of the peasants in a period
when the workers were obviously moving to the Right, when the social
democracy grew in strength and the bourgeoisie consolidated its
position!

We encounter the same failing in political vision towards the end of
1927 and the beginning of 1928 with regard to China. After every great
and deep-going revolutionary crisis, in which the proletariat suffers a
decisive and long-lasting defeat, the spurts of ferment still continue
for a long time among the semi-proletarian urban and rural masses, as
the circles spread in the water after a stone has fallen in. Whenever a
leadership ascribes an independent significance to these circles and,
contrary to the processes within the working class, interprets them as
symptoms of an approaching revolution, bear well in mind that this is an
infallible sign that the leadership is heading towards adventures,
similar to those in Esthonia, or Bulgaria in 1924 or Canton in 1927.

During the same period of ultra-Leftism, the Chinese Communist Party was
driven for several years into the Kuomintang, which was characterized by
the Fifth Congress as a “sympathizing party” [28], without any serious
attempt to define its class character. As we proceed, we find that the
idealization of “the national revolutionary bourgeoisie” became greater
and greater. Thus, in the Orient, the false Left course, with its eyes
shut and burning with impatience, laid the foundation for the subsequent
opportunism. It was Martinov himself who was called upon to formulate
the opportunist line. Martinov was all the more reliable a counsellor of
the Chinese proletariat for having himself tailed behind the petty
bourgeoisie during the three Russian revolutions.

In the hunt after an artificial acceleration of the periods, not only
were Radical, LaFollette, the peasant millions of Dombal, and even
Pepper clutched at, but a basically false perspective was also built up
for England. The weaknesses of the English Communist Party gave birth at
that time to the necessity of replacing it as quickly as possible with a
more imposing factor. Precisely then was born the false estimate of the
tendencies in English trade unionism. Zinoviev gave us to understand
that he counted upon the revolution finding an entrance, not through the
narrow gateway of the British Communist Party, but through the broad
portals of the trade unions. The struggle to win the masses organized in
the trade unions through the communist party was replaced by the hope
for the swiftest possible utilization of the ready-made apparatus of the
trade unions for the purposes of the revolution. Out of this false
position sprang the later policy of the Anglo-Russian Committee, which
dealt a blow to the Soviet Union, as well as to the English working
class; a blow surpassed only by the defeat in China.

In the LESSONS OF OCTOBER, written as early as the summer of 1929, the
idea of an accelerated road – accelerated through friendship with
Pummelled and Cook, as the further development of this idea showed – is
refuted as follows:

“Without the party, independently of the party, skipping over the party,
through a substitute for the party, the proletarian revolution can never
triumph. That is the principal lesson of the last decade. To be sure,
the English trade unions can become a powerful lever of the proletarian
revolution. They can, for example, under certain conditions and for a
certain period, even replace the workers’ Soviets. But they cannot play
such a role without the communist party and certainly not against it,
but only provided that communist influence in the trade unions becomes
decisive. We have paid too dearly for this conclusion as _to the role
and significance of the party for the proletarian revolution to renounce
it so lightly or even to have it weakened._“ [29]

The same problem is posed on a wider scale in my book WHITHER ENGLAND?
This book, from beginning to end, is devoted to proving the idea that
the English revolution, too, cannot avoid the portals of communism and
that with a correct, courageous, and intransigent policy which steers
clear of any illusions with regard to detours, the English Communist
Party can grow by leaps and bounds and mature so as to be equal in the
course of a few years to the tasks before it.

The Left illusions of 1924 rose thanks to the Right leaven. In order to
conceal the significance of the mistakes and defeats of 1923 from others
as well as from oneself, the process of the swing to the Right that was
taking place in the proletariat had to be denied and revolutionary
processes within the other classes optimistically exaggerated. That was
the beginning of the down-sliding from the proletarian line to the
centrist, that is, to the petty bourgeois line which, in the course of
the increasing stabilization, was to liberate itself from its ultra-left
shell and reveal itself as a crude collaborationist line in the USSR, in
China, in England, in Germany, and everywhere else.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

4. PRAVDA, Jan. 25, 1924.

5. PRAVDA, Feb. 2, 1924.

6. PRAVDA, February 7, 1924.

7. PRAVDA, April 20, 1924.

8. PRAVDA, April 19, 1924.

9. PRAVDA, June 22, 1924.

10. PRAVDA, June 24, 1924.

11. PRAVDA, June 24, 1924.

12. PRAVDA, June 24, 1924.

13. PRAVDA, June 24, 1924.

14. PRAVDA, June 25, 1924.

15. Speech of comrade Kolarov at the Fifth Congress.

16. PRAVDA, June 28, 1924.

17. WHITHER ENGLAND?.

18. PRAVDA, June 22, 1924.

19. PRAVDA, Feb. 7, 1924.

20. PRAVDA, Feb. 2, 1924.

21. PRAVDA, June 22, 1924.

22. PRAVDA, July 1, 1924.

23. PRAVDA, Sept. 20, 1924.

24. PRAVDA, July 22, 1924.

25. PRAVDA, July 6, 1924.

26. PRAVDA, July 22, 1924.

27. PRAVDA, July 27, 1924.

28. PRAVDA, June 25, 1924.

29. Trotsky, WORKS, Vol.III, part 1, p.9.

The Third International After Lenin



II. STRATEGY AND TACTICS IN THE IMPERIALIST EPOCH (PART 3)


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

8. The Period of Right-Centrist Down-Sliding

The policy of the most important communist parties, attuned to the Fifth
Congress, very soon revealed its complete inefficacy. The mistakes of
pseudo-“leftism” which hampered the development of the communist
parties, later gave an impetus to new empirical zigzags: namely, to an
accelerated sliding down to the Right. A cat burned by hot milk shies
away from cold water. The “Left” Central Committees of a number of
parties were deposed as violently as they had been constituted prior to
the Fifth Congress. The adventurist Leftism gave way to an open
opportunism of the Right-Centrist type. To comprehend the character and
the tempo of this organizational Rightward swing, it must be recalled
that Stalin, the director of this turn, back in September 1924 appraised
the passing of party leadership to Maslow, Ruth Fischer, Treint, Suzanne
Girault, and others, as the expression of the Bolshevization of the
parties and an answer to the demands of the Bolshevik workers who are
marching toward the revolution and “want revolutionary leaders.

Stalin wrote, “The last half year is remarkable in the sense that it
presents a radical turning point in the life of the communist parties of
the West, in the sense that the social democratic survivals were
decisively liquidated, the party cadres Bolshevized, and the opportunist
elements isolated.” [30]

But ten months later the genuine “Bolsheviks” and “revolutionary
leaders” were declared social democrats and renegades, ousted from
leadership and driven out of the party.

Despite the panicky character of this change of leaders, frequently
effected by resorting to rude and disloyal mechanical measures of the
apparatus, it is impossible to draw any rigorous ideological line of
demarcation between the phase of ultra-left policy and the period of
opportunistic down-sliding that followed it.

In the questions of industry and the peasantry in the USSR, of the
colonial bourgeoisie, of “peasant” parties in the capitalist countries,
of socialism in one country, of the role of the party in the proletarian
revolution, the revisionist tendencies already appeared in fullest bloom
in 1924-25, cloaked with the banner of the struggle against
“Trotskyism,” and they found their most distinctly opportunist
expression in the resolutions of the conference of the CPSU in April
1925.

Taken as a whole, the course to the Right was the attempt at a
half-blind, purely empirical, and belated adaptation to the set-back of
revolutionary development caused by the defeat of 1923. Bukharin’s
initial formulation, as has already been mentioned, was based on the
“permanent” development of the revolution in the most literal and the
most mechanical sense of the term. Bukharin granted no “breathing
spaces,” interruptions, or retreats of any kind; he considered it a
revolutionary duty to continue the “offensive” under all circumstances.

The above quoted article of Stalin, _On the International Situation_,
which is a sort of program and which marks Stalin’s debut on
international questions, demonstrates that the second author of the
draft program also professed the very same purely mechanical “Left”
conception during the initial period of the struggle against
“Trotskyism.” For this conception there existed always and unalterably
only the social democracy that was “disintegrating,” workers who were
becoming “radicalized,” communist parties that were “growing,” and the
revolution that was “approaching.” And anybody who looked around and
tried to distinguish things was and is a “liquidator.”

This “tendency” required a year and a half to sense something new after
the break in the situation in Europe in 1923 so as then to transform
itself, panic-stricken, into its opposite. The leadership oriented
itself without any synthesized understanding of our epoch and its inner
tendencies, only by groping (Stalin) and by supplementing the
fragmentary conclusions thus obtained with scholastic schemes renovated
for each occasion (Bukharin). The political line as a whole, therefore,
represents a chain of zigzags. The ideological line is a kaleidoscope of
schemes tending to push to absurdity every segment of the Stalinist
zigzag.

The Sixth Congress would act correctly if it decided to elect a special
commission in order to compile all the theories created by Bukharin and
intended by him to serve as a basis, say, for all the stages of the
Anglo-Russian Committee; these theories would have to be compiled
chronologically and arranged systematically so as to draw a fever chart
of the ideas contained in them. It would be a most instructive
strategical diagram. The same also holds for the Chinese revolution, the
economic development of the USSR, and all other less important
questions. _Blind empiricism multiplied by scholasticism_ – such is the
course that still awaits merciless condemnation.

The effects of this course showed themselves most fatally in the three
most important questions: in the internal policy of the USSR; the
Chinese revolution; and in the Anglo-Russian Committee. The effects were
in the same direction, but less obvious and less fatal in their
immediate consequences, in all the other questions of the policies of
the Comintern in general.

As regards the internal questions of the USSR, a sufficiently exhaustive
characterization of the policy of downsliding is given in the PLATFORM
OF THE BOLSHEVIK-LENINISTS (OPPOSITION). We must limit ourselves here
merely to this reference to the latter. The PLATFORM, now receives an
apparently most unexpected confirmation in the fact that all the
attempts of the present leadership of the CPSU to escape from the
consequences of the policy of the years 1923 to 1928 are based upon
almost literal quotations from the PLATFORM, the authors and adherents
of which are dispersed in prisons and exile. The fact, however, that the
present leaders have recourse to the PLATFORM only in sections and bits,
without putting two and two together, makes the new Left turn extremely
unstable and uncertain; but at the same time it invests the PLATFORM
with a greater value than ever as the generalized expression of a real
Leninist course.

In the PLATFORM, the question of the Chinese revolution is dealt with
very insufficiently, incompletely, and in part positively falsely by
Zinoviev. Because of the decisive importance of this question for the
Comintern, we are obliged to subject it to a more detailed investigation
in a separate chapter. (See Section III.)

As to the Anglo-Russian Committee, the third most important question
from the strategical experiences of the Comintern in recent years, there
only remains for us, after all that has already been said by the
Opposition in a series of articles, speeches, and theses, to make a
brief summary.

The point of departure of the Anglo-Russian Committee, as we have
already seen, was the impatient urge to leap over the young and too
slowly developing communist party. This invested the entire experience
with a false character even prior to the general strike.

The Anglo-Russian Committee was looked upon not as an episodic bloc at
the tops which would have to be broken and which would inevitably and
demonstratively be broken at the very first serious test in order to
compromise the General Council. No, not only Stalin, Bukharin, Tomsky,
and others, but also Zinoviev saw in it a long lasting “co-partnership”
– an instrument for the systematic revolutionization of the English
working masses, and if not the gate, at least an approach to the gate
through which would stride the revolution of the English proletariat.
The further it went, the more the Anglo-Russian Committee became
transformed from an episodic alliance into an inviolable principle
standing above the real class struggle. This became revealed at the time
of the general strike.

The transition of the mass movement into the open revolutionary stage
threw back into the camp of the bourgeois reaction those liberal labor
politicians who had become somewhat Left. They betrayed the general
strike openly and deliberately; after which they undermined and betrayed
the miners’ strike. The possibility of betrayal is always contained in
reformism. But this does not mean to say that reformism and betrayal are
one and the same thing at every moment. Not quite. Temporary agreements
may be made with the reformists whenever they take a step forward. But
to maintain a bloc with them when, frightened by the development of a
movement, they commit treason, is equivalent to criminal toleration of
traitors and a veiling of betrayal.

The general strike had the task of exerting a united pressure upon the
employers and the state with the power of the five million workers, for
the question of the coal mining industry had become the most important
question of state policy. Thanks to the betrayal of the leadership, the
strike was broken in its first stage. It was a great illusion to
continue in the belief that an isolated economic strike of the mine
workers would alone achieve what the general strike did not achieve.
_That is precisely where the power of the General Council lay_. It aimed
with cold calculation at the defeat of the mine workers, as a result of
which considerable sections of the workers would be convinced of the
“correctness” and the “reasonableness” of the Judas directives of the
General Council.

The maintenance of the amicable bloc with the General Council, and the
simultaneous support of the protracted and isolated economic strike of
the mine workers, which the General Council came out against, seemed, as
it were, to be calculated beforehand to allow the heads of the trade
unions to emerge from this heaviest test with the least possible losses.

The role of the Russian trade unions here, from the revolutionary
standpoint, turned out to be very disadvantageous and positively
pitiable. Certainly, support of an economic strike, even an isolated
one, was absolutely necessary. There can be no two opinions on that
among revolutionists. But this support should have borne not only a
financial but also a revolutionary-political character. The All-Russian
Central Council of Trade Unions should have declared openly to the
English mine workers’ union and the whole English working class that the
mine workers’ strike could seriously count upon success only if by its
stubornness, its tenacity, and its scope, it could prepare the way for a
_new outbreak of the general strike_. That could have been achieved only
by an open and direct struggle against the General Council, the agency
of the government and the mine owners. The struggle to convert the
economic strike into a political strike should have signified,
therefore, a furious political and organizational war against the
General Council. The first step to such a war had to be the break with
the Anglo-Russian Committee. which had become a reactionary obstacle, a
chain on the feet of the working class.

No revolutionist who weighs his words will contend that a victory _would
have been guaranteed_ by proceeding along this line. But a victory was
_possible_ only on this road. A defeat on this road was a defeat on a
road that could lead _later_ to victory. Such a defeat educates, that
is, strengthens the revolutionary ideas in the working class. In the
meantime, mere financial support of the lingering and hopeless trade
union strike (trade union strike’in its methods;
revolutionary-political’in its aims), only meant grist to the mill of
the General Council, which was biding calmly until the strike collapsed
from starvation and thereby proved its own “correctness.” Of course, the
General Council could not easily bide its time for several months in the
role of an open strike-breaker. It was precisely during this very
critical period that the General Council required the Anglo-Russian
Committee as its political screen from the masses. Thus, the questions
of the mortal class struggle between English capital and the
proletariat, between the General Council and the mine workers, were
transformed, as it were, into questions of a friendly discussion between
allies in the same bloc, the English General Council and the All-Russian
Central Council of Trade Unions, on the subject of which of the two
roads was better at that moment: the road of an agreement, or the road
of an isolated economic struggle. The inevitable outcome of the strike
led to the agreement, that is, tragically settled the friendly
“discussion” in favor of the General Council.

From beginning to end, the entire policy of the Anglo-Russian Committee,
because of its false line, provided only aid to the General Council.
Even the fact that the strike was long sustained financially by the
great self-sacrifice on the part of the Russian working class, did not
serve the mine workers or the English Communist Party, but the self-same
General Council. As the upshot of the greatest revolutionary movement in
England since the days of Chartism, the English Communist Party has
hardly grown while the General Council sits in the saddle even more
firmly than before the general strike.

Such are the results of this unique “strategical maneuver.”

The obstinacy evinced in retaining the bloc with the General Council,
which led to downright servility at the disgraceful Berlin session in
April 1927, was explained away by the ever recurring reference to the
very same “stabilization.” If there is a setback in the development of
the revolution, then, you see, one is forced to cling to Purcell. This
argument, which appeared very profound to a Soviet functionary or to a
trade unionist of the type of Melnichansky, is in reality a perfect
example of blind empiricism’adulterated by scholasticism at that. What
was the significance of “stabilization” in relation to English economy
and politics, especially in the years 1926-1927? Did it signify the
development of the productive forces? The improvement of the economic
situation? Better hopes for the future? Not at all. The whole so-called
stabilization of English capitalism is maintained only upon the
conservative forces of the old labor organizations with all their
currents and shadings in the face of the weakness and irresolutely of
the English Communist Party. On the field of the economic and social
relations of England, the revolution has already fully matured. The
question stands purely politically. The basic props of the stabilization
are the heads of the Labour Party and the trade unions, which, in
England, constitute a single unit but which operate through a division
of labor.

Given such a condition of the working masses as was revealed by the
general strike, the highest post in the mechanism of capitalist
stabilization is no longer occupied by MacDonald and Thomas, but by
Pugh, Purcell, Cook, and Co. They do the work and Thomas adds the
finishing touches. Without Purcell, Thomas would be left hanging in
mid-air and along with Thomas also Baldwin. The chief brake upon the
English revolution is the false, diplomatic masquerade “Leftism” of
Purcell which fraternizes sometimes in rotation, sometimes
simultaneously with churchmen and Bolsheviks and which is always ready
not only for retreats but also for betrayal. _Stabilization is
Purcellism_. From this we see what depths of theoretical absurdity and
blind opportunism are expressed in the reference to the existence of
“stabilization” in order to justify the political bloc with Purcell.
Yet, precisely in order to shatter the “stabilization,” Purcellism had
first to be destroyed. In such a situation, even a shadow of solidarity
with the General Council was the greatest crime and infamy against the
working masses.

Even the most correct strategy cannot, by itself, always lead to
victory. The correctness of a strategical plan is verified by whether it
follows the line of the actual development of class forces and whether
it estimates the elements of this development realistically. The gravest
and most disgraceful defeat which has the most fatal consequences for
the movement is the typically Menshevist defeat, due to a false estimate
of the classes, an underestimation of the revolutionary factors, and an
idealization of the enemy forces. Such were our defeats in China and in
England.

What was expected from the Anglo-Russian Committee for the USSR?

In July 1926, Stalin lectured to us at the joint plenum of the Central
Committee and the Central Control Commission as follows:

“The task of this bloc [the Anglo-Russian Committee] consists in
organizing a broad movement of the working class against new imperialist
wars and generally against an intervention in our country (especially)
on the part of the mightiest of the imperialist powers of Europe, on the
part of England in particular.”

While he was instructing us, Oppositionists, to the effect that “care
must be taken to defend the first workers’ republic of the world against
intervention” (we, naturally, are unaware of this), Stalin added:

“If the reactionary trade unions of England are ready to conclude a bloc
with the revolutionary trade unions of our country against the
counter-revolutionary imperialists of their own country, then why should
we not hail such a bloc?”

If the “reactionary trade unions” were capable of conducting a struggle
against their own imperialists they would not he reactionary. Stalin is
incapable of distinguishing any longer between the conceptions
_reactionary_ and _revolutionary_. He characterizes the English trade
unions as reactionary as a matter of routine but in reality he
entertains miserable illusions with regard to their “revolutionary
spirit.”

After Stalin, the Moscow Committee of our party lectured to the workers
of Moscow:

“The Anglo-Russian Committee can, must, and will undoubtedly play an
enormous role in the struggle against all possible interventions
directed against the USSR It will become the organizing center of the
international forces of the proletariat for the struggle against every
attempt of the international bourgeoisie to provoke a new war.” [31]

What did the Opposition reply? We said:

“The more acute the international situation becomes, the more the
Anglo-Russian Committee will be transformed into a weapon of British and
international imperialism.”

This criticism of the Stalinist hopes in Purcell as the guardian angel
of the workers’ state was characterized by Stalin at the very same
plenum as a deviation “from Leninism to Trotskyism.”

VOROSHILOV: “Correct.”

A VOICE: “Voroshilov has affixed his seal to it.”

TROTSKY: “Fortunately all this will be in the Minutes.”

Yes, all this is to be found in the Minutes of the July plenum at which
the blind, rude, and disloyal opportunists dared to accuse the
Opposition of “defeatism.”

This dialogue which I am compelled to quote briefly from my earlier
article,”’ _What We Gave and What We Got_, is far more useful as a
strategical lesson than the entire sophomoric chapter on strategy in the
draft program. The question – _what we gave (and expected) and what we
got?_ – is in general the principal criterion in strategy. It must be
applied at the Sixth Congress to all questions that have been on the
agenda in recent years. It will then be revealed conclusively that the
strategy of the ECCI, especially since the year 1926, was a strategy of
imaginary sums, false calculations, illusions with regard to the enemy,
and persecutions of the most reliable and unwavering militants. In a
word, it was the rotten strategy of Right-Centrism.

 

 9. The Maneuverist Character of Revolutionary Strategy

At first sight, it appears incomprehensible why the “maneuvering” and
“flexibility” of Bolshevik strategy are passed over in complete silence
in the draft. Out of this entire vast question only a single point is
taken’the point on agreements with the colonial bourgeoisie.

Yet, the opportunism of the recent period, zigzagging ever more deeply
to the Right, has advanced primarily under the banner of _maneuver_
strategy. The refusal to concur with unprincipled compromises which,
because of this very fact, were harmful in practise, was characterized
as lack of “flexibility.” The majority declared its basic principle to
be the maneuver. Zinoviev maneuvered back in 1925 with Radic and
LaFollette. Stalin and Bukhrarin thereafter maneuvered with Chiang
Kai-shek, with Purcell, and with the kulaks. The apparatus continually
maneuvered with the party. Zinoviev and Ramenev are now maneuvering with
the apparatus.

A whole corps of specialists in maneuvers for bureaucratic requirement
arose which consists predominantly of people who never were
revolutionary fighters, and who now bow all the more ardently before the
revolution after it has already conquered power. Borodin maneuvers in
Canton. Rafes in Peking, D. Petrovsky maneuvers around the English
Channel, Pepper maneuvers in the United States, but Pepper can maneuver
in Polynesia, too; Martinov maneuvers from a distance, but to make up
for it he does it in every corner of the globe. Whole broods of young
academicians in maneuvers have been brought up who approach Bolshevik
flexibility mainly by the elasticity of their own spines. The task of
this school of strategy consists in obtaining through maneuvers what can
be won only through revolutionary class forces. Just as every alchemist
of the Middle Ages hoped, in spite of the failure of others, to make
gold, so the present-day strategists in maneuvers also hope, each in his
place, to deceive history. In the nature of things, of course, they are
not strategists but only bureaucratic combinationists of all statures,
save the great. Some of them, having observed how the Master settled
petty questions, imagine that they have mastered the secrets of
strategy. That is precisely the essence of epigonism. Others, again,
obtained the secrets of combinationism at second and third hand, and
after becoming convinced that with them wonders are sometimes achieved
in small matters, they concluded that these methods are all the more
applicable to great matters. Yet, all attempts to apply the method of
bureaucratic combinations as being “more economic” in comparison with
the revolutionary struggles in order to solve great questions, have led
invariably to disgraceful failures, in addition to which,
combinationism, armed with the apparatus of the party and of the state,
each time broke the spine of the young parties and the young
revolutions. Chiang Kai-shek, Wang Ching-wei, Purcell, the kulaks’all
these have up to now emerged as victors from the attempts to deal with
them by means of “maneuvers.”

Naturally, this does not mean to say that maneuvers are impermissible in
general, that is, incompatible with the revolutionary strategy of the
working class. But it must be clearly understood that maneuvers can bear
only a subordinated, auxiliary, and expedient character in relation to
the basic methods of revolutionary struggle. Once and for all it must be
grasped that a maneuver can never decide anything in great matters. If
combinations appear to solve something in small affairs, it is always at
the expense of great matters. A correct maneuver can only facilitate the
solution by providing the possibility of gaining time or of attaining
greater results with smaller forces. It is impossible to escape from
fundamental difficulties by means of a maneuver.

The contradiction between the proletariat and the bourgeoisie is a
fundamental one. That is why the attempt to bridle the Chinese
bourgeoisie by means of organizational and personal maneuvers and to
compel it to submit to combinationist plans is not a maneuver but
contemptible self-deception, even though it be colossal in scope.
Classes cannot be tricked. This applies, considered historically, to all
the classes and it is particularly and immediately true of the ruling,
possessing, exploiting, and educated classes. The world experience of
the latter is so great, their class instinct so refined, and their
organs of espionage so varied that an attempt to deceive them by posing
as somebody else must lead in reality to trapping, not the enemy, but
one’s own friends.

The contradiction between the USSR and the capitalist world is a
fundamental one. There is no escape from it by way of maneuvers. By
means of clear and candidly acknowledged concessions to capital, and by
utilizing the contradictions between its various sections, the breathing
spell can be extended and time gained, but even this, only under certain
historical conditions, and by no means under any and all circumstances.
It is gross self-deception to believe that the international bourgeoisie
can be “neutralized” until the construction of socialism, that is, that
the fundamental contradictions can be overcome with the aid of a
maneuver. Such self-deception may cost the Soviet republic its head.
Only the international proletarian revolution can liberate us from the
fundamental contradiction.

A maneuver can consist either of a concession to the enemy, or an
agreement with a temporary and, therefore, always dubious ally, or a
well-timed retreat calculated to keep the enenly from our throat, or,
finally, the raising of partial demands and slogans in such succession
as to split the enemy camp. These are the principal varieties of
maneuvers. Others might be mentioned, secondary ones. But every maneuver
is by its nature only an episode in relation to the fundamental
strategical line of the struggle. In maneuvering with the Kuomintang and
the Anglo-Russian Committee, these must always be kept in mind as the
perfect examples of a Menshevik and not a Bolshevik maneuver. What
occurred was just the reverse. What should have been only a tactical
episode developed there into a strategical line and the real strategic
task (the struggle against the bourgeoisie and the reformists) was
atomized into a series of second-rate and petty tactical episodes which,
moreover, were only decorative in character.

In a maneuver, one must always proceed from the worst and not the best
assumptions with regard to the adversary to whom concessions are made,
or the unreliable ally with whom an agreement is concluded. It must be
constantly borne in mind that the ally can become an enemy on the
morrow. This applies even to such an ally as the peasantry:

“We must be distrustful towards the peasantry, always organize ourselves
separately from it, and be ready for a struggle against it, in so far as
the peasantry shows itself to be reactionary or anti-proletarian.” [32]

This does not at all contradict the great strategically task of the
proletariat which Lenin worked out for the first time theoretically as
well as practically with such gifted profundity, the task of tearing the
exploited layers of poor peasants away from the influence of the
bourgeoisie and Leading them after us. But the alliance between the
proletariat and the peasantry is by no means given ready-made by history
and it cannot be created by means of oily maneuvers, contemptible
attempts at wheedling, and pathetic declamations. The alliance between
the proletariat and the peasantry is a question of the political
relation of forces and consequently of the complete independence of the
proletariat in relation to _all_ other classes. The ally must first be
educated. This can be achieved, on the one hand, by paying great
attention to all its progressive and historical needs, and, on the other
hand, by displaying an organized distrust towards the ally, and fighting
tirelessly and relentlessly against its every anti-proletarian tendency
and custom.

The import and the limits of a maneuver must always be clearly
considered and demarcated. A concession must be called a concession, and
a retreat a retreat. It is infinitely less dangerous to exaggerate one’s
own concessions and retreats than to underestimate them. The vigilance
of the class and the organized distrust of our own party must be
maintained and not lulled.

The essential instrument of a maneuver, as in every historical action of
the working class in general, is the party. But the party is not simply
a tractable instrument in the hand of the “masters” of the maneuver, but
a conscious and self-acting instrument, the highest expression of
proletarian self-action in general. Therefore, every maneuver must be
clearly grasped by the party itself throughout its application. In
question here are, of course, not diplomatic, military, or
conspiratorial secrets, that is, not the _technique_ of the struggle of
the proletarian state or of the proletarian party under capitalist
conditions. In question here is the _political_ content of the maneuver.
That is why the whispered explanations to the effect that the course of
1924 to 1928 towards the kulaks was a great maneuver, are absurd and
criminal. There is no deceiving the kulak. He does not judge by words
but by deeds, by taxes, prices, and net profit. However, one’s own
party’the working class and the peasant poor’can very well be deceived.
Nothing is so calculated to disintegrate the revolutionary spirit of the
proletarian party as unprincipled maneuvering and combinationism behind
its back.

The most important, best established, and most unalterable rule to apply
in every maneuver reads: you must never dare to merge, mix, or combine
your own party organization with an alien one, even though the latter be
most “sympathetic” today. Undertake no such steps as lead directly or
indirectly, openly or maskedly, to the subordination of your party to
other parties, or to organizations of other classes, or constrict the
freedom of your own agitation, or your responsibility, even if only in
part, for the political line of other parties. You shall not mix up the
banners, let alone kneel before another banner.

It is the worst and most dangerous thing if a maneuver arises out of the
impatient opportunistic endeavor to outstrip the development of one’s
own party and to leap over the necessary stages of its development (it
is precisely here that no stages must be leaped over), by binding,
combining, and uniting superficially, fraudulently, diplomatically,
through combinations and trickery, organizations and elements that pull
in opposite directions. Such experiments, always dangerous, are fatal to
young and weak parties.

In a maneuver, as in a battle, what decides is not strategical wisdom
alone (still less, the cunning of combinationists), but the relationship
of forces. Even a correctly contrived maneuver is, generally speaking,
all the more dangerous for a revolutionary party, the younger and weaker
the latter is in relation to its enemies, allies, and semi-allies. That
is why’and we arrive here at a point which is of paramount importance
for the Comintern’the Bolshevik party did not at all begin with
maneuvering as a panacea but came to it, grew into it in the measure
that it sunk its roots deeply into the working class, became strong
politically and matured ideologically.

The misfortune lies precisely in the fact that the epigones of Bolshevik
strategy extol maneuvers and flexibility to the young communist parties
as the quintessence of this strategy, thereby tearing them away from
their historical axis and principled foundation and turning them to
unprincipled combinations which, only too often, resemble a squirrel
whirling in its cage. It was not flexibility that served (nor should it
serve today) as the basic trait of Bolshevism but rather _granite
hardness_. It was precisely of this quality, for which its enemies and
opponents reproached it, that Bolshevism was always justly proud. Not
blissful “optimism” but intransigence, vigilance, revolutionary
distrust, and the struggle for every hand’s breadth of
independence’these are the essential traits of Bolshevism. This is what
the communist parties of both the West and the East must begin with.
They must first gain the right to carry out great maneuvers by preparing
the political and material possibility for realizing them, that is, the
strength, the solidity, the firmness of their own organization.

The Menshevik maneuvers with the Kuomintang and the General Council are
tenfold criminal because they were flung upon the still frail shoulders
of the Communist Parties of China and England. These maneuvers not only
inflicted a defeat upon the revolution and the working class but also
crushed, weakened, and undermined for a long time to come the
fundamental instrument of future struggle, the young communist parties.
At the same time they have also introduced elements of political
demoralization into the ranks of the oldest party of the Comintern, the
CPSU.

The chapter of the draft dealing with strategy remains obstinately
silent about maneuvering’that hoby horse of late years’as if its mouth
were filled with water. Indulgent critics may say: silence is good
enough. But such rationalizing would be a great mistake. The misfortune
lies in the fact that the draft program itself, as we have already shown
in a number of examples and as we will show later on, also bears the
character of a maneuver in the bad, that is, the combinational sense of
the word. The draft maneuvers with its own party. Some of its weak spots
it masks with the formula “according to Lenin”; others, it evades by
silence. That is the manner in which it deals with the strategy of
maneuvers today. It is impossible to speak on this subject without
touching upon the fresh experiences in China and England. But the very
mention of maneuvers would conjure up the figures of Chiang Kai-shek and
Purcell. The authors do not want this. They prefer to remain silent on
the favorite theme and to leave the leadership of the Comintern a free
hand. And this is precisely what must not be permitted. It is necessary
to tie the hands of the combinationists and their candidates. This is
precisely the purpose the program should serve. Otherwise, it would be
superfluous.

A place must be found in the chapter on strategy for the fundamental
rules which determine and delimit maneuvering as an auxiliary method of
the revolutionary struggle against the class enemy which can be only a
life-and-death struggle. The rules noted above and based upon the
teachings of Marx and Lenin can undoubtedly be presented in a more
concise and precise form. But they must by all means be brought into the
program of the Communist International.

 

10. The Strategy of Civil War

In connection with the question of the armed insurrection, the draft
program remarks casually:

“This struggle is subject to the rules of the art of war. It presupposes
a military plan, an offensive character of the fighting operations, and
unlimited sacrifice and heroism on the part of the proletariat.”

Here the draft does not go beyond a terse repetition of a few casual
remarks once made by Marx. In the meantime, we have had, on the one
hand, the experiences of the October revolution, and on the other, the
experiences of the defeat of the Hungarian and Bavarian revolutions, of
the struggle in Italy in 1920, the uprising in Bulgaria in September
1923, the German movement of 1923, Esthonia in 1924, the English general
strike of 1926, the uprising of the Viennese proletariat in 1927, and
the second Chinese revolution of 1925-27. A program of the Comintern
must contain an infinitely more lucid and concrete characterization of
both the social and political prerequisites of the armed insurrection as
well as of the military and strategical conditions and methods that can
guarantee the victory. Nothing exposes the superficial and literary
character of this document so much as the fact that the chapter devoted
to revolutionary strategy occupies itself with Cornelissen and the Guild
socialists (Orage, Hobson, G.D.H. Cole, all specified by name), but
gives neither a general characterization of the strategy of the
proletariat in the imperialist epoch nor a definitive exposition of the
methods of the struggle for power on the basis of living historical
material.

In 1924, after the tragic experiences in Germany, we raised that
question anew, demanding that the Comintern place on the agenda and work
out the questions of strategy and tactics of the armed insurrection and
of civil war in general.

“It is necessary to say bluntly that the question of the duration of the
armed insurrection frequently has the character of litmus paper with
which to test the revolutionary consciousness of very many Western
European communists who have not liberated themselves to this day from
their passive, fatalistic approach to the fundamental tasks of the
revolution. Such an approach found its most profound and talented
expression in Rosa Luxemburg. Psychologically, this is perfectly
comprehensible. Her formative period was spent mainly in struggle
against the bureaucratic apparatus of the German social democracy and
the trade unions. She demonstrated tirelessly that this apparatus
stifled the initiative of the masses and she saw the way out and
salvation in a spontaneous movement from below that was to overthrow all
social democratic obstructions and barriers. A revolutionary general
strike that inundates all the banks of bourgeois society became for
Luxemburg a synonym for the proletarian revolution. But a general
strike, be it ever so distinguished by mass strength, does not decide
the question of power as yet, but only raises it. For the seizure of
power, it is necessary to organize the armed insurrection on the basis
of the general strike. To be sure, the entire development of Rosa
Luxemburg tended in this direction: she departed from the stage before
she had said her last words, or even her penultimate words. However, up
to the very latest period, very strong tendencies towards revolutionary
fatalism have prevailed within the German Communist Party. The
revolution is on the way, the revolution is nigh, the revolution will
bring with it the armed insurrection and give us power and the party …
will, in the meantime, carry on revolutionary agitation and await the
results. Under such conditions, to put point blank the question of the
date of the insurrection is to awake the party out of fatalistic
passivity and to turn it towards the basic revolutionary task, that is,
to the conscious organization of the armed insurrection in order to tear
the power out of the hands of the enemy.” [33]

“We devote considerable time and theoretical labor to the Paris Commune
of 1871 but completely neglect the struggle of the German proletariat
which has already acquired precious experiences in civil war; for
example, we hardly occupy ourselves at all with the experience of the
Bulgarian uprising of last September; and finally, what is most
astonishing, we have completely relegated the experiences of October to
the archives….

“The experiences of the October revolution, the only victorious
proletarian revolution up to now, must be painstakingly studied. A
strategical and tactical calendar of the October must be compiled. It
must be shown, wave by wave, how events developed and how they were
reflected in the party, the Soviets, the Central Committee, and the
military organization. What did the vacillations inside the party mean?
What was their specific weight in the general sweep of events? What was
the role of the military organization? That would be a work of
inestimable importance. To defer it still further would be positively
criminal.” [34]

“What then is the task properly speaking? The task is to compile a
universal reference book, or a guide book, or a manual, or a book of
statutes on the question of the civil war and, therefore, above all on
the armed insurrection as the highest point of the revolution. A balance
must be drawn from the experiences, the preliminary conditions
thoroughly analyzed, the mistakes examined, the most correct operations
selected, and the necessary conclusions drawn. Will we thereby enrich
science, that is, the knowledge of the laws of historical development,
or art as the totality of rules of action drawn from experience? The one
as well as the other, I believe. For our aim is a strictly practical
one; namely, to enrich the military art of revolution.” [35]

“Such ‘statutes’ will necessarily be very complex in structure. First of
all, there must be given a characterization of the fundamental premises
for the seizure of power by the proletariat. Here we still remain on the
field of revolutionary politics; for the uprising is the continuation of
politics – only by special means. The analysis of the premises for the
armed uprising must be adapted to the varying types of countries. There
are countries with a proletarian majority of the population and also
countries with an insignificant minority of the proletariat and with an
absolute predominance of the peasantry. Between these two extremes lie
the countries of the transitional type. As a basis for the analysis,
therefore, at least three ‘typical’ countries must be taken: the
industrial country; the agrarian country; and the intermediate country.
The introduction (treating the premises and the conditions for the
revolution) must contain the characterization of the peculiarities of
each of these types from the standpoint of the civil war. We consider
the insurrection from a twofold angle. On the one hand, as a definite
stage of the historical process, as a definite reflection of the
objective laws of the class struggle; and on the other, from the
subjective or active standpoint: how to prepare and carry out the
insurrection in order best to guarantee its victory.” [36]

In 1924, a collective work on the elaboration of the directives of civil
war, that is, a Marxian guide to the questions of the open clashes of
the classes and the armed struggle for the dictatorship, was begun by a
large circle of individuals grouped around the Military Science Society.
But this work soon encountered opposition on the part of the Comintern –
this opposition was a part of the general system of the struggle against
so-called Trotskyism; and the work was later liquidated altogether. A
more lightminded and criminal step can hardly be imagined. In an epoch
of abrupt turns, the rules of the civil war in the sense presented above
must be part of the iron inventory of the entire revolutionary cadre,
let alone the leaders of the party. These “statutes” would have to be
studied constantly and augmented from the fresh experiences in one’s own
country. Only such a study can provide a certain guarantee against steps
of panic and capitulation at moments when supreme courage and
decisiveness are required, as well as against adventurist leaps in
periods which require prudence and patience.

Had such regulations been incorporated in a number of books, the serious
study of which is as much the duty of every communist as the knowledge
of the basic ideas of Marx, Engels, and Lenin, we might well have
avoided such defeats as were suffered during recent years, and which
were by no means inevitable, especially the Canton uprising contrived
with such puerile lightmindedness. The draft program treats these
questions in a few lines, almost as charily as it speaks of Gandhiism in
India. Of course, a program cannot become engrossed in details. But it
must pose a problem in its full scope and give its basic formulas,
citing the most important achievements and mistakes.

Quite independently of this, the Sixth Congress, in our opinion, must
instruct the ECCI in a special resolution to elaborate the rules of the
civil war into a manual based on the past experiences of victory and
defeat.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

30. PRAVDA, September 20, 1928.

31. _Theses of the Moscow Committee_.

32. Lenin, WORKS, Vol.VI, p.113.

33. Trotsky’s speech at the session of the Board of Military Science
Society, July 29, 1924 – PRAVDA, Sept. 6, 1924.

34. IBID.

35. IBID.

36. IBID.

The Third International After Lenin



II. STRATEGY AND TACTICS IN THE IMPERIALIST EPOCH (PART 4)


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

11. The Question of the Internal Party Regime

The organizational questions of Bolshevism are inseparably bound up with
questions of program and tactics. The draft program touches this subject
only in passing by referring to the necessity of “maintaining the
strictest revolutionary order of democratic centralism.” This is the
sole formula defining the internal party regime, and, besides, it is
quite a new formula. We were aware that the party regime rests upon the
principles of democratic centralism. This presupposed in theory (and was
also carried out in practice) that the regime of democratic centralism
implied a full opportunity for the party to discuss, criticize, express
dissatisfaction, elect, and depose, just as it involved an iron
discipline in action under the fully empowered leadership of the
elective and removable directing organs. If, by _democracy_ was
understood the sovereignty of the party over all its organs, then
_centralism_ meant a correctly established, conscious discipline that
guaranteed the fighting ability of the party. Now, however, to this
formula of the internal party regime which has stood the tests in the
whole past, an entirely new criterion has been added, that of “_the
strictest revolutionary order._” It appears that mere democratic
centralism no longer suffices for the party but that it now requires a
certain _revolutionary order_ of democratic centralism. This formula
simply puts the new self-sufficing idea of “revolutionary order” above
democratic centralism, i.e., above the party.

What is the meaning of this idea of revolutionary order’and a
“strictest” order at that’which stands _above_ the ideas of democracy
and centralism? It implies a party apparatus completely independent of
the party or aspires to such an independence’a self-sufficing
bureaucracy which is supposed to preserve “order” independently of the
party masses and able to suspend or violate the will of the party,
trample its statutes under foot, postpone party conventions or turn them
into mere fictions whenever “order” requires it.

The apparatus has aimed for a long time and by devious routes for such a
formula as a “revolutionary order” raised above democracy and
centralism. During the last two years we have had offered us a whole
series of definitions of party democracy by the most responsible
representatives of the party leadership which in essence reduced it to
mean that democracy and centralism are simply submission to higher
organs. Everything done in practice went far in this direction. But
centralism accompanied by strangled and hollow democracy is bureaucratic
centralism. Of course, such an “order” must, of necessity, be
camouflaged by the forms and rites of democracy; it must be whipped by
means of circular letters emanating from above, and commanded to
“self-criticize” under the threat of Article 58; and it must continually
prove that violations of democracy proceed not from the leading center
but from the so-called “executants,” but there is no proceeding against
the latter because every “executant?” turns out to be a leader of all
his inferiors.

Thus, the new formula is theoretically completely absurd. It
demonstrates by its newness and absurdity that it was engendered only in
order to satisfy certain matured wants. It sanctifies the bureaucratic
apparatus that created it.

This question is indissolubly bound up with the question of factions and
groupings. In every controversial question and every difference of
opinion, the leadership and the official press, not only of the CPSU but
also of the Comintern and all its sections, has immediately shifted the
debate over to the question of factions and groupings. _Without
temporary ideological groupings, the ideological life of the party is
unthinkable_. Nobody has yet discovered any other procedure. And those
who have sought to discover it have only shown that their remedy was
tantamount to strangling the ideological life of the party.

Naturally, groupings as well as differences of opinion are an “evil.”
But this evil constitutes as necessary an integral part of the dialectic
of party development as do toxins in the life of the human organism.

The transformation of groupings into organized and, moreover, closed
factions is a much greater evil. The art of party leadership consists
precisely in preventing such a development. It is impossible to achieve
this by a mere prohibition. The experience of the CPSU testifies best to
it.

At the Tenth Party Congress, under the reverberations of the Kronstadt
uprising and the kulak mutinies, Lenin had a resolution adopted
prohibiting factions and groupings. By groupings were understood not
temporary tendencies that inevitably arise in the process of party life,
but those self-same factions that passed themselves off as groupings.
The party masses understood clearly the mortal danger of the moment and
supported their leader by adopting the resolution, harsh and inflexible
in its form: the prohibition of factions and factionalism. But the party
also knew very well that this formula would be interpreted by the
Central Committee under the leadership of Lenin; that there would be
neither rode nor disloyal interpretation, and still less, any abuse of
power (see the “Testament” of Lenin). The party knew that, exactly one
year later, or, should one-third of the party request it, even a month
later, it could examine the experiences at a new party congress and
introduce any necessary qualifications. The decision of the Tenth Party
Congress was a very severe measure, evoked by the critical position of
the ruling party at the most dangerous turn from War Communism to the
NEP. This severe measure proved to be fully justified for it only
supplemented a correct and farsighted policy and cut the ground from
under the groupings that had arisen prior to the transition to the New
Economic Policy.

But the decision of the Tenth Party Congress on factions and groupings,
which even then required judicious interpretation and application, is in
no case an absolute principle that stands above all other requirements
of the party development, independent of the country, the situation, and
the time.

In so far as the party leadership after the departure of Lenin, in order
to protect itself from all criticism, based itself formally upon the
decisions of the Tenth Party Congress on factions and groupings, it did
so in order to stifle party democracy ever more and at the same time was
less able to accomplish its real purpose, i.e., the elimination of
factionalism. For the task does not consist of prohibiting factions but
of doing away with them. Meanwhile, never have factions so devastated
the party and disintegrated its unity as has been the case since Lenin’s
departure from leadership. At the same time, never before has there
prevailed in the party such a hundred percent monolithism, utterly
fraudulent and serving only to cover up the methods of strangling the
party life.

An apparatus faction kept secret from the party arose in the CPSU even
before the Twelfth Party Congress. Later it assumed the character of a
conspirative organization with its own illegal Central Committee (“the
Septumvirate”), with its own circular letters, agents, codes, and so
forth. The party apparatus handpicks from its ranks a closed order which
is uncontrolled and which disposes of the extraordinary resources not
only of the party but also of the state apparatus and transforms the
party masses into a mere cover and an auxiliary instrument for its
combinatory maneuvers.

But the more boldly this closed intra-apparatus faction detaches itself
from the control of the party masses – ever more diluted by all sorts of
“drives” – the deeper and more sharply does the process of faction
division proceed, not only below but also within the apparatus itself.
Under the complete and unlimited domination of the apparatus over the
party, already accomplished at the time of the Thirteenth Party
Congress, the differences arising within the apparatus itself find no
way out, for to appeal to the party for a real decision would mean to
subject the apparatus to it again. Only that apparatus grouping which is
assured of a majority in advance is inclined to decide a disputed
question by resorting to the methods of _apparatus_ democracy, that is,
to balloting the members of the secret faction. The result is that
inside the ruling apparatus faction, antagonistic factions arise that do
not strive so much to capture the majority within the common faction as
to seek for support in the institutions of the state apparatus. As
regards the majority at the party congress, the latter is automatically
assured, for the Congress can be convoked whenever it is most convenient
and prepared to suit. That is how the usurpation of the apparatus
develops which constitutes the most terrible danger both to the party
and to the dictatorship of the proletariat.

After the first “anti-Trotskyist” campaign in 1923-24 was carried
through with the aid of this apparatus faction, a deep schism took place
within the underground faction headed by the Septumvirate. The
fundamental reason for this was the class dissatisfaction of the
Leningrad proletarian vanguard with the incipient down-sliding in
questions of internal as well as international policy. The advanced
Leningrad workers continued in 1925 the work begun by the advanced
workers of Moscow in 1923. But these deep class tendencies could not
manifest themselves openly in the party. They were reflected in the
muffled struggle within the apparatus faction.

In April 1925, the Central Committee sent out a circular letter to the
whole party which denied the rumors allegedly spread by the
“Trotskyists” (!!) that differences of opinion on the peasantry existed
within the nucleus of the “Leninists,” that is, within the factional
Septumvirate. It was only from this circular letter that broader party
cadres learned that such differences of opinion actually existed; but
this did not at all prevent the leading cadre from continuing to deceive
the party membership with the assertion that the “Opposition” was
allegedly disrupting the monolithism of the “Leninist Guard.” This
propaganda was pounding away at full speed when the Fourteenth Party
Congress precipitated upon the party the amorphous and confused
differences between the two sections of the reigning faction,
differences that were, nevertheless, profound in their _class sources_.
At the very last moment before the Party Congress, the Moscow and the
Leningrad organizations, that is, the two main fortresses of the party,
adopted resolutions at their district conferences of a _directly
opposite character_. It is self-understood that both were adopted
_unanimously_. Moscow explained this miracle of “revolutionary order” by
charging use of force by the apparatus in Leningrad, and Leningrad
reciprocated by accusing Moscow. As though there existed some sort of
impenetrable wall between the Moscow and Leningrad organizations! In
both cases the party apparatus always decided, demonstrating with its
hundred percent monolithism that in all the fundamental questions of
party life there is no party.

The Fourteenth Party Congress found itself compelled to settle new
differences of opinion on various basic questions and to determine a new
composition of the leadership _behind the back of the unconsulted
party_. The Congress was left no alternative other than to leave this
decision immediately to a scrupulously handpicked hierarchy of party
secretaries. The Fourteenth Party Congress was a new milestone on the
road to the liquidation of party democracy by the methods of “order,”
that is, the arbitrary power of the masked apparatus faction. The next
stage of the struggle took place only a little while ago. The art of the
reigning faction consisted of always confronting the party with an
already adopted decision, an irreparable situation, an accomplished
fact.

This new and higher stage of “revolutionary order,” however, did not by
any means signify the liquidation of factions and groups. On the
contrary, they attained an extreme development and sharpness within the
party masses as well as within the party apparatus. So far as the party
was concerned, the bureaucratic chastisement of the “groupings” became
ever sharper and here demonstrated its impotence, descending to the
infamy of the Wrangel officer and Article 58. At the same time, a
process of a _new split_ within the reigning faction itself took place
and this process is even now developing further. Certainly, even now
there is no lack of mendacious demonstrations of monolithism and of
circular letters vouching for the complete unanimity of the tops. As a
matter of fact, all indications are that the muffled struggle within the
closed apparatus faction, violent because of its impassability, has
assumed an extremely tense character and is driving the party to some
new explosion.

Such is the theory and practice of “revolutionary order” which is being
inevitably transformed into the theory and practice of usurpation.

These things, however, have not been confined to the Soviet Union. In
1923, the campaign against factionalism proceeded mainly from the
argument that factions represent the embryos of new parties; and that in
a country with an overwhelming peasant majority and surrounded by
capitalism, the dictatorship of the proletariat cannot allow freedom of
parties. In itself, this postulate is absolutely correct. But it also
requires a correct policy and a correct regime. It is clear, however,
that such a formulation of the question signified the discarding of any
extension to the communist parties in the bourgeois states of the
resolution adopted at the Tenth Congress of the ruling CPSU But a
bureaucratic regime has a devouring logic of its own. If it tolerates no
democratic control within the Soviet party, then it tolerates it all the
less within the Comintern which stands formally above the CPSU That is
why the leadership made a universal principle out of its rude and
disloyal interpretation and application of the resolution of the Tenth
Party Congress – which met the specific requirements at the time in the
USSR – and extended it over all the communist organizations on the
terrestrial globe.

Bolshevism was always strong because of its historical concreteness in
elaborating organizational forms. No arid schemes. The Bolsheviks
changed their organizational structure radically at every transition
from one stage to the next. Yet, today, one and the same principle of
“revolutionary order” is applied to the powerful party of the
proletarian dictatorship as well as to the German Communist Party which
represents a serious political force, to the young Chinese party which
was immediately drawn into the vortex of revolutionary struggles, and to
the party of the USA which is only a small propaganda society. In the
latter, no sooner did doubts arise as to the correctness of the methods
foisted upon it by a Pepper, in command at the time, than the “doubters”
were subjected to chastisement for factionalism. A young party
representing a political organism in a completely embryonic stage,
without any real contact with the masses, without the experience of a
revolutionary leadership, and without theoretical schooling, has already
been armed from head to foot with all the attributes of a “revolutionary
order,” fitted with which it resembles a six-year-old boy wearing his
father’s accoutrement.

The CPSU has the greatest wealth of experience in the domain of ideology
and revolution. But as the last five years showed, even the CPSU has
been unable to live with impunity for a single day on the interest of
its capital alone, but is obliged to renew and expand it constantly, and
this is possible only through a collective working of the party mind.
And what, then, need be said of the communist parties in other countries
which were formed a few years ago and are just passing through the
initial stage of accumulating theoretical knowledge and practical
ability? Without a real freedom of party life, freedom of discussion,
and freedom of establishing their course collectively, and by means of
groupings, these parties will never become a decisive revolutionary
force.

_Prior to the Tenth Party Congress which prohibited the formation of
factions, the CPSU had existed two decades without such a prohibition_.
And precisely these two decades so trained and prepared it that it was
able to accept and endure the harsh decisions of the Tenth Party
Congress at the time of a most difficult turn. The communist parties of
the West, however, proceed from this point at the very outset.

Together with Lenin, we feared most of all that the CPSU, armed with the
mighty resources of the state, would exert an excessive and crushing
influence upon the young parties of the West that were just being
organized. Lenin warned tirelessly against premature strides along the
road of centralism, against the excessive tendencies of the ECCI and the
Presidium in this direction and, especially, against such forms and
methods of assistance as transform themselves into direct commands from
which there is no appeal.

The change began in 1924 under the name of “Bolshevization.” If by
Bolshevization is understood the purging of the party of alien elements
and habits, of social democratic functionaries clinging to their posts,
of freemasons, pacifist-democrats, idealistic muddleheads, etc., then
this work was being performed from the very first day of the Comintern’s
existence; at the Fourth Congress, this work with regard to the French
party even assumed extremely sharp combat forms. But previously this
genuine Bolshevization was inseparably connected with the individual
experiences of the national sections of the Comintern, grew out of these
experiences, and had as its touchstone questions of national policy
which grew to the point of becoming international tasks. The
“Bolshevization” of 1924 assumed completely the character of a
caricature. A revolver was held at the temples of the leading organs of
the communist parties with the demand that they adopt immediately a,
final position on the internal disputes in the CPSU without any
information and any discussion; and besides they were aware in advance
that on the position they took depended whether or not they could remain
in the Comintern. Yet, the European communist parties were in no sense
equipped in 1924 for a rapid-fire decision on the questions under
discussion in Russia where, just at that time, two principled tendencies
were in the formative stage, growing out of the new stage of the
proletarian dictatorship. Of course, the work of purging was also
necessary after 1924 and alien elements were quite correctly removed
from many sections. But taken as a whole, the “Bolshevization” consisted
in this: that with the wedge of the Russian disputes, driven from above
with the hammer blows of the state apparatus, the leaderships being
formed at the moment in the communist parties of the West were
disorganized over and over again. All this went on under the banner of
struggle against factionalism.

If a faction which threatens to paralyze its fighting ability for a long
time does crystallize inside the party of the proletarian vanguard, the
party will then naturally always be confronted with the necessity to
decide whether to allot more time for a supplementary re-examination or
to recognize immediately that the split is unavoidable. A fighting party
can never be the sum of factions that pull in opposite directions. This
is incontestably true, if taken in this general form. But to employ the
split as a preventive measure against differences of opinion and to lop
off every group and grouping that raises a voice of criticism, is to
transform the internal life of the party into a chain of organizational
abortions. Such methods do not promote the continuation and the
development of the species but only exhaust the maternal organism, that
is, the party. The struggle against factionalism becomes infinitely more
dangerous than the formation of factions itself.

At the present time, we have a situation in which the actual initiators
and founders of almost all the communist parties of the world have been
placed outside of the International, not excepting even its former
chairman. The leading groups of the two consecutive stages in party
development are either expelled or removed from leadership in almost all
the parties. In Germany the Brandler group today still finds itself in
the position of semi-party membership. The Maslow group is outside the
party. In France are expelled the old groups of Rosmer, Monatte, Loriot,
Souvarine, as well as the leading group of the subsequent period,
Girault-Treint. In Belgium, the basic group of Van Overstraeten has been
expelled. If the Bordiga group, the founder of the Communist Party in
Italy, is only half expelled that is to be accounted for by the
conditions of the Fascist regime. In Czechoslovakia, in Sweden, in
Norway, in the United States, in a word, in almost all the parties of
the world we perceive more or less similar phenomena which arose in the
post-Leninist period.

It is incontestable that many of the expelled committed the greatest
mistakes; and we have not been behindhand in pointing them out. It is
equally true that many of the expelled, after they were cut off from the
Comintern, have to a great extent returned to their former points of
departure, to the Left social democracy or syndicalism. But the task of
the leadership of the Comintern by no means consists in driving the
young leaderships of the national parties into a blind alley every time,
and thus dooming their individual representatives to ideological
degeneration. The “revolutionary order” of the bureaucratic leadership
stands as a terrible obstacle in the path of the development of all the
parties of the Communist International.

Organizational questions are inseparable from questions of program and
tactics. We must take clearly into account the fact that one of the most
important sources of opportunism in the Comintern is the bureaucratic
regime of the apparatus in the Comintern itself as well as in its
leading party. There cannot be any doubt after the experience of the
years 1923-1928 that bureaucratism in the Soviet Union is the expression
and the instrument of the pressure exerted by the non-proletarian
classes upon the proletariat. The draft program of the Comintern
contains a correct formulation on this score when it says that
bureaucratic perversions “arise inevitably on the soil of an
insufficient cultural level of the masses and of class influences alien
to the proletariat.” Here we have the key to the understanding not only
of bureaucratism in general but also of its extraordinary growth in the
last five years. The cultural level of the masses, while remaining
insufficient, has been rising constantly in this period (and this is
incontestable); therefore, the cause for the _growth_ of bureaucratism
is to be sought only in the _growth_ of class influences alien to the
proletariat. In proportion as the European communist parties, i.e.,
primarily their directing bodies, aligned themselves organizationally
with the shifts and regroupings in the apparatus of the CPSU, the
bureaucratism of the communist parties abroad was for the most part only
a reflection and a supplement of the bureaucratism within the CPSU.

The selection of the leading elements in the communist parties has
proceeded and still proceeds mainly from the standpoint of their
readiness to accept and approve the very latest apparatus grouping in
the CPSU The more independent and responsible elements in the leadership
of the parties abroad who refused to submit to shuffling and reshuffling
in a purely administrative manner, were either expelled from the party
altogether or they were driven into the Right (often the pseudo-Right)
wing, or, finally, they entered the ranks of the Left Opposition. In
this manner, the organic process of the selection and welding together
of the revolutionary cadres, on the basis of the proletarian struggle
under the leadership of the Comintern was cut short, altered, distorted,
and in part even directly replaced by the administrative and
bureaucratic sifting from above. Quite naturally, those leading
communists who were the readiest to adopt the ready-made decisions and
to countersign any and all resolutions, frequently gained the upper hand
over those party elements who were imbued with the feeling of
revolutionary responsibility. Instead of a selection of tested and
unwavering revolutionists, we have frequently had a selection of the
best adapted bureaucrats.

All questions of internal and international policy invariably lead us
back to the question of the internal party regime. Assuredly, deviations
away from the class line in the questions of the Chinese revolution and
the English labor movement, in the questions of the economy of the USSR,
of wages, of taxes, etc., constitute in themselves a grave danger. But
this danger is increased tenfold because the bureaucratic regime binds
the party hand and foot and deprives it of any opportunity to correct
the line of the leading party tops in a normal manner. The same applies
to the Comintern as well. The resolution of the Fourteenth Party
Congress of the CPSU on the necessity of a more democratic and more
collective leadership in the Comintern has been transformed in practice
into its antithesis. A change in the internal regime of the Comintern is
becoming a life and death question for the international revolutionary
movement. This change can be achieved in two ways: either hand in hand
with a change in the internal regime in the CPSU or in the struggle
against the leading role of the CPSU in the Comintern. Every effort must
be made to assure the adoption of the first way. The struggle for the
change of the internal regime in the CPSU is a struggle for regenerating
the regime in the Comintern and for the preservation of the leading
ideological role of our party in the Comintern.

For this reason, it is necessary to expunge ruthlessly from the program
the very idea that living, active parties can be subordinated to the
control of the “revolutionary order” of an irremovable governmental
party bureaucracy. The party itself must be restored its rights. The
party must once again become a party. This must be affirmed in the
program in such words as will leave no room for the theoretical
justification of bureaucratism and usurpatory tendencies.

 

12. The Causes of the Defeat of the Opposition and Its Perspectives

The Left proletarian wing of the party which set down its views in a
number of documents, the principal of which is the PLATFORM OF THE
BOLSHEVIK-LENINISTS (OPPOSITION), has been subjected, beginning with the
Fall of 1923 to systematic, organizational campaigns of extermination.
The methods of repression were conditioned upon the character of the
internal party regime which became more bureaucratic to the degree that
the pressure exerted by the non-proletarian classes upon the proletariat
grew stronger. The possibilities for the success of such methods were
created by the general political character of the period in which the
proletariat suffered the greatest defeats, the social democracy came to
life again, while in the communist parties the Centrist-opportunist
tendencies grew stronger, in addition to which Centrist systematically
slid to the Right up to the recent months. The first onslaught against
the Opposition was perpetrated immediately after the defeat of the
German revolution and served, as it were, as a supplement of this
defeat. This onslaught would have been utterly impossible with a victory
of the German proletariat which would have raised extraordinarily the
self-confidence of the proletariat of the USSR and therefore also its
power of resistance to the pressure of the bourgeois classes, internally
as well as externally, and to the party bureaucracy which transmits this
pressure.

To render clearer the meaning of the regroupings that took place in the
Comintern since the end of 1923 it would be highly important to examine
step by step how the leading group explained its organizational
“victories” over the Opposition at the various stages of its
down-sliding. We are not in a position to do so within the framework of
a criticism of the draft program. But it is sufficient for our purposes
to examine how the first “victory” over the Opposition in September 1924
was viewed and explained. In his debut article on the question of
international policy, Stalin said the following:

“The decisive victory of the revolutionary wing in the communist parties
is the surest indication of the deepest revolutionary processes that are
now, taking place within the working class …”

And in another place in the same article:

“If we add to this the fact of the complete isolation of the opportunist
currents in the CPSU, the picture is complete. The Fifth Congress only
consolidated the victory of the revolutionary wing in the basic sections
of the Communist International.” [37]

Thus, the defeat of the Opposition in the CPSU was proclaimed to be the
result of the fact that the European proletariat was going to the
_Left_, was marching directly towards the revolution and was giving the
revolutionary wing the ascendancy over the opportunists in all the
sections of the Comintern. Today, some five years later, after the
greatest defeat of the international proletariat in the Fall of 1923,
PRAVDA finds itself compelled to admit that “the wave of a certain
apathy and dejection which set in after the defeat of 1923 and which
permitted German capital to consolidate its position” is only now
beginning to disappear. [38]

But, in that case, a question arises which is new for the present
leadership of the Comintern but not for us: should not, then, the defeat
of the Opposition in 1923 and the years that followed be explained not
by a _Leftward swing_, but by a _Rightward swing_ of the working class?
The answer to this question is all-decisive.

The answer given at the Fifth Congress in 1924 and later on in various
articles and speeches was clear and categorical: the strengthening of
the revolutionary elements within the labor movement of Europe, the new
rising wave, the approaching proletarian revolution’all these brought
about the “debacle” of the Opposition.

Now, however, the sharp and prolonged turn of the political conjuncture
after 1923 towards the Right and not towards the Left has already become
a well established, generally recognized, and incontrovertible fact.
Consequently, the other fact is equally incontrovertible, to wit, that
the inception and intensification of the struggle against the Opposition
and the accentuation of this struggle up to the point of expulsions and
exile is most closely connected with the political process of bourgeois
stabilization in Europe. To be sure, this process was interrupted during
the last four years by major revolutionary events. But new mistakes of
the leadership, even more grievous than those of 1923 in Germany, gave
the victory to the enemy each time under the worst possible conditions
for the proletariat and the communist party and thereby created new
sources of sustenance for bourgeois stabilization. The international
revolutionary movement suffered defeats and together with it the Left,
proletarian Leninist wing of the CPSU and the Comintern went down in
defeat.

This explanation would be incomplete were we to overlook the internal
process in the economic and political life of the USSR arising out of
this world situation; namely, that the contradictions on the basis of
the NEP were growing while the leadership did not correctly understand
the problem of the economic “_smychka_” between the city and the
country, underestimated the disproportions and the tasks of
industrialization, did not grasp the significance of a _planned_
economy, etc.

The growth of the economic and political pressure of the bureaucratic
and petty bourgeois strata within the country on the basis of defeats of
the proletarian revolution in Europe and Asia’that was the historical
chain which tightened around the neck of the Opposition during these
four years. Whoever fails to understand this will understand nothing at
all.

In this analysis we have been compelled at almost every single important
stage to oppose the line which was rejected under the name of Trotskyism
to the line that was actually carried through. The meaning of this
struggle in its generalized aspects is distinctly clear to every
Marxist. If the occasional and partial charges of “Trotskyism”
corroborated by adducing a mass of actual and imaginary quotations of
the last twenty-five years could temporarily confuse, then the cohesive
and generalized evaluation of the ideological struggle of the last five
years is proof of the fact that two lines were at hand here. One of them
was a conscious and consistent line; it was a continuation and
development of the theoretical and strategical principles of Lenin in
their application to the internal questions of the USSR and the
questions of the world revolution; it was the line of the Opposition.
The second line was an unconscious, contradictory, and vacillating line,
sliding down in zigzags from Leninism under the pressure of hostile
class forces in the period of the international political reflux; this
was the line of the official leadership. At great turning points men
frequently find it easier to abandon their conceptions than the habitual
phraseology. That is a general law of all those whose ideological colors
fade. While revising Lenin in almost all essential points, the
leadership passed off this revisionism as a development of Leninism and
at the same time characterized the international revolutionary essence
of Leninism as Trotskyism. It did this not only in order to mask itself
both outwardly and inwardly but also in order to adapt itself more
easily to the process of its own down-sliding.

Whoever wants to understand this will not fling at us the cheap reproach
that we have connected the criticism of the draft program with an
exposure of the legend of Trotskyism. The present draft program is the
product of an ideological epoch that was permeated with this legend. The
authors of the draft were the ones who fed this legend the most, who
always proceeded from it and utilized it as the measuring rod of all
things. The whole draft is a reflection of precisely this epoch.

Political history has been enriched by a new and extraordinarily
instructive chapter. It might be entitled the chapter on the _Power of
Mythology_, or more simply, _Ideological Calumny as a Political Weapon_.
Experience teaches us that it is impermissible to underestimate this
weapon. We have still far from accomplished “the leap from the realm of
necessity to the realm of freedom,” and we still live in a class society
which is unthinkable without obscurantism, prejudices, and
superstitions. A myth that corresponds to certain interests or
traditional customs can always wield a great power in a class society.
But on the basis of a myth alone, even if it is planfully organized and
has at its disposal all the resources of state power, no great policy
can be carried on, least of all a revolutionary policy, especially in
our epoch of abrupt changes. Mythology must inevitably become entangled
in the web of its own contradictions. We have already mentioned a small
part, though perhaps the most important part of these contradictions.
Quite independently of whether external circumstances will permit us to
carry out our analysis to the end, we firmly take into consideration
that our subjective analysis will be supported by the objective analysis
which historical events will provide.

The radicalization of the working masses of Europe which found its
expression in the last parliamentary elections is an indisputable fact.
But this radicalization is now passing only through its initial stages.
Such factors as the recent defeat of the Chinese revolution militate
against the radicalization and drive for the most part into social
democratic channels. We do not at all intend to predict here the tempo
at which this process will proceed in the near future. But in any case
it is clear that this radicalization will be the harbinger of a new
revolutionary situation only from the moment that the gravitation toward
the communist party begins to grow at the expense of the great reserves
of the social democracy. Such is not the case as yet. But this must take
place with iron necessity.

The present indefinite orientation of the Comintern leadership, with its
internally discordant endeavors to turn the helm to the Left without
changing the whole regime and putting a stop to the organizational
struggle against the most tested revolutionary elements’this
contradictory orientation has arisen not only under the blows of the
internal economic difficulties of the USSR which fully confirmed the
prognosis of the Opposition; but it also corresponds fully to the
_first_ stage of the radicalization of the European working masses. The
eclecticism of the policy of the Comintern leadership, the eclecticism
of the draft program represent, as it were, a snapshot of the present
condition of the international working class, which is driven to the
Left by the course of development but has not yet fixed its course,
giving more than nine million votes to the German social democracy.

The further genuine revolutionary upsurge will signify a colossal
regrouping within the working class, in all its organizations, including
the Comintern. The tempo of this process is still unclear but the lines
along which the crystallization will occur are clearly discernible. The
working masses will pass from the social democracy to the communist
party, section by section. The axis of communist policy will shift over
more from Right to Left. Concurrently, a demand will increasingly rise
for the consistent Bolshevik line of the group that was able to swim
against the stream despite the hailstorm of accusations and persecutions
since the defeat of the German proletariat at the end of 1923.

The organizational methods by which the ideas of genuine, unfalsified
Leninism will triumph in the Comintern and consequently in the whole
international proletariat depend very largely upon the present
leadership of the Comintern and consequently directly upon the Sixth
Congress.

However, whatever he the decisions of this Congress – we are prepared
for the worst – the general estimate of the present epoch and its inner
tendencies and especially the evaluation of the experiences of the last
five years indicate to us that the Opposition needs no other channel
than that of the Comintern. No one will succeed in tearing us away from
it. The ideas we defend will become its ideas. They will find their
expression in the program of the Communist International.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

37. PRAVDA, September 20, 1924.

38. PRAVDA, January 28, 1928.

The Third International After Lenin



III. SUMMARY AND PERSPECTIVES OF THE CHINESE REVOLUTION: ITS LESSONS FOR THE COUNTRIES OF THE ORIENT AND FOR THE WHOLE OF THE COMINTERN (PART 1)


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

BOLSHEVISM AND MENSHEVISM and the Left wing of the German and
international social democracy took definite shape on the analysis of
the experiences, mistakes, and tendencies of the 1905 revolution. An
analysis of the experiences of the Chinese revolution is today of no
less importance for the international proletariat.

This analysis, however, has not even begun – it is prohibited. The
official literature is engaged in hastily selecting facts to suit the
resolutions of the ECCI, the hollowness of which has been completely
revealed. The draft program dulls the sharpest points of the Chinese
problem whenever possible, but it sets the seal of approval upon the
essential points of the fatal line followed by the ECCI in the Chinese
question. The analysis of the great historical process is replaced by a
literary defense of bankrupt schemas.

1. On the Nature of The Colonial Bourgeoisie

The draft program states: “Temporary agreements [with the national
bourgeoisie of colonial countries] are admissible only in so far as the
bourgeoisie does not obstruct the revolutionary organization of the
workers and peasants and wages a genuine struggle against imperialism.”

This formula, although it is deliberately tacked on as an incidental
proposition, is one of the central postulates of the draft, for the
countries of the Orient, at any rate. The main proposition deals,
naturally, with the “emancipation [of the workers and peasants] from the
influence of the national bourgeoisie.” But we judge not from the
standpoint of grammar but politically and, moreover, on the basis of
experience, and therefore we say: the main proposition is only an
incidental one here, while the incidental proposition contains what is
most essential. The formula, taken as a whole, is a classic Menshevik
noose for the proletariat of the Orient.

What “temporary agreements” are meant here? In politics, as in nature,
all things are “temporary.” Perhaps we are discussing here purely
practical agreements _from one occasion to the next_? It goes without
saying that we cannot renounce in advance such rigidly delimited and
rigidly practical agreements as serve each time a quite definite aim.
For example, such cases as involve agreements with the student youth of
the Kuomintang for the organization of an anti-imperialist
demonstration, or of obtaining assistance from the Chinese merchants for
strikers in a foreign concession, etc. Such cases are not at all
excluded in the future, even in China. But in that case why are
_general_ political conditions adduced here, namely, “… in so far as the
bourgeoisie does not obstruct the revolutionary organization of the
workers and peasants and wages a genuine [!] struggle against
imperialism”? The sole “condition” for every agreement with the
bourgeoisie, for each separate, practical, and expedient agreement
adapted to each given case, consists in not allowing either the
organizations or the banners to become mixed directly or indirectly for
a single day or a single hour; it consists in distinguishing between the
Red and the Blue, and in not believing for an instant in the capacity or
readiness of the bourgeoisie either to lead a _genuine_ struggle against
imperialism or _not to obstruct_ the workers and peasants. For practical
and expedient agreements we have absolutely no use for such a condition
as the one cited above. On the contrary, it could only cause us harm,
running counter to the general line of our struggle against capitalism,
which is not suspended even during the brief period of an “agreement.”
As was said long ago, purely practical agreements, such as do not bind
us in the least and do not oblige us to anything politically, can be
concluded with the devil himself, if that is advantageous at a given
moment. But it would be absurd in such a case to demand that the devil
should _generally_ become converted to Christianity, and that he use his
horns not against workers and peasants but exclusively for pious deeds.
In presenting such conditions we act in reality as the devil’s
advocates, and beg him to let us become his godfathers.

By its absurd conditions, which serve to paint the bourgeoisie in bright
colors in advance, the draft program states clearly and definitely
(despite the diplomatic and incidental character of its thesis) that
involved here are precisely long-term political blocs and not agreements
for specific occasions concluded for practical reasons and rigidly
confined to practical aims. But in such a case, what is meant by demands
that the bourgeoisie wage a “genuine” struggle and that it “not
obstruct” the workers? Do we present these conditions to the bourgeoisie
itself, and demand a public promise from it? It will make you any
promises you want! It will even send its delegates to Moscow, enter the
Peasants’ International, adhere as a “sympathizing” party to the
Comintern, peek into the Red International of Labor Unions. In short, it
will promise anything that will give it the opportunity (with our
assistance) to dupe the workers and peasants, more efficiently, more
easily, and more completely to throw sand in their eyes – until the
first opportunity, such as was offered in Shanghai.

But perhaps it is not a question here of political obligations exacted
from the bourgeoisie which, we repeat, it will immediately agree to in
order thus to transform us into its guarantors before the working
masses? Perhaps it is a question here of an “objective” and “scientific”
evaluation of a given national bourgeoisie, an expert _a priori_
“sociological” prognosis, as it were, of its capacity to wage a struggle
and not to obstruct? Sad to say, as the most recent and freshest
experience testifies, such an _a priori_ prognosis makes fools out of
experts as a rule. And it would not be so bad, if only they alone were
involved …

There cannot be the slightest doubt on the matter: the text deals
precisely with long-term political blocs. It would be entirely
superfluous to include in a program the question of occasional practical
agreements. For this purpose, a matter-of-fact tactical resolution _On
Our Current Tasks_ would suffice. Involved here is a question of
justifying and setting a programmatic seal of approval upon yesterday’s
orientation toward the Kuomintang, which doomed the second Chinese
revolution to destruction, and which is capable of destroying
revolutions in the future.

According to the idea advanced by Bukharin, the real author of the
draft, all stakes are placed precisely upon the general evaluation of
the colonial bourgeoisie, whose capacity to struggle and not to obstruct
must be proved not by its own oaths but in a rigorous “sociological”
manner, that is by a thousand and one scholastic schemes adapted to
opportunist purposes.

To bring this out more clearly let us refer back to the Bukharin
evaluation of the colonial bourgeoisie. After citing the
“anti-imperialist content” of colonial revolutions, and quoting Lenin
(without any justification whatever), Bukharin proclaims:

“The liberal bourgeoisie in China played an objectively revolutionary
role over a period of a number of years, and not months. Then it
exhausted itself. This was not all a political ‘twenty-four hour’
holiday of the type of the Russian liberal revolution of 1905.”

Everything here is wrong from the beginning to end.

Lenin really taught us to differentiate rigidly between an oppressed and
oppressor bourgeois nation. From this follow conclusions of exceptional
importance. For instance, our attitude toward a war between an
imperialist and a colonial country. For a pacifist, such a war is a war
like any other. For a communist, a war of a colonial nation against an
imperialist nation is a bourgeois revolutionary war. Lenin thus _raised_
the national liberation movements, the colonial insurrections, and wars
of the oppressed nations, to the level of the bourgeois democratic
revolutions, in particular, to that of the Russian revolution of 1905.
But Lenin did not at all place the wars for national liberation _above_
bourgeois democratic revolutions as is now done by Bukharin, after his
180 degree turn. Lenin insisted on a distinction between an oppressed
bourgeois nation and a bourgeois oppressor nation. But Lenin nowhere
raised and never could raise the question as if the bourgeoisie of a
colonial or a semi-colonial country in an epoch of struggle for national
liberation must be more progressive and more revolutionary than the
bourgeoisie of a non-colonial country in the epoch of the democratic
revolution. This does not flow from anything in theory; there is no
confirmation of it in history. For example, pitiful as Russian
liberalism was, and hybrid as was its Left half, the petty bourgeois
democrats, the Social Revolutionists and Mensheviks, it would
nevertheless hardly be possible to say that Chinese liberalism and
Chinese bourgeois democracy rose to a higher level or were more
revolutionary than their Russian prototypes.

To present matters as if there must inevitably flow from the fact of
colonial oppression the revolutionary character of a national
bourgeoisie is to reproduce inside out the fundamental error of
Menshevism, which held that the revolutionary nature of the Russian
bourgeoisie must flow from the oppression of feudalism and the
autocracy.

The question of the nature and the policy of the bourgeoisie is settled
by the entire internal class structure of a nation waging the
revolutionary struggle; by the historical epoch in which that struggle
develops; by the degree of economic, political, and military dependence
of the national bourgeoisie upon world imperialism as a whole or a
particular section of it; finally, and this is most important, by the
degree of class activity of the native proletariat, and by the state of
its connections with the international revolutionary movement.

A democratic or national liberation movement may offer the bourgeoisie
an opportunity to deepen and broaden its possibilities for exploitation.
Independent intervention of the proletariat on the revolutionary arena
threatens to deprive the bourgeoisie of the possibility to exploit
altogether.

Let us observe some facts more closely.

The present inspirers of the Comintern have untiringly repeated that
Chiang Kai-shek waged a war “against imperialism” whilst Kerensky
marched hand in hand with the imperialists. Ergo: whereas a ruthless
struggle had to be waged against Kerensky, it was necessary to support
Chiang Kai-shek.

The ties between Kerenskyism and imperialism were indisputable. One can
go even still further back and point out that the Russian bourgeoisie
“dethroned” Nicholas II with the blessings of British and French
imperialism. Not only did Miliukov-Kerensky support the war waged by
Lloyd George-Poincaré, but Lloyd George and Poincaré also supported
Miliukov’s and Kerensky’s revolution first against the Czar, and later
against the workers and peasants. This is absolutely beyond dispute.

But how did matters stand in this respect in China? The “February”
revolution in China took place in 1911. That revolution was a great and
progressive event, although it was accomplished with the direct
participation of the imperialists. Sun Yat-sen, in his memoirs, relates
how his organization relied in all its work on the “support” of the
imperialist states – either Japan, France, or America. If Kerensky in
1917 continued to take part in the imperialist war, then the Chinese
bourgeoisie, the one that is so “national,” so “revolutionary,” etc.,
supported Wilson’s intervention in the war with the hope that the
Entente would help to emancipate China. In 1918 Sun Yat-sen addressed to
the governments of the Entente his plans for the economic development
and political emancipation of China. There is no foundation whatever for
the assertion that the Chinese bourgeoisie, in its struggle against the
Manchu Dynasty, displayed any higher revolutionary qualities than the
Russian bourgeoisie in the struggle against Czarism; or that there is a
principled difference between Chiang Kai-shek’s and Kerensky’s attitude
toward imperialism.

But, says the ECCI, Chiang Kai-shek nevertheless did wage war against
imperialism. To present the situation in this manner is to put too crude
a face upon reality. Chiang Kai-shek waged war against certain Chinese
militarists, the agents of _one_ of the imperialist powers. This is not
at all the same as to wage a war against imperialism. Even Tang
Ping-shan understood this. In his report to the Seventh Plenum of the
ECCI (at the end of 1926) Tang Ping-shan characterized the policy of the
Kuomintang; center headed by Chiang Kai-shek as follows:

“In the sphere of international policy it occupies a passive position in
the full meaning of that word … It is inclined to fight only against
British imperialism; so far as the Japanese imperialists are concerned,
however, it is ready under certain conditions to make a compromise with
them.” [1]

The attitude of the Kuomintang toward imperialism was from the very
outset not revolutionary but entirely opportunist. It endeavored to
smash and isolate the agents of certain imperialist powers so as to make
a deal with the self-same or other imperialist powers on terms more
favorable for the Chinese bourgeoisie. That is all. But the gist of the
matter lies in the fact that the entire formulation of the question is
erroneous.

One must measure not the attitude of every given national bourgeoisie to
imperialism “in general,” but its attitude to the immediate
revolutionary historical tasks of its own nation. The Russian
bourgeoisie was the bourgeoisie of an imperialist oppressor state; the
Chinese bourgeoisie, a bourgeoisie of an oppressed colonial country. The
overthrow of feudal Czarism was a progressive task in old Russia. The
overthrow of the imperialist yoke is a progressive historical task in
China. However, the conduct of the Chinese bourgeoisie in relation to
imperialism, the proletariat, and the peasantry, was not more
revolutionary than the attitude of the Russian bourgeoisie towards
Czarism and the revolutionary classes in Russia, but, if anything, viler
and more reactionary. That is the only way to pose the question.

The Chinese bourgeoisie is sufficiently realistic and acquainted
intimately enough with the nature of world imperialism to understand
that a really serious struggle against the latter requires such an
upheaval of the revolutionary masses as would primarily become a menace
to the bourgeoisie itself. If the struggle against the Manchu Dynasty
was a task of smaller historical proportions than the overthrow of
Czarism, then the struggle against world imperialism is a task on a much
larger scale; and if we taught the workers of Russia from the very
beginning not to believe in the readiness of liberalism and the ability
of petty bourgeois democracy to overthrow Czarism and to destroy
feudalism, we should no less energetically have imbued the Chinese
workers from the outset with the same spirit of distrust. The new and
absolutely false theory promulgated by Stalin-Bukharin about the
“immanent” revolutionary spirit of the colonial bourgeoisie is, in
substance, a translation of Menshevism into the language of Chinese
politics. It serves only to convert the oppressed position of China into
an internal political premium for the Chinese bourgeoisie, and it throws
an additional weight on the scale of the bourgeoisie against the scale
of the trebly oppressed Chinese proletariat.

But, we are told by Stalin and Bukharin, the authors of the draft
program, Chiang Kai-shek’s northern expedition roused a powerful
movement among the worker and peasant masses. This is incontestable. But
did not the fact that Guchkov and Shulgin brought with them to Petrograd
the abdication of Nicholas II play a revolutionary role? Did it not
arouse the most downtrodden, exhausted, and timid strata of the
populace? Did not the fact that Kerensky, who but yesterday was a
Trudovik, became the President of the Ministers’ Council and the
Commander-in-Chief, rouse the masses of soldiers? Did it not bring them
to meetings? Did it not rouse the village to its feet against the
landlord? The question could be posed even more widely. Did not the
entire activities of capitalism rouse the masses, did it not rescue
them, to use the expression of the COMMUNIST MANIFESTO, from the idiocy
of rural life? Did it not impel the proletarian battalions to the
struggle? But does our historical evaluation of the objective role of
capitalism as a whole or of certain actions of the bourgeoisie in
particular, become a substitute for our active class revolutionary
attitude toward capitalism or toward the actions of the bourgeoisie?
Opportunist policies have always been based on this kind of
non-dialectical, conservative, tail-endist “objectivism.” Marxism on the
contrary invariably taught that the revolutionary consequences of one or
another act of the bourgeoisie, to which it is compelled by its
position, will be fuller, more decisive, less doubtful, and firmer, the
more independent the proletarian vanguard will be in relation to the
bourgeoisie, the less it will be inclined to place its fingers between
the jaws of the bourgeoisie, to see it in bright colors, to
over-estimate its revolutionary spirit or its readiness for a “united
front” and for a struggle against imperialism.

The Stalinist and Bukharinist appraisal of the colonial bourgeoisie
cannot stand criticism, either theoretical, historical, or political.
Yet this is precisely the appraisal, as we have seen, that the draft
program seeks to canonize.

***

One unexposed and uncondemned error always leads to another, or prepares
the ground for it.

If yesterday the Chinese bourgeoisie was enrolled in the united
revolutionary front, then today it is proclaimed to have “definitely
gone over to the counter-revolutionary camp.” It is not difficult to
expose how unfounded are these transfers and enrollments which have been
effected in a purely administrative manner without any serious Marxian
analysis whatever.

It is absolutely self-evident that the bourgeoisie in joining the camp
of the revolution does so not accidentally, not because it is
light-minded, but under the pressure of its own class interests. For
fear of the masses the bourgeoisie subsequently deserts the revolution
or openly displays its concealed hatred of the revolution. But the
bourgeoisie can go over “_definitely_ to the counter-revolutionary
camp,” that is, free itself from the necessity of “supporting” the
revolution again, or at least of flirting with it, only in the event
that its fundamental class aspirations are satisfied either by
revolutionary means or in another way (for instance, the Bismarckian
way). Let us recall the history of the period of 1848-1871. Let us
recall that the Russian bourgeoisie was able to turn its back so bluntly
upon the revolution of 1905 only because the revolution gave it the
State Duma, that is, it received the means whereby it could bring direct
pressure to bear on the bureaucracy and make deals with it.
Nevertheless, when the war of 1914-1917 revealed the inability of the
“modernized” regime to secure the basic interests of the bourgeoisie,
the latter again turned towards the revolution, and made its turn more
sharply than in 1905.

Can anyone maintain that the revolution of 1925-1927 in China has at
least partly satisfied the basic interests of Chinese capitalism? No.
China is today just as far removed from real national unity and from
tariff autonomy as it was prior to 1925. Yet, the creation of a unified
domestic market and its protection from cheaper foreign goods is a
life-and-death question for the Chinese bourgeoisie, a question second
in importance only to that of maintaining the basis of its class
domination over the proletariat and the peasant poor. But, for the
Japanese and the British bourgeoisie the maintenance of the colonial
status of China is likewise a question of no less importance than
economic autonomy is for the Chinese bourgeoisie. That is why there will
still be not a few Leftward zigzags in the policy of the Chinese
bourgeoisie. There will be no lack of temptations in the future for the
amateurs of the “national united front.” To tell the Chinese communists
today that their alliance with the bourgeoisie from 1924 to the end of
1927 was correct but that it is worthless now because the bourgeoisie
has definitely gone over to the counter-revolutionary camp, is to disarm
the Chinese communists once again in face of the coming objective
changes in the situation and the inevitable Leftward zigzags of the
Chinese bourgeoisie. The war now being conducted by Chiang Kai-shek
against the North already overthrows completely the mechanical scheme of
the authors of the draft program.

***

But the principled error of the official formulation of the question
will doubtless appear more glaringly, more convincingly, and more
incontrovertibly if we recall the fact which is still fresh in our
minds, and which is of no little importance, namely, that Czarist Russia
was a combination of oppressor and oppressed nations, that is of Great
Russians and “foreigners,” many of whom were in a completely colonial or
semi-colonial status. Lenin not only demanded that the greatest
attention be paid to the national problem of the peoples in Czarist
Russia but also proclaimed (against Bukharin and others) that it was the
elementary duty of the proletariat of the dominant nation to support the
struggle of the oppressed nations for their self-determination, up to
and including separation. But did the party conclude from this that the
bourgeoisie of the nationalities oppressed by Czarism (the Poles,
Ukrainians, Tartars, Jews, Armenians, and others) were more progressive,
more radical, and more revolutionary than the Russian bourgeoisie?
Historical experience bears out the fact that the Polish
bourgeoisie-notwithstanding the fact that it suffered both from the yoke
of the autocracy and from national oppression – was more reactionary
than the Russian bourgeoisie and, in the State Dumas, always gravitated
not towards the Cadets but towards the Octobrists. The same is true of
the Tartar bourgeoisie. The fact that the Jews had absolutely no rights
whatever did not prevent the Jewish bourgeoisie from being even more
cowardly, more reactionary, and more vile than the Russian bourgeoisie.
Or perhaps the Esthonian bourgeoisie, the Leftish, the Georgian, or the
Armenian bourgeoisie were more revolutionary than the Great Russian
bourgeoisie? How could anyone forget such historical lessons!

Or should we perhaps recognize today, after the event, that Bolshevism
was wrong when – in contradistinction to the Bund, the Dashnaks, the
PPSers, the Georgian and other Mensheviks – it called upon the workers
of all the oppressed nationalities, of all the colonial peoples in
Czarist Russia, at the very dawn of the bourgeois democratic revolution,
to dissociate themselves and form their own autonomous class
organizations, to break ruthlessly all organizational ties not only with
the liberal bourgeois, but also with the revolutionary petty bourgeois
parties, to win over the working class in the struggle against these
parties, and through the workers fight against these parties for
influence over the peasantry? Did we not commit here a “Trotskyist”
mistake? Did we not skip over, in relation to these oppressed, and in
many cases very backward nations, the phase of development corresponding
to the Kuomintang?

As a matter of fact how easily one could construct a theory that the
PPS, Dashnak-Tsutiun, the Bund, etc., were “peculiar” forms of the
necessary collaboration of the various classes in the struggle against
the autocracy and against national oppression! How can such historical
lessons be forgotten?

For a Marxist it was clear even prior to the Chinese events of the last
three years – and today it should be clear even to the blind – that
foreign imperialism, as a direct factor in the internal life of China,
renders the Chinese Miliukovs and Chinese Kerenskys in the final
analysis even more vile than their Russian prototypes. It is not for
nothing that the very first manifesto issued by our party proclaimed
that the further East we go, the lower and viler becomes the
bourgeoisie, the greater are the tasks that fall upon the proletariat.
This historical “law” fully applies to China as well.

“Our revolution is a bourgeois revolution, the workers must support the
bourgeoisie – say the worthless politicians from the camp of the
liquidators. Our revolution is a bourgeois revolution, say we who are
Marxists. The workers must open the eyes of the people to the fraud of
the bourgeois politicians, teach them not to place trust in promises and
to rely on _their_ OWN forces, on _their_ OWN organization, on _their_
OWN unity, and on _their_ OWN weapons alone.” [2]

This Leninist thesis is compulsory for the Orient as a whole. It must by
all means find a place in the program of the Comintern.

 

2. The Stages of the Chinese Revolution

The first stage of the Kuomintang was the period of domination of the
national bourgeoisie under the apologetic label of a “bloc of four
classes.” The second period, after Chiang Kai-shek’s _coup d’etat_, was
an experiment of parallel and “independent” domination of Chinese
Kerenskyism, in the shape of the Hankow government” of the “Left” Wang
Ching-wei. While the Russian Narodniks,” together with the Mensheviks,
lent to their short-lived “dictatorship” the form of an open dual power,
the Chinese “revolutionary democracy” did not even reach that stage. And
inasmuch as history in general does not work to order, there only
remains for us to understand that _there is not_ and _will not be_ any
other “democratic dictatorship” except the dictatorship exercised by the
Kuomintang since 1925. This remains equally true regardless of whether
the semi-unification of China accomplished by the Kuomintang is
maintained in the immediate future or the country is again dismembered.
But precisely at a time when the class dialectics of the revolution,
having spent all its other resources, clearly and conclusively put on
the order of the day the _dictatorship of the proletariat_, leading the
countless millions of oppressed and disinherited in city and village,
the ECCI advanced the slogan of a _democratic_ (i.e., bourgeois
democratic) dictatorship of the workers and peasants. The reply to this
formula was the Canton insurrection which, with all its prematurity,
with all the adventurism of its leadership, raised the curtain of a new
stage, or, more correctly, of the coming _third_ Chinese revolution. It
is necessary to dwell on this point in some detail.

Seeking to insure themselves against their past sins, the leadership
monstrously forced the course of events at the end of last year and
brought about the Canton miscarriage. However, even a miscarriage can
teach us a good deal concerning the organism of the mother and the
process of gestation. The tremendous and, from the standpoint of theory,
truly decisive significance of the Canton events for the fundamental
problems of the Chinese revolution is conditioned precisely upon the
fact that we have here a phenomenon rare in history and politics, a
virtual _laboratory experiment on a colossal scale_. We have paid for it
dearly, but this obliges us all the more to assimilate its lessons.

One of the fighting slogans of the Canton insurrection, according to the
account in PRAVDA (No.31), was the cry “Down with the Kuomintang!” The
Kuomintang banners and insignia were torn down and trampled under-foot.
But even after the “betrayal” of Chiang Kai-shek, and the subsequent
“betrayal” of Wang Ching-wei (betrayals not of their own class, but of
our … illusions), the ECCI had issued the solemn vow that: “We will not
surrender the banner of the Kuomintang!” The workers of Canton outlawed
the Kuomintang party, _declaring all of its tendencies illegal_. This
means that for the solution of the basic national tasks, not only the
big bourgeoisie but also the petty bourgeoisie was incapable of
producing a political force, a party, or a faction, in conjunction with
which the party of the proletariat might be able to solve the tasks of
the bourgeois democratic revolution. The key to the situation lies
precisely in the fact that _the task of winning the movement of the poor
peasants already fell entirely upon the shoulders of the proletariat_,
and directly upon the communist party; and that the approach to a
genuine solution of the bourgeois-democratic tasks of the revolution
necessitated the concentration of all power in the hands of the
proletariat.

PRAVDA carried the following report about the policies of the
short-lived Canton Soviet government:

“In the interests of the workers, the Canton Soviet issued decrees
establishing … workers’ control of industry through the factory
committees … the nationalization of big industry, transportation, and
banks.”

Further on such measures are mentioned as: “The confiscation of all
dwellings of the big bourgeoisie for the benefit of the toilers …”

Thus it was the Canton workers who were in power and, moreover, the
government was actually in the hands of the communist party. The program
of the new state power consisted not only in the confiscation of
whatever feudal estates there may be in Kwangtung in general; not only
in the establishment of the workers’ control of production; but also in
the nationalization of big industry, banks, and transportation, and even
the confiscation of bourgeois dwellings and all bourgeois property for
the benefit of the toilers. The question arises: if these are the
methods of a bourgeois revolution then what should the proletarian
revolution in China look like?

Notwithstanding the fact that the directives of the E.C.C.I. had nothing
to say on the subject of the proletarian dictatorship and socialist
measures; notwithstanding the fact that Canton is more petty bourgeois
in character than Shanghai, Hankow, and other industrial centers of the
country, the revolutionary overturn effected _against the Knomintang_
led automatically to the dictatorship of the proletariat which, at its
very first steps, found itself compelled by the entire situation to
resort to more radical measures than those with which the October
Revolution began. And this fact, despite its paradoxical appearance,
flows quite lawfully from the social relations of China as well as from
the entire development of the revolution.

Large and middle scale landed estates (such as obtain in China) are most
closely interlinked with city capital, including foreign capital. There
is no caste of feudal landlords in China in opposition to the
bourgeoisie. The most widespread, common, and hated exploiter in the
village is the kulak-usurer, the agent of finance capital in the cities.
The agrarian revolution is therefore just as much anti-feudal as it is
anti-bourgeois in character. In China, there will be practically no such
stage as the first stage of our October revolution in which the kulak
marched with the middle and poor peasant, frequently at their head,
against the landlord. The agrarian revolution in China signifies from
the outset, as it will signify subsequently, an uprising not only
against the few genuine feudal landlords and the bureaucracy, but also
against the kulaks and usurers. If in our country the poor peasant
committees appeared on the scene only during the second stage of the
October revolution, in the middle of 1918, in China, on the contrary,
they will, in one form or another, appear on the scene as soon as the
agrarian movement revives. The drive on the rich peasant will be the
first and not the second step of the Chinese October.

The agrarian revolution, however, is not the sole content of the present
historical struggle in China. The most extreme agrarian revolution, the
general division of land (which will naturally be supported by the
communist party to the very end), will not by itself provide a way out
of the economic blind alley. China requires just as urgently national
unity and economic sovereignty, that is, customs autonomy, or more
correctly, a monopoly of foreign trade. And this means _emancipation
from world imperialism-_ imperialism for which China remains the most
important prospective source not only of enrichment but also of actual
existence, constituting a safety valve against the internal explosions
of European capitalism today and American capitalism tomorrow. This is
what predetermines the gigantic scope and monstrous sharpness of the
struggle that faces the masses o China, all the iwe o now when the depth
of the stream of the struggle has already been plumbed and felt by all
of its participants.

The enormous role of foreign capital in Chinese industry and its way of
relying directly in defense of its plunder on its own “national”
bayonets,[3] render the program of workers’ control in China even less
realizable than it was in our country. The direct expropriation first of
the foreign capitalist and then of the Chinese capitalist enterprises
will most likely be made imperative by the course of the struggle, on
the day after the victorious insurrection.

Those objective socio-historical causes which pre-determined the
“October” outcome of the Russian revolution rise before us in China in a
still more accentuated form. The bourgeois and proletarian poles of the
Chinese nation stand opposed to each other even more irreconcilably, if
this is at all possible, than they did in Russia, since, on the one
hand, the Chinese bourgeoisie is directly bound up with foreign
imperialism and the latter’s military machine, and since, on the other
hand, the Chinese proletariat has from the very beginning established a
close bond with the Comintern and the Soviet Union. Numerically the
Chinese peasantry constitutes an even more overwhelming mass than the
Russian peasantry.[4] But being crushed in the vise of world
contradictions, upon the solution of which in one way or another its
fate depends, the Chinese peasantry is even less capable of playing a
_leading_ role than the Russian. At present this is no longer a matter
of theoretical forecast, but a fact verified completely in all its
aspects.

These fundamental and, at the same time, incontrovertible social and
political prerequisites of the third Chinese revolution demonstrate not
only that the formula of the democratic dictatorship has _hopelessly
outlived its usefulness,_ but also that the third Chinese revolution,
despite the great backwardness of China, or more correctly, because of
this great backwardness as compared with Russia, will not have a
“democratic” period, not even such a six month period as the October
Revolution had[5] (November 1917 to July 1918) ; but it will be
compelled from the very outset to effect the most decisive shake-up and
abolition of bourgeois property in city and village.

To be sure, this perspective does not harmonize with the pedantic and
schematic conceptions concerning the interrelations between economics
and politics. But the responsibility for this disharmony so disturbing
to the prejudices which have newly taken root and which were already
dealt a not inconsiderable blow by the October Revolution must be placed
not on “Trotskyism” but on the _law of uneven development._ In this
particular case this law is especially applicable.

It would be unwise pedantry to maintain that, had a Bolshevik policy
been applied in the revolution of 19251927, the Chinese Communist Party
would _unfailingly_ have come to power. But it is contemptible
philistinism to assert that such a possibility was entirely out of the
question. The mass movement of workers and peasants was on a scale
entirely adequate for this,[6] a was also the disintegration of the
ruling classes. The national bourgeoisie sent its Chiang Kai-sheks and
Wang Chjng-weis as envoys to Moscow, and through its Hu Han-mins knocked
at the door of the Comintern, precisely because it was hopelessly weak
in face of the revolutionary masses; it realized its weakness and sought
to insure itself. Neither the workers nor the peasants would have
followed the national bourgeoisie if we ourselves had not dragged them
by a rope. Had the Comintern pursued any sort of correct policy, the
outcome of the struggle of the communist party for the masses would have
been pre-determined—the Chinese proletariat would have supported the
communists, while the peasant war would have supported the revolutionary
proletariat.

If, at the beginning of the Northern expedition we had begun to organize
Soviets in the “liberated” districts (and the masses were instinctively
aspiring for that with all their might and main) we would have secured
the necessary basis and a revolutionary running start, we would have
rallied around us the agrarian uprisings, we would have built _our own_
army, we would have disintegrated the enemy armies; and despite the
youthfulness of the Communist Party of China, the latter would have been
able, thanks to proper guidance from the Comintern, to mature in these
exceptional years and to assume power, if not in the whole of China at
once, then at least in a considerable part of China. And, above all, we
would have had a party.

But something absolutely monstrous occurred precisely in the sphere of
leadership-a veritable historical catastrophe. The authority of the
Soviet Union, of the Bolshevik party, and of the Comintern served
entirely, first, to support Chiang Kai-shek against an independent
policy of the communist party, and then to support Wang Ching-wei as the
leader of the agrarian revolution. Having trampled underfoot the very
basis of Leninist policy and after breaking the spine of the young
Communist Party of China, the E.C.C.I. predetermined the victory of
Chinese Kerenskyism over Bolshevism, of the Chinese Miliukovs over the
Kerenskys, and of British and Japanese imperialism over the Chinese
Miliukovs.

In this and in this alone lies the meaning of what took place in China
in the course of 1925-1927.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. MINUTES OF THE SEVENTH PLENUM, ECCI, Vol.I, p.406.

2. Lenin, WORKS, Vol.XIV, part 1, p.11.

3. The total of foreign investments in China was estimated, as of 1931,
at U.S. $3,300,000,000. Of this total 78.1% was directly in business and
trade enterprises and 21.9% in loans to the Chinese Government. Foreign
capital controls nearly half the Chinese cotton industry. It directly
controls about one-third of China’s railways and has a mortgage of more
than $200,000,000 on the rest, with a total railway investment of
$641,300,000. Foreign bottoms carried 81.31% of China’s foreign and
coastal trade. Trade figures show a total adverse trade balance since
1902 of more than $3,000,000,000. There was an unrecorded but enormous
drain of silver as a result of the opium trade during the 19th century.
(For tables see C. F. Remer: _Foreign Investments in China,_ N.Y., 1933,
pp. 58; H. D. Fong: _Cotton Industry and Trade In China,_ Peking, 1932;
H. D. Fong: _China’s Industrialization,_ Shanghai, 1931; _China Year
Book)._ It is interesting to note that the total foreign investment in
Russia on the eve of the Great War was $3,882,000,000. To protect these
investments the imperialist powers maintain military garrisons in key
Chinese ports which totaled in 1927, ii,88o American, British, Japanese,
French and Italian marines and soldiers. There are also regularly
stationed American, British, Japanese, French and Italian fleets,
patrolling the coasts and rivers. They include cruisers, aircraft
carriers, destroyers, submarines and gunboats. There is also a large
foreign police personnel in the foreign concessions. All these forces
were increased during 1926-1927.

4. In the absence of authentic and complete population statistics in
China, there exist only estimates and partial studies. A count of
factory workers in 29 cities in 9 provinces in 1931 totaled 1,204,318.
Another estimate including transport workers, dockers, construction
workers and miners, brought the total to 2,750,000. Handicraftsmen,
coolies engaged in miscellaneous labor, carriers, shop employees,
apprentices, artisans, were estimated at 11,960,000 for all China in
1927, giving an approximate total for proletariat and semi-proletariat
of about j5,ooo,ooo. This may be compared to the estimated Russian
factory population in 1905 of about io,000,000. The best estimates and
studies of class divisions in the peasantry, who form about
three-quarters of the whole population, have been made by Chen Han-seng,
the noted agrarian economist, who found that in Kwangtung, as typical of
the South, poor peasants formed 74% of the population and held % of the
land. In Wusih, Central China, poor peasant families were 68.9% of the
total and held 14.2% of the land. In Paoting, in the North, poor
peasants were 65.2% with 25.9% of the land. Prof. Chen lists 65% of
China’s farm population as land hungry. (For statistical tables and
different estimates see: Chen Han-seng, _The Present Agrarian Problem in
China,_ Shanghai, 1933; H. D. Fong, _China’s Industrialization,_
Shanghai, 1931; Fang Fu-an, _Chinese Labour, Shanghai,_ 1931; Lowe
Chun-hwa, _Facing Labor Issues in China,_ Shanghai, 1933; _Proceedings
of the Pan-Pacific Trade Union Conference,_ Hankow, 1927.)

5. The distinction between the so-called democratic and the socialist
periods of the Russian Bolshevik revolution are described by Lenin as
follows: _“First_ there was a movement, in conjunction with the entire
peasantry, against the monarchy, against the landlords, against
medievalism, and to that extent the revolution remained a bourgeois, a
bourgeois-democratic one. Then it became a movement, in conjunction with
the poorest peasantry, with the semi-proletariat, with all the
exploited, against capitalism, including the village rich, the village
vultures and the speculators, and to that extent the revolution became a
socialist one. To attempt to put artificially a Chinese wall between the
two stages, and to separate them by any other factor than the degree of
preparedness of the proletariat and of its unity with the village poor,
means completely to pervert and vulgarize Marxism and to replace it by
liberalism. It means to smuggle through a reactionary defense of the
bourgeoisie against the socialist proletariat, under the cloak of
quasi-learned references to the progressive character of the bourgeoisie
as compared with medievalism.” (N. Lenin, _The Proletarian Revolution
and Kautsky the Renegade,_ London, 1920, p. 92.)

6. Organized workers in China rose from 230,000 in 1923 to 570,000 in
1925, 1,264,000 in 1926 and 2,800,000 in 1927. _(Pan-Pacific Worker,
No._ 2, Hankow, July 15, 1927.) More than 8oo,ooo workers participated
directly in the wave of strikes which followed the massacre of students
by British police in Shanghai on May 30, 1925. General strikes
completely paralyzed Shanghai and Hongkong, the latter strike lasting
sixteen months. The peasant movement, which took on modern forms of
organization only in 1922, directly embraced 9,720,000 peasants by March
1927, in Kwangtung, Hunan, Kiangsi and Hupeh provinces alone where
independent seizure of the land was begun by the peasants in 1926 and
carried out on a large scale, especially in Hunan, in the Spring of
1927.

The Third International After Lenin



III. SUMMARY AND PERSPECTIVES OF THE CHINESE REVOLUTION: ITS LESSONS FOR THE COUNTRIES OF THE ORIENT AND FOR THE WHOLE OF THE COMINTERN (PART 2)


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

3. Democratic Dictatorship or a Dictatorship of the Proletariat?

But how did the last Plenum of the ECCI evaluate the experiences of the
Chinese revolution, including the experience of the Canton insurrection?
What further perspectives did it outline? The resolution of the February
(1928) Plenum, which is the key to the corresponding sections of the
draft program on this subject, says concerning the Chinese revolution:

“It is incorrect to characterize it as a ‘permanent’ revolution [the
position of the representative of the ECCI]. The tendency to skip [?]
over the bourgeois-democratic stage of the revolution while
simultaneously [?] appraising the revolution as a ‘permanent’ revolution
is a mistake analogous to that committed by Trotsky in 1905 [?].”

The ideological life of the Comintern since Lenin’s departure from its
leadership, that is, since 1923, consisted primarily in a struggle
against so-called “Trotskyism” and particularly against the “permanent
revolution.” How is it, then, that in the fundamental question of the
Chinese revolution not only the Central Committee of the Communist Party
of China, but also the official delegate of the Comintern, i.e., a
leader who was sent with special instructions, happen to commit the very
same “mistake” for which hundreds of men are now exiled to Siberia, and
put in prison? The struggle around the Chinese question has been raging
for some two and a half years. When the Opposition declared that the old
Central Committee of the Communist Party of China (Chen Tu-hsiu), under
the influence of the false directives from the Comintern, conducted an
opportunist policy, this evaluation was declared to be “slander.” The
leadership of the Communist Party of China was pronounced
irreproachable. The celebrated Tang Ping-shan declared amid the general
approval of the Seventh Plenum of the ECCI that

“At the very first manifestations of Trotskyism, the Communist Party of
China and the Young Communist League immediately adopted a unanimous
resolution against Trotskyism.” [3]

But when, not withstanding; these “achievements,” events unfolded their
tragic logic which led to the first and then to the second and even more
frightful debacle of the revolution, the leadership of the Communist
Party of China, formerly flawless, was re-baptized as Menshevik and
deposed in the space of twenty-four hours. At the same time a decree was
promulgated that the new leadership fully reflected the line of the
Comintern. But no sooner did a new and a serious test arise than it was
discovered that the new Central Committee of the Communist Party of
China was guilty (as we have already seen, not in words, but in actions)
of swerving to the position of the so-called “permanent revolution.” The
delegate of the Comintern took the very same path. This astonishing and
truly incomprehensible fact can be explained only by the yawning
“scissors” between the instructions of the ECCI and the real dynamics of
the revolution.

We shall not dwell here upon the myth of the “permanent revolution” of
1905 which was placed in circulation in 1928 in order to sow confusion
and bewilderment. We shall confine ourselves to an examination of how
this myth broke down on the question of the Chinese revolution.

The first paragraph of the February resolution, from which the
above-quoted passage was taken, gives the following motives for its
negative attitude toward the so-called “permanent revolution”:

“The current period of the Chinese revolution is a period of a
bourgeois-democratic revolution which has not been completed either from
the economic standpoint (the agrarian revolution and the abolition of
feudal relations), or from the standpoint of the national struggle
against imperialism (the unification of China and the establishment of
national independence), or from the standpoint of the class nature of
the state (the dictatorship of the proletariat and the peasantry) …”

This presentation of motives is an unbroken chain of mistakes and
contradictions.

The ECCI taught that the Chinese revolution must secure for China the
opportunity to develop along the road to socialism. This goal could be
achieved only if the revolution did not halt merely at the solution of
the bourgeois-democratic tasks but continued to unfold, passing from one
stage to the next, i.e., continued to develop uninterruptedly (_or
permanently_) and thus lead China toward a socialist development. This
is precisely what Marx understood by the term “permanent revolution.”
How then can we, on the one hand, speak of a non-capitalist path of
development for China and, on the other, deny the permanent character of
the revolution in general?

But – insists the resolution of the ECCI – the revolution has not been
completed, either from the standpoint of the agrarian revolution or from
the standpoint of the national struggle against imperialism. Hence it
draws the conclusion about the bourgeois-democratic character of the
“present period of the Chinese revolution.” As a matter of fact the
“present period” is a period of counter-revolution. The ECCI doubtlessly
intends to say that the new resurgence of the Chinese revolution, or
_the third Chinese revolution_, will bear a bourgeois-democratic
character because the second Chinese revolution of 1925-1927 solved
neither the agrarian question nor the national question. However, even
thus amended, this reasoning is based upon a total failure to understand
the experiences and lessons of both the Chinese and the Russian
revolutions.

The February 1917 revolution in Russia left unsolved all the internal
and international problems which had led to the revolution – serfdom in
the villages, the old bureaucracy, the war, and economic debacle. Taking
this as a starting point, not only the SRs and the Mensheviks, but also
a considerable section of the leadership of our own party tried to prove
to Lenin that the “present period of the revolution is a period of the
bourgeois-democratic revolution.” In this, its basic consideration, the
resolution of the ECCI merely copies the objections which the
opportunists raised against the struggle for the dictatorship of the
proletariat waged by Lenin in 1917.

Furthermore, it appears that the bourgeois-democratic revolution remains
unaccomplished not only from the economic and national standpoint, but
also >from the “standpoint of the class nature of the state (the
dictatorship of the proletariat and the peasantry).” This can mean only
one thing: that the Chinese proletariat is forbidden to struggle for the
conquest of power so long as no “genuine” democratic government stands
at the helm in China. Unfortunately, no instructions are forthcoming as
to where we can get it.

The confusion is further increased by the fact that the slogan of
Soviets was rejected for China in the course of these two years on the
ground that the creation of Soviets is permissible presumably only
during the transition to the proletarian revolution (Stalin’s “theory”).
But when the Soviet revolution broke out in Canton and when its
participants drew the conclusion that this was precisely the transition
to the proletarian revolution, they were accused of “Trotskyism.” Is the
party to be educated by such methods? Is this the way to assist it in
the solution of supreme tasks?

To save a hopeless position, the resolution of the ECCI (without any
connection whatever with the entire trend of its thought) rushes in
post-haste to its last argument’taken from imperialism. It appears that
“the tendency to skip over the bourgeois-democratic stage is all the
more [!] harmful because such a formulation of the question eliminates
[?] the most important national peculiarity of the Chinese revolution,
which is a semi-colonial revolution.”

The only meaning that these senseless words can have is that the
imperialist yoke will be overthrown by some sort of non-proletarian
dictatorship. But this means that the “most important national
peculiarity” has been dragged in at the last moment in order to paint
the Chinese national bourgeoisie or the Chinese petty-bourgeois
“democracy” in bright colors. This argument can have no other meaning.
But this only “meaning” has been adequately examined by us in our
chapter “On the nature of the Colonial Bourgeoisie.” There is no need to
return to this subject.

China is still confronted with a vast, bitter, bloody, and prolonged
struggle for such elementary things as the liquidation of the most
“Asiatic” forms of slavery, national emancipation, and unification of
the country. But as the course of events has shown, it is precisely this
that makes impossible in the future any petty-bourgeois leadership or
even semi-leadership in the revolution. The unification and emancipation
of China today is an international task, no less so than the existence
of the USSR. This task can be solved only by means of a desperate
struggle on the part of the downtrodden, hungry, and persecuted masses
under the direct leadership of the proletarian vanguard’a struggle not
only against world imperialism, but also against its economic and
political agency in China, against the bourgeoisie, including the
“national” bourgeoisie and all its democratic flunkeys. And this is
nothing else than the road toward the dictatorship of the proletariat.

Beginning with April, 1917, Lenin explained to his opponents, who
accused him of having adopted the position of the “permanent
revolution,” that the dictatorship of the proletariat and the peasantry
was realized partially in the epoch of dual power. He explained later
that this dictatorship met with its further extension during the first
period of Soviet power from November 1917 until July 1918, when the
entire peasantry, together with the workers, effected the agrarian
revolution while the working class did not as yet proceed with the
confiscation of the mills and factories, but experimented with workers’
control. So far as the “class nature of the state” was concerned, the
democratic-SR-Menshevik “dictatorship” gave all that it could give – the
miscarriage of dual power. As to the agrarian overturn, the revolution
gave birth to a perfectly healthy and strong baby, but it was the
proletarian dictatorship that functioned as the midwife. In other words,
what the theoretical formula of the dictatorship of the proletariat and
the peasantry had combined, was dissociated in the course of the actual
class struggle. The hollow shell of semi-power was provisionally
entrusted to Kerensky-Tseretelli, while the real kernel of the
agrarian-democratic revolution fell to the share of the victorious
working class. This dialectical dissociation of the democratic
dictatorship, the leaders of the ECCI failed to understand. They drove
themselves into a political blind alley by condemning mechanically any
“skipping over the bourgeois-democratic stage” and by endeavoring to
guide the historical process in accordance with circular letters. _If we
are to understand by the bourgeois-democratic stage, the accomplishment
of the agrarian revolution by means of a “democratic dictatorship,” then
it was the October Revolution itself that audaciously “skipped” over the
bourgeois-democratic stage._ Should it not be condemned for it?

Why is it then that the historically inevitable course of events which
was the highest expression of Bolshevism in Russia must prove to be
“Trotskyism” in China? No doubt owing to the very same logic which
declares to be suitable for China the theory of the Martynovs, a theory
fought by Bolshevism for two decades in Russia.

But is it at all permissible to draw here an analogy with Russia? Our
answer is that the slogan of a democratic dictatorship of the
proletariat and the peasantry was constructed by the leaders of the ECCI
exclusively and entirely in accordance with the method of analogy, but a
formal and literary analogy and not a materialist and historical
analogy. An analogy between China and Russia is entirely admissible if
we find the proper approach to it, and Lenin made excellent use of such
an analogy. Moreover he did so not _after_ but before the events, as if
he had foreseen the future blunders of the epigones. Hundreds of times
Lenin had to defend the October Revolution of the proletariat that had
the audacity to conquer power _notwithstanding the fact_ that the
bourgeois-democratic tasks had not been solved. Precisely _because of
that, and precisely in order to do that_, replied Lenin. Addressing
himself to the pedants, who in their arguments against the conquest of
power referred to the economic immaturity of Russia for socialism, which
was “incontestable” for him [4], Lenin wrote on January 16, 1923:

“It does not even occur to them, for instance, that Russia, standing on
the border between civilized countries and countries which were for the
first time definitely drawn by this war into the vortex of civilization,
all Eastern countries and non-European countries’that Russia therefore
could and should have manifested certain peculiarities which fall, of
course, along the general lines of world development but which make its
revolution different from all preceding revolutions of the Western
European countries and which introduce certain partial innovations in
approaching the countries of the Orient.” [5]

The “peculiarity” which brings Russia _closer_ to the countries of the
Orient was seen by Lenin precisely in the fact that the young
proletariat, at an early stage, had to grasp the broom and sweep feudal
barbarism and all sorts of rubbish from its path toward socialism.

If, consequently, we are to take as our starting point the Leninist
analogy between China and Russia, then we must say: from the standpoint
of the “_political nature of the State_,” all that could have been
obtained through the democratic dictatorship in China has been put to
the test, first in Sun Yat-sen’s Canton, then on the road from Canton to
Shanghai, which culminated in the Shanghai _coup d’etat_, and then in
Wuhan where the Left Kuomintang appeared in its chemically pure form,
i.e., according to the directives of the ECCI, as the organizer of the
agrarian revolution, but in reality as its hangman. But the social
_content_ of the bourgeois-democratic revolution will fill the initial
period of the coming dictatorship of the Chinese proletariat and the
peasant poor. To advance now the slogan of a democratic dictatorship of
the proletariat and the peasantry after the role not only of the Chinese
bourgeoisie, but also of Chinese “democracy” has been put to a thorough
test, after it has become absolutely incontestable that ’’democracy”
will play even a greater hangman’s role in the coming battles than in
the past’to advance this slogan now is simply to create the means of
covering up the new varieties of Kuomintangism and to prepare a noose
for the proletariat.

Let us recall for the sake of completeness what Lenin tersely said about
those Bolsheviks who insisted upon counterposing to the SR-Menshevik
experience the slogan of a “genuine” democratic dictatorship:

“Whoever now talks only about the ’revolutionary-democratic dictatorship
of the proletariat and peasantry’ has lost touch with life, has, in
virtue of this circumstance, _gone over_, in practice, to the petty
bourgeoisie against the proletarian _class_ struggle; and he ought to be
relegated to the museum of ’Bolshevik’ pre-revolutionary antiquities
(or, as one might call it, the museum of ’old Bolsheviks’).[6]

These words ring as if they were actually spoken today. Of course it is
not at all a question of calling the Communist Party of China to an
immediate insurrection for the seizure of power. The pace depends
entirely upon the circumstances. The consequences of defeat cannot be
removed merely by revising the tactic. The revolution is now subsiding.
The half-concealing resolution of the ECCI, the bombast about imminent
revolutionary onslaughts, while countless people are being executed and
a terrific commercial and industrial crisis rages in China, are criminal
light-mindedness and nothing else. After three major defeats an economic
crisis does not rouse but, on the contrary, depresses the proletariat
which, us it is, has already been bled white, while the executions only
destroy the politically weakened party. We are entering in China into a
period of reflux, and consequently into a period in which the party
deepens its theoretical roots, educates itself critically, creates and
strengthens firm organizational links in all spheres of the working
class movement, organizes rural nuclei, leads and unites partial, at
first defensive and later offensive, battles of the workers and the
peasant poor.

What will turn the tide in the mass movement? What circumstances will
give the necessary revolutionary impulsion to the proletarian vanguard
at the head of the many-millioned masses? This cannot be predicted. The
future will show whether internal processes alone will be sufficient or
an added impulsion will have to come from without.

There are sufficient grounds for assuming that the smashing of the
Chinese revolution, directly due to the false leadership, will permit
the Chinese and foreign bourgeoisie to overcome to a lesser or greater
degree the frightful economic crisis now raging in the country.
Naturally, this will be done on the backs and bones of the workers and
peasants. This phase of “stabilization” will once again group and fuse
together the workers, restore their class self-confidence in order
subsequently to bring them into still sharper conflict with the enemy,
but on a higher historical stage. It will be possible to speak seriously
about the perspective of an agrarian revolution only on the condition
that there will be a new mounting wave of the proletarian movement on
the offensive.

It is not excluded that the first stage of the coming third revolution
may reproduce in a very abridged and modified form the stages which have
already been passed, presenting, for instance, some new parody of the
“national united front.” But this first stage will be sufficient only to
give the communist party a chance to put forward and announce its
“April” thesis, that is, its program and tactics of the seizure of
power, before the popular masses.

But what does the draft program say on this?

“The transition to the proletarian dictatorship is possible here [in
China] only after a series of preparatory stages [?] only as a result of
a whole period of the growing over [??] of the bourgeois-democratic
revolution into the socialist revolution.”

In other words, all the “stages” that have already been gone through are
not to be taken into account. The draft program still sees ahead what
has already been left behind. This is precisely what is meant by a
tail-endist formulation. It opens wide the gates for new experiments in
the spirit of the Kuomintang course. Thus the concealment of the old
mistakes inevitably prepares the road for new errors.

If we enter the new upsurge, which will develop at an incomparably more
rapid tempo than the last one, with a blueprint of “democratic
dictatorship” that has already outlived its usefulness, there can be no
doubt that the third Chinese revolution, like the second, will be led to
its doom.

 

4. Adventurism as the Product of Opportunism

The second paragraph of the same resolution of the February plenum of
the ECCI says:

“The first wave of the broad revolutionary movement of workers and
peasants which in the main proceeded under the slogans, and to a
considerable extent _under the leadership of the communist party_, is
over. It ended in several centers of the revolutionary movement with
_heaviest defeats_ for the workers and peasants, the physical
extermination of the communists and revolutionary cadres of the labor
and peasant movement in general.”

When the “wave” was surging high, the ECCI said that the whole movement
was entirely under the blue banner and leadership of the Kuomintang
which even took the place of Soviets. It is precisely on that ground
that the communist party was subordinated to the Kuomintang. But that is
exactly why the revolutionary movement ended with “heaviest defeats.”
Now when these defeats have been recognized, an attempt is being made to
erase the Kuomintang from the past as if it had never existed, as if the
ECCI had not declared the blue banner its own.

There have been no defeats either in Shanghai or in Wuhan in the past;
there were merely transitions of the revolution “into a higher phase” —
that is what we have been taught. Now the sum total of these transitions
is suddenly declared to be “heaviest defeats for the workers and
peasants.” However, in order to mask to some extent this unprecedented
political bankruptcy of forecasts and evaluations, the concluding
paragraph of the resolution declares:

“The ECCI makes it the duty of all sections of the CI to fight against
the social democratic and Trotskyist slanders to the effect that the
Chinese revolution has been liquidated [?].”

In the first paragraph of the resolution we were told that “Trotskyism”
was the idea of the _permanent_ Chinese revolution, that is, a
revolution which is precisely at this time growing over from the
bourgeois to the socialist phase; from the last paragraph we learn that
according to the “Trotskyists,” “the Chinese revolution has been
liquidated.” How can a “_liquidated_” revolution be a _permanent_
revolution? Here we have Bukharin in all his glory.

Only complete and reckless irresponsibility permits of such
contradictions which corrode all revolutionary thought at its roots.

If we are to understand by “liquidation” of the revolution the fact that
the labor and peasant offensive has been beaten back and drowned in
blood, that the masses are in a state of retreat and decline, that
before another onslaught there must be, apart from many other
circumstances, a molecular process at work among the masses which
requires a certain period of time, the duration of which cannot be
determined beforehand; if “liquidation” is to be understood in this way,
it does not in any manner differ from the “heaviest defeats” which the
ECCI has finally been compelled to recognize. Or are we to understand
liquidation literally, as the actual elimination of the Chinese
revolution, that is, of the very possibility and inevitability of its
rebirth on a new plane? One can speak of such a perspective seriously
and so as not to create confusion only in two cases – if China were
doomed to dismemberment and complete extirpation, an assumption for
which there is no basis whatever, or if the Chinese bourgeoisie would
prove capable of solving the basic problems of Chinese life in its own
non-revolutionary way. Is it not this last variant which the
theoreticians of the “bloc of four classes,” who directly drove the
communist party under the yoke of the bourgeoisie, seek to ascribe to us
now?

History repeats itself. The blind men who did not understand the scope
of the defeat of 1923, for a year and a half accused us of
“liquidationism” towards the German revolution. But even this lesson,
which cost the International so dearly, taught them nothing. At present
they use their old rubber stamps, only this time substituting China for
Germany. To be sure, their need to find “liquidators” is more acute
today than it was four years ago, for this time it is much too obviously
apparent that if anybody did “liquidate” the second Chinese revolution
it was the authors of the “Kuomintang” course.

The strength of Marxism lies in its ability to foretell. In this sense
the Opposition can point to an absolute confirmation in experience of
its prognosis. At first concerning the Kuomintang as a whole, then
concerning the “Left” Kuomintang and the Wuhan government, and, finally,
concerning the “deposit” on the third revolution, that is the Canton
insurrection. What further confirmation could there be of one’s
theoretical correctness?

The very same opportunist line, which through the policy of capitulation
to the bourgeoisie has already brought heaviest defeats to the
revolution during its first two stages, “grew over” in the third stage
into a policy of adventurous raids on the bourgeoisie and thus made the
defeat final.

Had the leadership not hurried yesterday to leap over the defeats which
it had itself brought about, it would first of all have explained to the
Communist Party of China that victory is not gained in one sweep, that
on the road to the armed insurrection there still remains a period of
intense, incessant, and savage struggle for political influence on the
workers and peasants.

On September 27, 1927, we said to the Presidium of the ECCI:

“Today’s papers report that the revolutionary army has occupied Swatow.
It is already several weeks that the armies of Ho Lung and Yeh Ting have
been advancing. PRAVDA calls these armies revolutionary armies … But I
ask you: what prospects does the movement of the revolutionary army
which captured Swatow raise before the Chinese revolution? What are the
slogans of the movement? What is its program? What should, be its
organizational forms? What has become of the slogan of Chinese Soviets,
which PRAVDA suddenly advanced for a single day in July?”

Without first counterposing the communist party to the Kuomintang as a
whole, without the party’s agitation among the masses for Soviets and a
Soviet government, without an independent mobilization of the masses
under the slogans of the agrarian revolution and of national
emancipation, without the creation, broadening, and strengthening of the
local Soviets of workers’, soldiers’, and peasants’ deputies, the
insurrection of Ho Lung and Yeh Ting, even apart from their opportunist
policy, could not fail to be only an isolated adventure, a
pseudo-Communist Makhno feat; it could not fail to crash against its own
isolation. And it has crashed.

The Canton insurrection was a broader and deeper repetition of the Ho
Lung-Yeh Ting adventure, only with infinitely more tragic consequences.

The February resolution of the ECCI combats putschistic moods in the
Communist Party of China, that is, tendencies toward armed uprisings. It
does not say, however, that these tendencies are a reaction to the
entire opportunist policy of 1925-1927, and an inevitable consequence of
the purely military command issued from above to “change the step,”
without an evaluation of all that had been done, without an open
revaluation of the basis of the tactic, and without a clear perspective.
Ho Lung’s campaign and the Canton insurrection were – and under the
circumstances could not fail to be – breeders of putschism.

A real antidote to putschism as well as to opportunism can be only a
clear understanding of the truth that the leadership of the armed
insurrection of the workers and poor peasants, the seizure of power, and
the institution of a revolutionary dictatorship fall henceforth entirely
upon the shoulders of the Communist Party of China. If the latter is
permeated thoroughly with the understanding of this perspective, it will
be as little inclined to improvise military raids on towns or armed
insurrections in traps as to chase humbly after the enemy’s banner.

The resolution of the ECCI condemns itself to utter impotence by the
fact alone that in arguing most abstractly concerning the
inadmissibility of leaping over stages and the harmfulness of putschism,
it entirely ignores the class content of the Canton insurrection and the
short-lived Soviet regime which it brought into existence. We
Oppositionists hold that this insurrection was an adventure of the
leaders in an effort to save their “prestige.” But it is clear to us
that even an adventure develops according to laws which are determined
by the structure of the social milieu. That is why we look to the Canton
insurrection for the features of the future phase of the Chinese
revolution. These features fully correspond with our theoretical
analysis made prior to the Canton uprising. But how much more imperative
it is for the ECCI, which holds that the Canton uprising was a correct
and normal link in the chain of struggle, to give a clear class
characterization of the Canton insurrection. However, there is not a
word about this in the resolution of the ECCI, although the Plenum met
immediately after the Canton events. Is this not the most convincing
proof that the present leadership of the Comintern, because it
stubbornly pursues a false policy, is compelled to occupy itself with
the fictitious errors of 1905 and other years without daring to approach
the Canton insurrection of 1927, the meaning of which completely upsets
the blueprint for revolutions in the East which is set down in the draft
program?

 

5. Soviets and Revolution

In the February resolution of the ECCI the representatives of the
Comintern, “Comrade N. and others,” are made responsible for the
“absence of an _elected_ Soviet in Canton as an organ of insurrection.”
Behind this charge in reality lies an astounding admission.

In the report of PRAVDA (No.31), written on the basis of first-hand
documents, it was stated that a Soviet government had been established
in Canton. But not a word was mentioned to indicate that the Canton
Soviet was _not_ an elected organ, i.e., that it was not a _Soviet_ –
for how can there be a Soviet which was not elected? We learn this from
the resolution. Let us reflect for a moment on the signIficance of this
fact. The ECCI tells us now that a Soviet is necessary to effect an
armed insurrection, but by no means prior to that time. But lo and
behold! When the date for the insurrection is set, there is no Soviet.
To create an elected Soviet is not an easy matter. It is necessary that
the masses know from experience what a Soviet is, that they understand
its form, that they have learned something in the past to accustom them
to an elected Soviet organization. There was not even a sign of this in
China, for the slogan of Soviets was declared to be a Trotskyist slogan
precisely in the period when it should have become the nerve center of
the entire movement. When, however, helter-skelter, a date was set for
an insurrection so as to skip over their own defeats, they
simultaneously had to _appoint_ a Soviet as well. If this error is not
laid bare to the core, the slogan of Soviets can be transformed into a
strangling noose of the revolution.

Lenin in his time explained to the Mensheviks that the fundamental
historical task of the Soviets is to organize, or help organize, the
conquest of power so that on the day after the victory they become the
organ of that power. The epigones’and not the disciples’draw from this
the conclusion that Soviets can be organized only when the 12th hour of
the insurrection has struck. Lenin’s broad generalization they transform
_post factum_ into a little recipe which does not serve the interests of
the revolution but imperils it.

Before the Bolshevik Soviets in October 1917 captured power, the SR and
Menshevik Soviets had existed for nine months. Twelve years before, the
first revolutionary Soviets existed in Petersburg, Moscow, and scores of
other cities. Before the Soviet of 1905 was extended to embrace the
mills and factories of the capital, there was created in Moscow, during
the strike, a Soviet of printers’ deputies. Several months before this,
in May 1905, a mass strike in Ivanovo-Voznesiensk set up a leading organ
which already contained all the essential features of a Soviet of
workers’ deputies. Between the first experiment of setting up a Soviet
of workers’ deputies and the gigantic experiment of setting up a Soviet
government, more than twelve years rolled by. Of course, such a period
is not at all required for all other countries, including China. But to
think that the Chinese workers are capable of building Soviets on the
basis of the little recipe that has been substituted for Lenin’s broad
generalization is to substitute impotent and importunate pedantry for
the dialectic of revolutionary action. Soviets must be set up not on the
eve of the insurrection, not under the slogan of immediate seizure of
power’for if the matter has reached the point of the seizure of power,
if the masses are prepared for an armed insurrection _without a Soviet_,
it means that there have been other organizational forms and methods
which made possible the performance of the preparatory work to insure
the success of the uprising. Then the question of Soviets becomes of
secondary importance and is reduced to a question of organizational
technique or merely to a question of denomination. The task of the
Soviets is not merely to issue the call for the insurrection or to carry
it out, but to _lead the masses toward the insurrection through the
necessary stages_. At first the Soviet rallies the masses not to the
slogan of armed insurrection, but to partial slogans, so that only
later, step by step, the masses are brought towards the slogan of
insurrection without scattering them on the road and without allowing
the vanguard to become isolated from the class. The Soviet appears most
often and primarily in connection with strike struggles which have the
perspectives of revolutionary development, but are in the given moment
limited merely to economic demands. The masses must sense and understand
while in action that the Soviet is _their_ organization, that it
marshals the forces for a struggle, for resistance, for self-defense,
and for an offensive. They can sense and understand this not >from an
action of a single day nor in general from any single act, but from the
experience of several weeks, months, and perhaps years, with or without
interruptions. That is why only an epigonic and bureaucratic leadership
can restrain the awakening and rising masses from creating Soviets in
conditions when the country is passing through an epoch of revolutionary
upheavals and when the working class and the poor peasants have before
them the prospect of capturing power, even though this is a perspective
of one of the subsequent stages and even if this perspective can be
envisaged in the given phase only by a small minority. Such was always
our conception of the Soviets. We evaluated the Soviets as that broad
and flexible organizational form which is accessible to the masses who
have just awakened at the very first stages of their revolutionary
upsurge; and which is capable of uniting the working class in its
entirety, independent of the size of that section which, in the given
phase, has already matured to the point of understanding the task of the
seizure of power.

Is any documentary evidence really necessary? Here, for instance, is
what Lenin wrote about the Soviets in the epoch of the first revolution:

“The Social Democratic Labor Party of Russia [the name of the party at
that time] has never refused to utilize at _moments of greater or
smaller revolutionary upsurge_ certain non-party organizations of the
type of Soviets of Workers’ Deputies in order to strengthen the
influence of the social democrats on the working class and to
consolidate the social democratic labor movement.” [7]

One could cite voluminous literary and historic evidence of this type.
But one would imagine that the question is sufficiently clear without
them.

In contradistinction to this the epigones have converted the Soviets
into an organizational parade unifo rm with which the party simply
dresses up the proletariat on the eve of the capture of power. But this
is precisely the time when we find that the Soviets cannot be improvised
in 24 hours, by order, for the direct purpose of an armed insurrection.
Such experiments must inevitably assume a fictitious character and the
absence of the most necessary conditions for the capture of power is
masked by the external ritual of a Soviet system. That is what happened
in Canton where the Soviet was simply appointed to observe the ritual.
That is where the epigone formulation of the question leads.

***

During the polemics on the Chinese events the Opposition was accused of
the following alleged flagrant contradiction: whereas from 1926 on the
Opposition advanced the slogan of Soviets for China, its representatives
spoke against the slogan of Soviets for Germany in the Autumn of 1923.
On no other point perhaps has scholastic political thought expressed
itself so glaringly as in this accusation. Yes, we demanded for China a
_timely_ start for the creation of Soviets as independent organizations
of workers and peasants, _when the wave of revolutionary upsurge was
mounting._

The chief significance of the Soviets was to be that of _opposing the
workers and peasants to the Kuomintang bourgeoisie_ and its Left
Kuomintang agency. The slogan of Soviets in China meant above all the
break with the suicidal and infamous “bloc of four classes” and the
withdrawal of the communist party from the Kuomintang. The center of
gravity consequently lay not in bare organizational forms, but in the
class line.

In the Autumn of 1923 in Germany it was a question of organizational
form only. As a result of the extreme passivity, backwardness, and
tardiness of the leadership of the Comintern and the Communist Party of
Germany, the moment for a timely call for the organization of Soviets
was missed. The factory committees, due to pressure from below and of
their own accord, had occupied in the labor movement of Germany by the
Autumn of 1923 the place which would no doubt have been much more
successfully occupied by Soviets had there been a correct and daring
policy on the part of the communist party. The acuteness of the
situation had in the meantime reached its sharpest point. To lose any
more time would have meant definitely to miss the revolutionary
situation. The insurrection was finally placed on the order of the day,
with very little time left. To advance the slogan of Soviets under such
conditions would have been the greatest pedantic stupidity conceivable.
The Soviet is not a talisman with omnipotent powers of salvation. In a
situation such as had then developed, the hurried creation of Soviets
would only have duplicated the factory committees. It would have become
necessary to deprive the latter of their revolutionary functions and to
transfer them to the newly-created and still utterly unauthoritative
Soviets. And when was this to be done? Under conditions in which each
day counted. This would have meant to substitute for revolutionary
action a most pernicious game in organizational gew-gaws.

It is incontestable that the organizational form of a Soviet can be of
enormous importance; but only at a time when it furnishes a timely
reflection of the correct political line. And conversely, it can acquire
a no less negative meaning if it is converted into a fiction, a fetish,
a bagatelle. The German Soviets created at the very last moment in the
Autumn of 1923 would have added nothing politically; they would only
have caused organizational confusion. What happened in Canton was even
worse yet. The Soviet which was created in a hurry to observe the ritual
was only a masquerade for the adventurist putsch. That is why we
discovered, after it was all over, that the Canton Soviet resembled an
ancient Chinese dragon simply drawn on paper. The policy of pulling
rotten strings and paper dragons is not our policy. We were against
improvising Soviets by telegraph in Germany in September 1923. We were
for the creation of Soviets in China in 1926. We were against the
masquerade Soviet in Canton in 1927. There are no contradictions here.
We have here instead the profound unity of the conception of the
dynamics of the revolutionary movement and its organizational forms.

The question of the role and significance of the Soviets which had been
distorted and confused and obscured by the theory and practice of recent
years, has not been illuminated in the least in the draft program.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

3. MINUTES, p.205.

4. WORKS, Vol.XVIII, part 2, p.119.

5. IBID., p.118.

6. _Works_, Vol.XIV, part 1, p.29.

7. WORKS, Vol.VIII, p.215.

The Third International After Lenin



III. SUMMARY AND PERSPECTIVES OF THE CHINESE REVOLUTION: ITS LESSONS FOR THE COUNTRIES OF THE ORIENT AND FOR THE WHOLE OF THE COMINTERN (PART 3)


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

6. The Question of the Character of the Coming Chinese Revolution

The slogan of the dictatorship of the proletariat, which leads behind it
the peasant poor, is inseparably bound up with the question of the
socialist character of the coming, third revolution in China. And
inasmuch as not only history repeats itself but also the mistakes which
people counterpose to its requirements, we can already hear the
objection that China has not yet matured for a socialist revolution. But
this is an abstract and lifeless formulation of the question. For has
Russia, taken by itself, matured for socialism? According to Lenin – NO!
It has matured for the dictatorship of the proletariat as the only
method for solving unpostponable national tasks. But the destiny of the
dictatorship as a whole is determined in the last analysis by the trend
of _world_ development, which, of course, does not exclude but rather
presupposes a correct policy on the part of the proletarian
dictatorship, the consolidation and development of the workers’ and
peasants’ alliance, an all-sided adaptation to national conditions on
the one hand, and to the trend of world development on the other. This
fully holds true for China as well.

In the same article entitled _On Our Revolution_ (January 16, 1923), in
which Lenin establishes that the peculiarity of Russia proceeds along
the lines of the peculiar development of the Eastern countries, he
brands as “infinitely hackneyed” the argument of European social
democracy to the effect “that we have not matured for socialism, that we
lack, as some of these ‘erudite’ gentlemen say, the objective economic
prerequisites for Socialism.” But Lenin ridicules the “erudite”
gentlemen not because he himself recognized the _existence_ of the
economic prerequisites for Socialism in Russia but because he holds that
the rejection of the seizure of power does not at all follow, as pedants
and philistines think, from the absence of these prerequisites necessary
for an independent construction of socialism. In this article of his,
Lenin for the hundred and first time, or, rather, for the thousand and
first time replies to the sophisms of the heroes of the Second
International: “This _incontrovertible_ considerations [the immaturity
of Russia for Socialism] … is not decisive for the evaluation of our
revolution.” [8] That is what the authors of the draft program refuse
and are unable to understand. In itself the thesis of the economic and
cultural immaturity of China as well as Russia’China, of course, more so
than Russia’is incontrovertible. But hence it does not at all follow
that the proletariat has to renounce the conquest of power, when this
conquest is dictated by the entire historical context and the
revolutionary situation in the country.

The concrete, historical, political, and actual question is reducible
not to whether China has economically matured for “its own” socialism,
but whether China has ripened politically for the proletarian
dictatorship. These two questions are not at all identical. They might
be regarded as identical were it not for the law of uneven development.
This is where this law is in place and fully applies to the
interrelationship between economics and politics. Then China has matured
for the dictatorship of the proletariat? Only the experience of the
struggle can provide a categorical answer to this question. By the same
token, only the struggle can settle the question as to when and under
what conditions the real unification, emancipation, and regeneration of
China will take place. anyone who sags that China has not matured for
the dictatorship of the proletariat declares thereby that the third
Chinese revolution is postponed for many years to come.

Of course, matters would be quite hopeless if feudal survivals did
really _dominate_ in Chinese economic life, as the resolutions of the
ECCI asserted. But fortunately, _survivals_ in general cannot dominate.
The draft program on this point, too, does not rectify the errors
committed, but reaffirms them in a roundabout and nebulous fashion. The
draft speaks of the “predominance of medieval feudal relations both in
the economics of the country and in the political superstructure …” This
is false to the core. What does _predominance_ mean? Is it a question of
the number of people involved? Or the dominant and leading role in the
economics of the country? The extraordinarily rapid growth of home
industry on the basis of the all-embracing role of mercantile and bank
capital; the complete dependence of the most important agrarian
districts on the market; the enormous and ever-growing role of foreign
trade; the all-sided subordination of the Chinese village to the city –
all these bespeak the unconditional predominance, the direct domination
of capitalist relations in China. The social relations of serfdom and
semi-serfdom are undeniably very strong. They stem in part from the days
of feudalism; and in part they constitute a new formation, that is, the
regeneration of the past on the basis of the retarded development of the
productive forces, the surplus agrarian population, the activities of
merchants’ and usurers’ capital, etc. However, it is capitalist
relations that dominated and not “feudal” (more correctly, serf and,
generally, precapitalist) relations. Only thanks to this dominant role
of capitalist relations can we speak seriously of the prospects of
proletarian hegemony in the national revolution. Otherwise, there is no
making the ends meet.

“The strength of the proletariat in any capitalist country is infinitely
greater than the proportion of the proletariat in the total population.
This is due to the fact that the proletariat is in economic command of
the central points and nerve centers of the entire capitalist system of
economy, and also because the proletariat expresses economically and
politically the _real_ interests of the vast majority of the toilers
under capitalism.

“For this reason the proletariat, even if it constitutes the minority of
the population (or in cases where the conscious and truly revolutionary
vanguard of the proletariat comprises the minority of the population),
is capable both of overthrowing the bourgeoisie and of attracting
subsequently to its side many allies from among the masses of
semi-proletarians and petty bourgeois, who will never come out
beforehand for the domination of the proletariat, who will not
understand the conditions and tasks of this domination, but who will
convince themselves solely from their subsequent experiences of the
inevitability, justice, and legitimacy of the proletarian dictatorship.”
[9]

The role of the Chinese proletariat in production is already very great.
In the next few years it will only increase still further. Its political
role, as events have shown, could have been gigantic. But the whole line
of the leadership was directed entirely against permitting the
proletariat to conquer the leading role.

The draft program says that successful socialist construction is
possible in China “only on the condition that it is directly supported
by countries under the proletarian dictatorship.” Thus, here, in
relation to China, the same principle is recognized which the party has
always recognized in regard to Russia. But if China lacks sufficient
inner forces for an _independent_ construction of socialist society,
then according to the theory of Stalin-Bukharin, the Chinese proletariat
should not seize power at any stage of the revolution. Or it may be that
the existence of the USSR settles the question in just the opposite
sense. Then it follows that our technology is sufficient to build a
socialist society not only in the USSR but also in China, i.e., in the
two economically most backward countries with a combined population of
six hundred million. Or perhaps the _inevitable_ dictatorship of the
proletariat in China is “inadmissible” because that dictatorship will be
included in the chain of the world-wide socialist revolution, thus
becoming not only its link, but its driving force? But this is precisely
Lenin’s basic formulation of the October Revolution, the “peculiarity”
of which follows precisely along the lines of development of the Eastern
countries. We see thus how the revisionist theory of socialism in one
country, evolved in 1925 in order to wage a struggle against Trotskyism,
distorts and confuses matters each time a new major revolutionary
problem is approached.

The draft program goes still further along this same road. It
counterposes China and India to “Russia before 1917” and Poland (“etc.”)
as countries with “a certain minimum of industry sufficient for the
triumphant construction of socialism,” or (as is more definitely and
therefore more erroneously stated elsewhere) as countries possessing the
“necessary and sufficient material prerequisites … for the complete
construction of socialism.” This, as we already know, is a mere play
upon Lenin’s expression “necessary and sufficient” prerequisites; a
fraudulent and an impermissible jugglery because Lenin definitely
enumerates the _political and organizational prerequisites_, including
the _technical, cultural, and international_ prerequisites. But the
chief point that remains is: how can one determine a priori the “minimum
of industry” sufficient for the complete building of socialism once it
is a question of an uninterrupted world struggle between two economic
systems, two social orders, and a struggle, moreover, in which our
_economic_ base is infinitely the weaker?

If we take into consideration only the economic lever, it is clear that
we in the USSR, and all the more so in China and India, have a far
shorter arm of the lever than world capitalism. But the entire question
is resolved by the _revolutionary struggle_ of the two systems on a
world scale. In the political struggle, the long arm of the lever is _on
our side_, or, to put it more correctly, it can and must prove so in our
hands, if our policy is correct.

Again, in the same article _On Our Revolution_, after stating that “a
certain cultural level” is necessary for the creation of “socialism,”
Lenin adds: “although no one can tell what this certain cultural level
is.” Why can no one tell? Because the question is settled by the
struggle, by the rivalry between tbe two social systems and the two
cultures, _on an international scale_. Breaking completely with this
idea of Lenin’s, which flows from the very essence of the question, the
draft program asserts that in 1917 Russia had precisely the “minimum
technology” and consequently also the culture necessary for the building
of socialism in one country. The authors of the draft attempt to tell in
the program that which “no one can tell” _a priori_.

It is impermissible, impossible, and absurd to seek a criterion for the
“sufficient minimum” within national states (“ Russia prior to 1917”)
when the whole question is settled by international dynamics. In this
false, arbitrary, isolated national criterion rests the theoretical
basis of national narrowness in politics, the precondition for
inevitable national-reformist and social patriotic blunders in the
future.

 

7. On the Reactionary Idea of “Two-Class Workers’ and Peasants’ Parties” for the Orient

The lessons of the second Chinese revolution are lessons for the entire
Comintern, but primarily for all the countries of the Orient.

All the arguments presented in defense of the Menshevik line in the
Chinese revolution must, if we take them seriously, hold trebly good for
India. The imperialist yoke assumes in India, the classic colony,
infinitely more direct and palpable forms than in China. The survivals
of feudal and serf relations in India are immeasurably deeper and
greater. Nevertheless, or rather precisely for this reason, the methods
which, applied in China, undermined the revolution, must result in India
in even more fatal consequences. The overthrow of Hindu feudalism and of
the Anglo-Hindu bureaucracy and British militarism can be accomplished
only by a gigantic and an indomitable movement of the popular masses
which precisely because of its powerful sweep and irresistibility, its
international aims and ties, cannot tolerate any halfway and
compromising opportunist measures on the part of the leadership.

The Comintern leadership has already committed not a few mistakes in
India. The conditions have not yet allowed these errors to reveal
themselves on such a scale as in China. One can, therefore, hope that
the lessons of the Chinese events will permit of a more timely
rectification of the line of the leading policy in India and in other
countries of the Orient.

The cardinal question for us here, as everywhere and always, is the
question of the communist party, its complete independence, its
irreconcilable class character. The greatest danger on this path is the
organization of so-called “workers’ and peasants’ parties” in the
countries of the Orient.

Beginning with 1924, a year which will go down as the year of open
revision of a number of fundamental theses of Marx and Lenin, Stalin
advanced the formula of the “two-class workers’ and peasants’ parties
for the Eastern countries.” It was based on the self-same national
oppression which served in the Orient to camouflage opportunism, as did
“stabilization” in the Occident. Cables from India, as well as from
Japan, where there is no national oppression, have of late frequently
mentioned the activities of provincial “workers’ and peasants’ parties,”
referring to them as organizations which are close and friendly to the
Comintern, as if they were almost our “own” organizations, without,
however, giving any sort of concrete definition of their political
physiognomy; in a word, writing and speaking about them in the same way
as was done only a short while ago about the Kuomintang.

Back in 1924, PRAVDA reported that: “There are indications that the
movement of national liberation in Korea is gradually taking shape in
the form of the creation of a workers’ and peasants’ party.” [10]

And in the meantime Stalin lectured to the communists of the Orient that

“The communists must pass from the policy of a united national front …
to the policy of a revolutionary bloc between the workers and
petty-bourgeoisie, In such countries this bloc can assume the form of a
single party, a workers’ and peasants’ party, akin to the Kuomintang …”
[11]

The ensuing tiny “reservations” on the subject of the independence of
the communist parties (obviously, “independence” like that of the
prophet Jonah inside the whale’s belly) served only for the purpose of
camouflage. We are profoundly convinced that the Sixth Congress must
state that the slightest equivocation in this sphere is fatal and will
be rejected.

It is a question here of an absolutely new, entirely false, and
thoroughly anti-Marxian formulation of the fundamental question of the
party and of its relation to its own class and other classes.

The necessity for the Communist Party of China to enter the Kuomintang
was defended on the ground that in its social composition the Kuomintang
is a party of workers and peasants, that nine-tenths of the Kuomintang –
this proportion was repeated hundreds of times – belonged to the
revolutionary tendency and were ready to march hand in hand with the
communist party. However, during and since the _coups d’ etat_ in
Shanghai and Wuhan, these revolutionary nine-tenths of the Kuomintang
disappeared as if by magic. No one has found a trace of them. And the
theoreticians of class collaboration in China, Stalin, Bukharin, and
others, did not even take the trouble to explain what has become of the
nine-tenths of the members of the Kuomintang’the nine-tenths workers and
peasants, revolutionists, sympathizers, and entirely our “own.” Yet, an
answer to this question is of decisive importance if we are to
understand the destiny of all these “two-class” parties preached by
Stalin; and if we are to be clarified upon the very conception itself,
which throws us far behind not only of the program of the CPSU of 1919,
but also of the COMMUNIST MANIFESTO of 1847.

The question of where the celebrated nine-tenths vanished can become
clear to us only if we understand, first, the impossibility of a
bi-composite, that is a two-class party, expressing simultaneously two
mutually exclusive historical lines – the proletarian and petty
bourgeois lines; secondly, the impossibility of realizing in capitalist
society an independent peasant party, that is, a party expressing the
interests of the peasantry, which is at the same time independent of the
proletariat and the bourgeoisie.

Marxism has always taught, and Bolshevism, too, accepted, and taught,
that the peasantry and proletariat are two different classes, that it is
false to identify their interests in capitalist society in any way, and
that a peasant can join the communist party only if, from the property
viewpoint, he adopts the views of the proletariat. The alliance of the
workers and peasants under the dictatorship of the proletariat does not
invalidate this thesis, but confirms it, in a different way, under
different circumstances. If there were no _different_ classes with
_different_ interests, there would be no talk even of an _alliance_.
Such an alliance is compatible with the socialist revolution only to the
extent that it enters into the iron framework of the dictatorship of the
proletariat. In our country the dictatorship is incompatible with the
existence of a so-called Peasants’ League precisely because every
“independent” peasant organization aspiring to solve all national
political problems would inevitably turn out to be an instrument in the
hands of the bourgeoisie.

Those organizations which in capitalist countries label themselves
peasant parties are in reality one of the varieties of bourgeois
parties. Every peasant who has not adopted the proletarian position,
abandoning his proprietor psychology, will inevitably follow the
bourgeoisie when it comes to fundamental political issues. Of course,
every bourgeois party that relies or seeks to rely on the peasantry and,
if possible, on the workers, is compelled to camouflage itself, that is,
to assume two or three appropriate colorations. The celebrated idea of
“workers’ and peasants’ parties” seems to have been specially created to
camouflage bourgeois parties which are compelled to seek support from
the peasantry but who are also ready to absorb workers into their ranks.
The Kuomintang has entered the annals of history for all time as a
classic type of such a party.

Bourgeois society, as is known, is so constructed that the propertyless,
discontented, and deceived masses are at the bottom and the contented
fakers remain on top. Every bourgeois party, if it is a real party, that
is, if it embraces considerable masses, is built on the self-same
principle. The exploiters, fakers, and despots compose the minority in
class society. Every capitalist party is therefore compelled in its
internal relations, in one way or another, to reproduce and reflect the
relations in bourgeois society as a whole. In every mass bourgeois party
the lower ranks are therefore more democratic and further to the “Left”
than the tops. This holds true of the German Center, the French
Radicals, and particularly the social democracy. That is why the
constant complaints voiced by Stalin, Bukharin, and others that the tops
do not reflect the sentiments of the “Left” Kuomintang rank and file,
the “overwhelming majority,” the “nine-tenths,” etc., etc., are so
naive, so unpardonable. That which they represented in their bizarre
complaints to be a temporary, disagreeable misunderstanding which was to
be eliminated by means of organizational measures, instructions, and
circular letters, is in reality a cardinal and basic feature of a
bourgeois party, particularly in a revolutionary epoch.

It is from this angle that the basic arguments of the authors of the
draft program in defense of all kinds of opportunist blocs in general –
both in England and China’must be judged. According to them,
fraternization with the tops is done exclusively in the interests of the
rank and file. The Opposition, as is known, insisted on the withdrawal
of the party from the Kuomintang:

“The question arises,” says Bukharin, “why? Is it because the leaders of
the Kuomintang are vacillating? And what about the Kuomintang masses,
are they mere ‘cattle’? Since when is the attitude to a mass
organization determined by what takes place at the ‘high’ summit!” [12]

The very possibility of such an argument seems impossible in a
Revolutionary party. Bukharin asks, “And what about the Kuomintang
masses, are they mere cattle?” Of course they are cattle. The masses of
any bourgeois party are always cattle, although in different degrees.
But for us, the masses are not cattle, are they? No, that is precisely
why we are forbidden to drive them into the arms of the bourgeoisie,
_camouflaging the latter under the label of a workers’ and peasants’
party_. That is precisely why we are forbidden to subordinate the
proletarian party to a bourgeois party, but on the contrary, must at
every step, oppose the former to the latter. The “high” summit of the
Kuomintang of whom Bukharin speaks so ironically, as of something
secondary, accidental, and temporary is in reality the soul of the
Kuomintang, its social essence. Of course, the bourgeoisie constitutes
only the “summit” in the party as well as in society. But this summit is
powerful in its capital, knowledge, and connections: it can always fall
back on the imperialists for support, and what is most important, it can
always resort to the actual political and military power which is
intimately fused with the leadership in the Kuomintang itself. It is
precisely this summit that wrote laws against strikes, throttled the
uprisings of the peasants, shoved the communists into a dark corner,
and, at best, allowed them to be only one-third of the party, exacted an
oath from them that petty-bourgeois Sun Yat-senism takes precedence over
Marxism. The rank and file were picked and harnessed by this summit,
serving it, like Moscow, as a “Left” support, just as the generals,
compradores, and imperialists served it as a Right support. To consider
the Kuomintang not as a _bourgeois party, but as a neutral arena of
struggle for the masses_, to play with words about nine-tenths of the
Left rank and file in order to mask the question as to who is the real
master, meant to add to the strength and power of the summit, to assist
the latter to convert ever broader masses into “cattle,” and, under
conditions most favorable to it to prepare the Shanghai _coup d’etat_.
Basing themselves on the reactionary idea of the two-class party, Stalin
and Bukharin imagined that the communists, together with the “Lefts,”
would secure a majority in the Kuomintang and thereby power in the
country, for, in China, power is in the hands of the Kuomintang. In
other words, they imagined that _by means of ordinary elections at
Kuomintang Congresses power would pass from the hands of the bourgeoisie
to the proletariat_. Can one conceive of a more touching and idealistic
idolization of “party democracy” … in a bourgeois part? For indeed, the
army, the bureaucracy, the press, the capital are all in the hands of
the bourgeoisie. Precisely because of this and this alone it stands at
the helm of the ruling party. The bourgeois “summit” tolerates or
tolerated “nine-tenths” of the Lefts (and Lefts of _this sort_), only in
so far as they did not venture against the army, the bureaucracy, the
press, and against capital. By these powerful means the bourgeois summit
kept in subjection not only the so-called nine-tenths of the “Left”
party members, but also the masses as a whole. In this the theory of the
bloc of classes, the theory that the Kuomintang is a workers’ and
peasants’ party, provides the best possible assistance for the
bourgeoisie. When the bourgeoisie later comes into hostile conflict with
the masses and shoots them down, in this clash between the two real
forces, the bourgeoisie and the proletariat, not even the bleating of
the celebrated nine-tenths is heard. The pitiful democratic fiction
evaporates without a trace in face of the bloody reality of the class
struggle.

Such is the genuine and only possible political mechanism of the
“two-class workers’ and peasants’ parties for the Orient.” There is no
other and there will be none.

***

Although the idea of the two-class parties is motivated on national
oppression, which allegedly abrogates Marx’s class doctrine, we have
already heard about “workers’ and peasants’ ” mongrels in Japan, where
there is no national oppression at all. But that isn’t all, the matter
is not limited merely to the Orient. The “two-class” idea seeks to
attain universality. In this domain, the most grotesque features were
assumed by the above-mentioned Communist Party of America in its effort
to support the presidential candidacy of the bourgeois, “anti-trust”
Senator LaFollette, so as to yoke the American farmers by this means to
the chariot of the social revolution. Pepper, the theoretician of this
maneuver, one of those who ruined the Hungarian revolution because he
overlooked the Hungarian peasantry, made a great effort (by way of
compensation, no doubt) to ruin the Communist Party of America by
dissolving it among the farmers. Pepper’s theory was that the
super-profit of American capitalism converts the American proletariat
into a world labor aristocracy, while the agrarian crisis ruins the
farmers and drives them onto the path of social revolution. According to
Pepper’s conception, a party of a few thousand members, consisting
chiefly of immigrants, had to fuse with the farmers through the medium
of a bourgeois party and by thus founding a “two-class” party, insure
the socialist revolution in the face of the passivity or neutrality of
the proletariat corrupted by super-profits. This insane idea found
supporters and half-supporters among the upper leadership of the
Comintern. For several weeks the issue swayed in the balance until
finally a concession was made to the ABC of Marxism (the comment behind
the scenes was: Trotskyist prejudices). It was necessary to lasso the
American Communist Party in order to tear it away from the LaFollette
party which died even before its founder.

Everything invented by modern revisionism for the Orient is carried over
later to the West. If Pepper on one side of the Atlantic Ocean tried to
spur history by means of a two-class party then the latest dispatches in
the press inform us that the Kuomintang experience finds its imitators
in Italy where, apparently, an attempt is being made to foist on our
party the monstrous slogan of a “republican assembly on the basis [?!]
of workers’ and peasants’ committees.” In this slogan the spirit of
Chiang Kai-shek embraces the spirit of Hilferding. Will we really come
to that?

***

In conclusion there remains for us only to recall that the idea of a
workers’ and peasants’ party sweeps from the history of Bolshevism the
entire struggle against the Populists (Narodniks), without which there
would have been no Bolshevik party. What was the significance of this
historical struggle? In 1909, Lenin wrote the following about the
Social-Revolutionists:

“The fundamental idea of their program was not at all that ’an alliance
of the forces’ of the proletariat and the peasantry is necessary, but
that there is no _class abyss_ between the former and the latter and
that there is no need to draw a line of class demarcation beween them,
and that the social democratic idea of the petty bourgeois nature of the
peasantry that distinguishes it from the proletariat is fundamentally
false.” [13]

In other words, the two-class workers’ and peasants’ party is the
central idea of the Russian Narodniks. Only in the struggle against this
idea could the party of the proletarian vanguard in peasant Russia
develop.

Lenin persistently and untiringly repeated in the epoch of the 1905
revolution that

“Our attitude towards the peasantry must be distrustful, we must
_organize separately from it_, be ready for a struggle against it, to
the extent that the peasantry comes forward as a reactionary or
anti-proletarian force.” [14]

In 1906 Lenin wrote:

“Our last advice: proletarians and semi-proletarians of city and
country, organize yourselves separately! Place no trust in any small
proprietors, even the petty ones, even those who ‘toil’ … We support the
peasant movement to the end, but we must remember that it is a movement
of another class, _not the one_ that can or will accomplish the
socialist revolution.” [15]

This idea reappears in hundreds of Lenin’s major and minor works. In
1908, he explained:

“The alliance between the proletariat and the peasantry must in no case
be interpreted to mean a _fusion of the different classes or parties_ of
the proletariat and the peasantry. Not only fusion, but even _any sort
of lasting concord_ would be fatal for the socialist party of the
working class and _weaken_ the revolutionary democratic struggle.” [16]

Could one condemn the very idea of a workers’ and peasants’ party more
harshly, more ruthlessly, and more devastatingly?

Stalin, on the other hand, teaches that

“The revolutionary anti-imperialist bloc … must, though not always [!]
necessarily [!], assume the form of a single workers’ and peasants’
party, bound formally [?] by a single platform.” [17]

Lenin taught us that an alliance between workers and peasants must in no
case and never lead to merger of the parties. But Stalin makes only one
concession to Lenin: although, according to Stalin, the bloc of classes
must assume “the form of a single party,” a workers’ and peasants’ party
like the Kuomintang – _is not always obligatory_. We should thank him
for at least this concession.

Lenin put this question in the same irreconcilable spirit during the
epoch of the October Revolution. In generalizing the experience of the
three Russian revolutions, Lenin, beginning with 1918, did not miss a
single opportunity to repeat that there are two decisive forces in a
society where capitalist relations predominate’the bourgeoisie and the
proletariat.

“If the peasant does not follow the workers, he marches behind the
bourgeoisie. There is and there can be no middle course.” [18]

Yet a “workers” and peasants’ party” is precisely an attempt to create a
middle course.

Had the vanguard of the Russian proletariat failed to oppose itself to
the peasantry, had it failed to wage a ruthless struggle against the
all-devouring petty-bourgeois amorphousness of the latter, it would
inevitably have dissolved itself among the petty-bourgeois elements
through the medium of the Social Revolutionary Party or some other
“two-class party” which, in turn, would inevitably have subjected the
vanguard to bourgeois leadership. In order to arrive at a revolutionary
alliance with the peasantry – this does not come gratuitously – it is
first of all necessary to separate the proletarian vanguard, and thereby
the working class as a whole, from the petty bourgeois masses. This can
be achieved only by training the proletarian party in the spirit of
unshakable class irreconcilability.

The younger the proletariat, the fresher and more direct its
“blood-ties” with the peasantry, the greater the proportion of the
peasantry to the population as a whole, the greater becomes the
importance of the struggle against any form of “two-class” political
alchemy. In the West the idea of a workers’ and peasants’ party is
simply ridiculous. In the East it is fatal. In China, India, and Japan
this idea is mortally hostile not only to the hegemony of the
proletariat in the revolution but also to the most elementary
independence of the proletarian vanguard. The workers’ and peasants’
party can only serve as a base, a screen, and a springboard for the
bourgeoisie.

It is fatal that in this question, fundamental for the entire East,
modern revisionism only repeats the errors of old social democratic
opportunism of pre-revolutionary days. Most of the leaders of European
social democracy considered the struggle of our party against SRs to be
mistaken and insistently advocated the fusion of the two parties,
holding that for the Russian “East” a two-class workers’ and peasants’
party was exactly in order. Had we heeded their counsel, we should never
have achieved either the alliance of the workers and the peasants or the
dictatorship of the proletariat. The “two-class” workers’ and peasants’
party of the SRs became, and could not help becoming in our country, the
agency of the imperialist bourgeoisie, i.e., it tried unsuccessfully to
fulfill the same historic role which was successfully played in China by
the Kuomintang in a different and “peculiar” Chinese way, thanks to the
revisionists of Bolshevism. Without a relentless condemnation of the
very idea of workers’ and peasants’ parties for the East, there is not
and there cannot be a program of the Comintern.

 

8. The Advantages Secured from the Peasants’ International Must be Probed

One of the principal, if not _the_ principal, accusations hurled against
the Opposition, was its “underestimation” of the peasantry. On this
point, too, life has made its tests and rendered its verdict along
national and international lines. In every case the official leaders
proved guilty of _underestimating the rob and significance of the
proletariat in relation to the peasantry_. In this the greatest shifts
and errors took place, in the economic and political fields and
internationally. At the root of the internal errors since 1923 lies an
underestimation of the significance, for the whole of national economy
and for the alliance with the peasantry, of state industry under the
management of the proletariat. In China, the revolution was doomed by
the inability to understand the leading and decisive role of the
proletariat;n the agrarian revolution.

From the same standpoint, it is necessary to examine and evaluate the
entire work of the Krestintern, which from the beginning was merely an
experiment – an experiment, moreover, which called for the utmost care
and rigid adherence to principles. It is not difficult to understand the
reason for this.

The peasantry, by virtue of its entire history and the conditions of its
existence, is the least international of all classes. What are commonly
called national traits have their chief source precisely in the
peasantry. From among the peasantry, it is only the semi-proletarian
masses of the peasant poor who can be guided along the road of
internationalism, and only the proletariat can guide them. Any attempt
at a short-cut is merely playing with the classes, which always means
playing to the detriment of the proletariat. The peasantry can be
attracted to internationalist politics only if it is torn away from the
influence of the bourgeoisie by the proletariat and if it recognizes in
the proletariat not only its ally, but its leader. Conversely, attempts
to organize the peasants of the various countries into an independent
international organization, over the head of the proletariat and without
regard to the national communist parties, are doomed in advance to
failure. In the final analysis such attempts can only harm the struggle
of the proletariat in each country for hegemony over the agricultural
laborers and poor peasants.

In all bourgeois revolutions as well as counter-revolutions, beginning
with the peasant wars of the sixteenth century and even before that
time, the various strata of the peasantry played an enormous and at
times even decisive role. But it never played an _independent_ role.
Directly or indirectly, the peasantry always supported one political
force against another. By itself it never constituted an independent
force capable of solving national political tasks. In the epoch of
finance capital the process of the polarization of capitalist society
has enormously accelerated in comparison to earlier phases of capitalist
development. This means that the specific gravity of the peasantry has
diminished and not increased. In any case, the peasant is less capable
in the imperialist epoch of _independent_ political action on a
national, let alone international scale, than he was in the epoch of
industrial capitalism. The farmers of the United States today are
incomparably less able to play an independent political role than they
were forty or fifty years ago when, as the experience of the Populist
movement shows, they could not and did not organize an independent
national political party.

The temporary but sharp filip to agriculture in Europe resulting from
the economic decline caused by the war gave rise to illusions concerning
the possible role of the “peasant,” i.e., of bourgeois pseudo-peasant
parties demagogically counterposing themselves to the bourgeois parties.
If in the period of stormy peasant unrest during the postwar years one
could still risk the experiment of organizing a Peasants’ International,
in order to test the new relations between the proletariat and the
peasantry and between the peasantry and the bourgeoisie, then it is high
time now to draw the theoretical and political balance of the five
years’ experience with the Peasants’ International, to lay bare its
vicious shortcomings and make an effort to indicate its positive
aspects.

One conclusion, at any rate, is indisputable. The experience of the
“peasant” parties of Bulgaria, Poland, Rumania, and Yugoslavia (i.e., of
all the backward countries); the old experience of our Social
Revolutionists, and the fresh experience (the blood is still warm) of
the Kuomintang; the episodic experiments in advanced capitalist
countries, particularly the LaFollette-Pepper experiment in the United
States’have all shown beyond question that in the epoch of capitalist
decline there is even less reason than in the epoch of rising capitalism
to look for _independent_, revolutionary, anti-bourgeois peasant
parties.

“The city cannot be equated to the village, the village cannot be
equated to the city in the historical conditions of the present epoch.
The city inevitably _leads the village_, the village inevitably _follows
the city_. The only question is _which_ of the urban classes will lead
the village.” [19]

In the revolutions of the East the peasantry will still play a decisive
role, but once again, this role will be neither leading nor independent.
The poor peasants of Hupeh, Kwangtung, or Bengal can play a role not
only on a national but on an international scale, but only if they
support the workers of Shanghai, Canton, Hankow, and Calcutta. This is
the only way out for the revolutionary peasant on an _international_
road. It is hopeless to attempt to forge a direct link between the
peasant of Hupeh and the peasant of Galicia or Dobrudja, the Egyptian
fellah and the American farmer.

It is in the nature of politics that anything which does not serve a
direct aim inevitably becomes the instrument of other aims, frequently
the opposite of the one sought. Have we not had examples of a bourgeois
party, relying on the peasantry or seeking to rely upon it, deeming it
necessary to seek insurance for itself in the Peasants’ International,
for a longer or shorter period, if it could not do so in the Comintern,
in order to secure protection from the blows of the communist party in
its own country? Like Purcell, in the trade union field, protected
himself through the Anglo-Russian Committee? If La Follette did not try
to register in the Peasants’ International, that was only because the
American Communist Party was so extremely weak. He did not have to.
Pepper, uninvited and unsolicited, embraced LaFollette without that. But
Radic, the banker-leader of the Croatian rich peasants, found it
necessary to leave his visiting card with the Peasants’ International on
his way to the cabinet. The Kuomintang went infinitely further and
secured a place for itself not only in the Peasants’ International and
the League Against Imperialism, but even knocked at the doors of the
Comintern and was welcomed there with the blessing of the Politbureau of
the CPSU, marred by only one dissenting vote.

It is highly characteristic of the leading political currents of recent
years that at a time when tendencies in favor of liquidating the
Profintern [Red International of Labor Unions] were very strong (its
very name was deleted from the statutes of the Soviet trade unions),
nowhere, so far as we recall, has the question ever been raised in the
official press as to the precise conquests of the Krestintern, the
Peasants’ International.

The Sixth Congress must seriously review the work of the Peasants’
“International” from the standpoint of proletarian internationalism. It
is high time to draw a Marxian balance to this long drawn-out
experiment. In one form or another the balance must be included in the
program of the Comintern. The present draft does not breathe a single
syllable either about the “millions” in the Peasants’ International, or
for that matter, about its very existence.

 

Conclusion

We have presented a criticism of certain fundamental theses in the draft
program; extreme pressure of time prevented us from dealing with all of
them. There were only two weeks at our disposal for this work. We were
therefore compelled to limit ourselves to the most pressing questions,
those most closely bound up with the revolutionary and internal party
struggles during the recent period.

Thanks to our previous experience with so-called “discussions,” we are
aware beforehand that phrases torn out of their context and slips of the
pen can be turned into a seething source of new theories annihilating
“Trotskyism.” An entire period has been filled with triumphant crowing
of this type. But we view with utmost calm the prospect of the cheap
theoretical scorpions that this time, too, may descend upon us.

Incidentally, it is quite likely that the authors of the draft program,
instead of putting into circulation new critical and expository
articles, will prefer to resort to further elaboration of the old
Article 58. Needless to say, this kind of argument is even less valid
for us.

The Sixth World Congress is faced with the task of adopting a program.
We have sought to prove throughout this entire work that there is not
the slightest possibility of taking the draft elaborated by Bukharin and
Stalin as the basis of the program.

The present moment is the turning point in the life of the CPSU and the
entire Comintern. This is evidenced by all the recent decisions and
measures of the CEC of our party and the February plenum of the ECCI
These measures are entirely inadequate, the resolutions are
contradictory, and certain among them, like the February resolution of
the ECCI on the Chinese revolution, are false to the core. Nevertheless
throughout all these resolutions there is a tendency to take a turn to
the Left. We have no ground whatever for overestimating it, all the more
so since it proceeds hand in hand with a campaign of extermination
against the revolutionary wing, while the Right wing is being protected.
Notwithstanding all this, we do not for a moment entertain the notion of
ignoring this Leftward tendency, forced by the _impasse_ created by the
old course. Every genuine revolutionist at his post will do everything
in his power to facilitate the development of these symptoms of a Left
zigzag into a revolutionary Leninist course, with the least difficulties
and convulsions in the party. But we are still far removed from this
today. At present the Comintern is perhaps passing through its most
acute period of development, a period in which the old course is far
from having been liquidated, while the new course brings in eruptions of
alien elements. The draft program reflects in whole and in part this
transitional condition. Yet, such periods, by their very nature, are
least favorable for the elaboration of documents that must determine the
activity of our international party for a number of years ahead.
Difficult as it may be, we must bide our time – after so much time has
been lost already. We must permit the muddled waters to settle. The
confusion must pass, the contradictions must be eliminated, and the new
course take definite shape.

The Congress has not convened for four years. For nine years the
Comintern has existed without a definitive program. The only way out at
the present moment is this: that the Seventh World Congress be convened
a year from today, putting an end once and for all to the attempts at
usurping the supreme powers of the Comintern as a whole, a normal regime
be re-established, such a regime as would allow of a genuine discussion
of the draft program and permit us to oppose to the eclectic draft,
another, a Marxist-Leninist draft. There must be no forbidden questions
for the Comintern, for the meetings and conferences of its sections, and
for its press. During this year the entire soil must be deeply plowed by
the plow of Marxism. Only as a result of such labor can the
international party of the proletariat secure a, program, a beacon which
will illuminate with its penetrating rays, and throw reliable beams far
into the future.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

8. WORKS, Vol.XVIII, Part 21, pp.118f.

9. Lenin, WORKS,”The Year 1919,” Vol.XVI, p.458.

10. PRAVDA, March 2, 1929.

11. Stalin, PROBLEMS OF LENINISM, p.269.

12. _The Present Situation in the Chinese Revolution_.

13. WORKS, Vol.XI, Part 1, p.198.

14. WORKS, Vol.VI, p.113.

15. WORKS, Vol.IX, p.410.

16. WORKS, Vol.XI, Part 1, p.79.

17. PROBLEMS OF LENINISM, p.265.

18. WORKS, Vol.XVI, _The Year 1919_, p.219.

19. Lenin, WORKS, Vol.XVI, _The Year 1919_, p.442.

The Third International After Lenin



WHAT NOW? (PART 1)


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

1. The Aim of This Letter

The purpose of this letter is to achieve clarity without suppressing or
exaggerating anything. Clarity is the indispensable condition for
revolutionary policy.

This attempt to arrive at an understanding can have meaning only if it
is free from all traces of reticence, duplicity, and diplomacy. This
requires that all things be called by their names, including those which
are most unpleasant and grievous for the party. It has been the custom
in such cases to raise a hue and cry that the enemy will seize upon the
criticism and use it. At the present moment, it would be maladroit to
pose the question of whether the class enemy can glean the greatest
profit from the policy of the leadership that has led the Chinese
revolution to its cruel lest defeats, or from the stifled warnings of
the Opposition that have disturbed the false prestige of infallibility.

The same thing might be said on the question of the Anglo-Russian
Committee, the grain collections, the kulak in general, and the line
followed by the leadership of any communist party. No, it is not the
criticism of the Opposition that has retarded the growth of the
Comintern during the last five years. The social democracy has no doubt
attempted in a number of instances to glean a little profit from the
criticisms of the Opposition. It still has enough sense and cunning for
that. It would have been strange had it failed to do so. The social
democracy at present is a parasitic party, in the broad historical sense
of the term. Fulfilling the work of guaranteeing bourgeois society from
below, that is to say, protecting it on the essential side, the social
democracy during the post-war years, particularly after the year 1923,
when it was obviously being reduced to a cipher, has thrived upon the
mistakes and oversights of the communist parties, their capitulations at
the decisive moments, or, on the other hand, their adventuristic
attempts to resuscitate a revolutionary situation which has already
passed. The capitulation of the Comintern in the Autumn of 1923, the
subsequent stubborn failure of the leadership to understand the import
of this colossal defeat, the adventuristic ultra-left line of 1924 to
1925, the gross opportunist policy of 1926 to 1927 – these are what
caused the regeneration of the social democracy and enabled it to poll
more than nine million votes in the last German elections. To argue,
under these conditions, that the social democracy now and then pulls out
of its context some critical remark or other of the Opposition, and
after slobbering over it offers it to the workers, is really to waste
time with bagatelles. The social democracy would not be what it is if it
did not go even further, if in the guise of its Left wing – which is as
necessary a safety valve in a social democratic party as the party
itself is in bourgeois society – it did not express from time to time
spurious “sympathies” for the Opposition, in so far as the latter
remains a small and suppressed minority and inasmuch as such
“sympathies” cost the social democrats nothing and at the same time
arouse the responsive sympathies of the workers.

The present social democracy has not and cannot have a line of its own
on the fundamental questions. In this domain, its line is dictated by
the bourgeoisie. But if the social democracy simply repeated everything
said by the bourgeois parties, it would cease to be useful to the
bourgeoisie. Upon secondary, intangible, or remote questions, the social
democracy not only may but must play with all the colors of the rainbow,
including bright red. Moreover, by seizing upon this or that judgment of
the Opposition, the social democracy hopes to provoke a split in the
communist party. In the eyes of anyone who understands the workings of
such a mechanism, the attempts to discredit the Opposition by referring
to the fact that some Right wing grafter or Left wing stripling of the
social democracy quotes approvingly a sentence from our criticism, must
appear in a pitiable ideological light. Basically, however, in all
questions of politics that are in the least serious, above all in the
questions of China and of the Anglo-Russian Committee, the sympathies of
the international social democracy have been on the side of the
“realistic” policy of the leadership, and in no wise on ours.

But much more important is the general judgment which the bourgeoisie
itself passes on the tendencies struggling within the framework of the
Soviet Union and of the Comintern. The bourgeoisie has no reason to
dodge or dissemble on this question, and here it must be said that all –
even the least – serious, important, and authoritative organs of world
imperialism, on both sides of the ocean, consider the Opposition their
mortal enemy. Throughout the entire recent period, they have either
directly expressed their qualified and prudent sympathy for a number of
measures taken by the official leadership, or they have expressed
themselves to the effect that the total liquidation of the Opposition,
its complete physical annihilation (Austen Chamberlain even demanded the
firing squad), is the necessary premise for the “normal evolution” of
the Soviet power towards a bourgeois regime. Even from memory, without
having any sources for reference at our disposal, we can point to
numerous declarations of this type: the INFORMATION BULLETIN of French
heavy industry (Jan. 1927), the pronouncements of the London and New
York TIMES, the declaration of Austen Chamberlain, which was reprinted
by many publications, including the American weekly, THE NATION, etc.
The fact alone has been sufficient to compel our official party press,
after its initial and not entirely successful attempts, to stop entirely
reprinting the judgments passed by our class enemies upon the crisis
which our party has undergone during the last months and is still
undergoing. These declarations have emphasized much too sharply the
revolutionary class nature of the Opposition.

We believe, therefore, that a great deal would be gained for the cause
of clarity, if by the time the Sixth Congress convened two
conscientiously collated books were published: a WHITE BOOK containing
the judgments of the serious capitalist press with regard to the
controversies in the Comintern, and a YELLOW BOOK with parallel
judgments of the social democracy.

In any case, the fake bogey of the possible attempts on the part of the
social democrats to involve themselves in our disputes will not keep us
for a moment from pointing out clearly and precisely what we consider to
be fatal for the policy of the Comintern, and what, in our opinion, is
salutary. We will be able to crush it, not by resorting to diplomacy,
not by playing hide-and-seek, but by means of that correct revolutionary
policy which is still to be elaborated.

***

At this time, with the publication of the draft program, all the
fundamental theoretical and practical problems of the international
proletarian revolution must naturally be examined in the light of the
new draft. In fact, the task of the latter consists in furnishing, along
with a theoretic method of handling the problems to be considered, a
generalized verification and appraisal of all the experience already
acquired by the Comintern. It is only by viewing the problem in this way
that me can succeed in checking up and in arriving at a healthy judgment
of the draft itself, in establishing the extent of its accuracy with
regard to principles and the degree of its completeness and viability.
We have formulated this criticism, in so far as it could be done in the
very limited amount of time at our disposal, in a special document
devoted to the draft program. The fundamental problems which it seemed
to us most essential to illumine in our criticism, we grouped into the
three following chapters:

-   The Program of the International Revolution or the Program of
    Socialism in One Country?
-   The Strategy and Tactics of the Imperialist Epoch.
-   Balance and Perspectives of the Chinese Revolution, Its Lessons for
    the Countries of the East and for the Communist International as a
    Whole.

We have endeavored to analyze these problems by examining the living
experience of the international workers’ movement and more particularly
that of the Comintern during the last five years. From it we drew the
conclusion that the new draft is completely inconsistent, shot through
with eclecticism in its principled theses, lacking in system,
incomplete, and patchy in its exposition. The section dealing with
strategy is primarily characterized by its tendency to avoid the
profound and tragic questions of revolutionary experience in the last
few years.

We shall not here return to the questions examined in the document
already sent to the Congress. The aim of the present letter is
altogether different, as can readily be seen from what has been said
above. It has to do, let us say, with conjuncture and policy: in the
general perspective, we must find what is the exact place occupied by
the Leftward turn now officially effected, in order to make it a point
of departure for the _rapprochement_ of tendencies existing in the
Communist Party of the USSR and in the Comintern, which up to yesterday
were drawing further and further apart. Obviously, there can be no
question of a _rapprochement_ save on the basis of perfect clarity in
ideas and not at all on that of flattery or of bureaucratic Byzantinism.

This turn has manifested itself most crassly by far in the internal
problems of the USSR, whence came the impulsion which produced it. We
therefore intend to devote this letter mainly to problems of the crisis
in the CPSU, which is a result of the crisis in the Soviet revolution.
But since, while examining the cardinal questions of the evolution of
the workers’ state we cannot in any way “abstract ourselves from the
international factor,” which is of decisive importance in all our
internal developments and problems, we are compelled, in this letter
also, to characterize briefly the conditions and methods of work of the
Comintern, by repeating certain of our theses devoted to the draft
program.

As a conclusion to these introductory observations, I wish to express my
firm conviction that the criticism of the draft program, as well as the
present letter to the congress, will be brought to the attention of all
the members of the congress. I have an indefeasible right to that, if
only because the Fifth Congress elected me an alternate on the Executive
Committee. This letter, considered formally, is a statement of the
reasons for my appeal against the unjust decisions that have deprived me
of the rights and duties with which I was charged at the supreme order
of the Comintern.

 

2. Why Has No Congress of the Comintern Been Convoked for More Than Four Years?

More than four years have elapsed since the Fifth World Congress. During
this period, the line of the leadership has been radically altered,
together with the composition of the leadership of different sections,
as well as of the Comintern as a whole. The chairman elected by the
Fifth Congress has been not only deposed but even expelled from the
party, and readmitted only on the eve of the Sixth Congress. All this
was effected without the participation of a congress, although there
were no objective obstacles to prevent its being convoked. In the most
vital questions of the world working class movement and of the Soviet
republic, the Congress of the Comintern proved to be superfluous; it was
adjourned from year to veer as an obstacle and a dead weight. It was
convoked only at a time when the conclusion was reached that the
congress would be confronted with entirely accomplished facts.

According to the letter and spirit of democratic centralism, the
congress should occupy a decisive place in the life of the party. This
life has always found its supreme expression in the congresses, their
preparation, and their work. At the present time, the congresses have
become a dead weight and an onerous formality. The Fifteenth Congress of
the CPSU was arbitrarily postponed for more than a year. The Congress of
the Comintern has convened after a lapse of four years. And what years!
In the course of these four years, filled with the greatest historical
events and most profound differences in views, plenty of time was found
for countless bureaucratic congresses and conferences, for the utterly
rotten conferences of the Anglo-Russian Committee, for the congresses of
the decorative League of Struggle Against Imperialism, for the jubilee
theatrical congress of the Friends of the Soviet Union’the only time and
place that could not be found was for the three regular congresses of
the Communist International.

During the civil war and the blockade, when the foreign delegates had to
overcome unprecedented difficulties, and when some of them lost their
lives _en route_, the congresses of the CPSU and of the Comintern
convened regularly in conformance with the statutes and the spirit of
the proletarian party. Why is this not being done now? To pretend that
we are now too busy with “practical” work is simply to recognize that
the mind and the will of the party hinder the work of the leadership and
that the congresses are a fetter in the most serious and important
affairs. This is the road of the bureaucratic liquidation of the party.

Formally, during these last four years and more, all questions have been
decided by the ECCI or by the Presidium; as a matter of fact, however,
they were decided by the Political Bureau of the Communist Party of the
Soviet Union, or rather, to be more precise, by the Secretariat, basing
itself upon the party apparatus that depends upon it. In question here
is not, of course, the ideological influence of the CPSU This influence
was infinitely greater under Lenin than it is today, and it had a mighty
creative importance. No, what is in question here is the almighty
Secretariat of the CEC of the CPSU, functioning purely behind the scenes
– a phenomenon of which there was not even a sign under Lenin and
against which Lenin strictly warned in the last advice he gave to the
party.

The Comintern has been proclaimed the only international party to which
all national sections are completely subordinated. In this question
Lenin played the role of moderator to the end of his days. On more than
one occasion he warned against centralist predilections on the part of
the leadership, fearing that, if the political pre-conditions were
lacking, centralism would degenerate into bureaucratism. The development
of the political and ideological maturity of the communist parties has
its own internal rhythm, based on their own experiences. The existence
of the Comintern and the decisive role played in it by the CPSU can
accelerate this rhythm. But this acceleration can be conceived only
within certain imperative limits. When they are overstepped by attempts
to substitute strictly administrative measures for independent activity,
for self-criticism, for the capacity of self-orientation, directly
opposite results may be attained, and in a whole series of cases such
directly opposite results have been reached. Nevertheless, when Lenin
ceased working, the ultra-centralist manner of handling questions was
the one which triumphed. The Executive Committee was proclaimed as the
central committee with full powers in the united world party,
responsible only to the congresses of the world party. But what do we
see in reality? The congresses were not called precisely when they were
most needed: the Chinese revolution by itself would have justified the
calling of two congresses. Theoretically, the Executive Committee is a
powerful center of the world workers’ movement; in reality, during the
past few years it has been repeatedly revamped in a ruthless fashion.
Certain of its members, elected by the Fifth Congress, who played a
leading role within it, were deposed. The same thing took place in all
the sections of the Comintern, or at least in the most important ones.
Who was it, then, that revamped the Executive Committee, which is
responsible only to the congress, if the latter was not convoked? The
answer is quite clear. The directing nucleus of the CPSU, whose
personnel was changing, selected each time anew the members of the
Executive Committee, in complete disregard of the statutes of the
Comintern and the decisions of the Fifth Congress.

The changes effected in the directing nucleus of the CPSU itself were
likewise always introduced in some unexpected fashion, behind the back
not only of the Comintern, but of the CPSU itself, in the interval
between congresses and independent of the latter, by means of physical
force on the part of the apparatus.

The “art” of leadership consisted of confronting the party with a _fait
accompli_. Then the congress, postponed in conformity with the workings
of the mechanism operating behind the scenes, was selected in a manner
corresponding rigorously with the new composition of the leadership. At
the same time the directing nucleus of the preceding day, elected by the
previous congress, was simply labeled as an “anti-party summit.”

It would take too long to enumerate all the most important stages of
this process. I shall limit myself to citing a single fact, but one
which is worth a dozen. The Fifth Congress, not only from the formal
point of view, but in fact as well, was headed by the Zinoviev group. It
is precisely this group that gave the fundamental tone to this congress,
by its struggle against so-called “Trotskyism.” The needs engendered
behind the scenes and the machinations of this struggle contributed in
great measure to creating the deviation in the entire orientation of the
congress. This became the source of tile greatest errors during the
years that followed. They are discussed in detail elsewhere. Here we
need only single out the fact that the leading faction of the Fifth
Congress was unable to maintain itself until the Sixth Congress in any
party of the Comintern. As for the central group of this faction, it
affirmed, in the person of Zinoviev, Kamenev, Sokolnikov, and others, in
the declaration of July 1926, that “at the present time _there can no
longer be any doubt_ that the principal nucleus of the Opposition of
1923 correctly warned against the dangers of deviating from the
proletarian line and against the menacing growth of the apparatus
regime.”

But that is not all. At the time of the joint Plenum of the Central
Committee and of the Central Control Commission (July 14-23, 1926),
Zinoviev, the director and inspirer of the Fifth Congress, declared –
and this stenographic declaration was published again by the Central
Committee before the Fifteenth Party Congress – that he, Zinoviev,
considered as “the principal errors committed during his life,” the
following two: his mistake of 1917 and his struggle against the
Opposition of 1923.

“I consider,” said Zinoviev, “the second error as being more dangerous,
for the mistake of 1917, committed during Lenin’s life, was rectified by
Lenin … whereas my error of 1923 consisted in the fact that …”

ORDJONIKIDZE: “Then why did you stuff the heads of everyone in the
party? …”

ZINOVIEV: “Yes, in the question of the deviation and in the question of
bureaucratic oppression by the apparatus, Trotsky proved to be correct
as against you.”

But the question of back-sliding, that is to say of the _political
line_, and that of the _party regime_, completely comprise the sum total
of the divergences. Zinoviev, in 1926, concluded that the Opposition of
1923 was right on these questions, and that the greatest error of his
life, greater even than his resistance to the October overturn, was the
struggle he conducted in 1923-1925 against “Trotskyism.” Nevertheless,
in the course of the last few days, the newspapers have published a
decision of the Central Control Commission re-admitting Zinoviev and Co.
into the party, as they had “renounced their Trotskyist follies.” This
whole, absolutely incredible episode, which will seem like the work of
some satirist to our grandchildren and great-grandchildren – although it
is completely attested by documents – would perhaps not warrant mention
in this letter if it concerned only a person or a group, if the affair
were not intimately bound up with the ideological struggle that has been
waged in the Comintern for the past few years, if it had not grown
organically from the same conditions that permitted dispensing with the
congress for four years, that is to say, by virtue of the unrestricted
power of bureaucratic methods.

At the present time, the ideology of the Comintern is not guided but
manufactured to order. Theory, ceasing to be an instrument of knowledge
and foresight, has become an administrative technical tool. Certain
views are attributed to the Opposition and on the basis of these “views”
the Opposition is judged. Certain individuals are associated with
“Trotskyism” and are subsequently recalled as if it were a matter of
functionaries constituting the personnel of a chancellery. The case of
Zinoviev is not at all exceptional. It is simply more outstanding than
the others, for after all no less a person than the ex-chairman of the
Comintern is involved, the director and inspirer of the Fifth Congress.

Ideological upheavals of this type inevitably accompany organizational
upheavals, which always come from above and which have already been
constituted into a system, forming in a way the normal regime not only
of the CPSU but also of other parties in the Comintern. The official
reasons for deposing an undesirable leadership rarely coincide with the
true motives. Duplicity in the domain of ideas is an inevitable
consequence of the complete bureaucratization of the regime. More than
once in the course of these years have the leading elements of the
communist parties in Germany, France, England, America, Poland, etc.,
resorted to monstrous opportunist measures. But they went completely
unpunished, for they were protected by the position they took on the
internal questions of the CPSU To vote, and even more, to howl against
the Opposition, is to insure oneself against any blows from above. As
for the blows which might come from below, a guarantee against them is
furnished by the fact that the apparatus is free from any control.

The latest instances are still very fresh in everybody’s mind. Up to
very recently, the Chinese leadership of Chen Tu-hsiu, of Tang
Ping-shan, and Co., completely Menshevik, enjoyed the full support of
the Executive Committee of the Comintern, as against the criticism of
the Opposition. There is nothing astonishing in that: at the time of the
Seventh Plenum of the ECCI, Tang Ping-shan swore that:

“… At the very first appearance of Trotskyism, the Chinese Communist
Party and the Chinese Communist Youth unanimously adopted a resolution
against Trotskyism.” [1]

An enormous role is played in the ECCI itself and within its apparatus
by elements which resisted and hindered, in so far as they were able,
the proletarian revolution in Russia, Finland, Germany, Bulgaria,
Hungary, Poland, and other countries, but who, in good time, made up for
this by presenting their credentials in the struggle against
“Trotskyism.” Tang Ping-shan is only the disciple of these elements; if
abuse is heaped on him, while his masters are able to evade it, it is
because the irresponsible regime requires an occasional scapegoat.

It is unfortunately impossible not alone to dispute, but even to
endeavor to soften the formal assertion that the most outstanding, the
most general, and at the same time, the most perilous characteristic
trait of the last five years has been the gradual and increasingly
accelerated _growth of bureaucratism_ and of the arbitrariness which is
linked with it, not only in the CPSU but in the Comintern as a whole.

The ignoring of and trampling upon statutes, the continual creation of
upheavals in the organization and in the domain of ideas, the
postponement of congresses, and conferences which are each time
confronted with accomplished facts, the growth of arbitrariness’all this
can not be accidental, all this must have profound causes.

It would be unworthy of Marxism to explain these phenomena solely or
principally on personal grounds, as the struggle of cliques for power,
etc. It goes without saying that all factors of this kind play an
important role (see the _Testament_ of Lenin). But involved here is so
profound and so prolonged a process that its causes must be not only
psychological but political as well, and so indeed they are.

The principal source of the bureaucratization of the whole regime of the
CPSU and the Comintern, lies in the ever increasing gap between the
political line of the leadership and the historical line of the
proletariat. The less these two lines have coincided, the more the line
of the leadership has revealed itself refuted by events, the harder it
has been to apply the line by resorting to party measures, by exposing
it to criticism, and the more it has had to he imposed on the party from
above, by measures of the apparatus and even of the state.

But the growth of the gap between the line of the leadership and the
historical line of the proletariat, that is to say, the Bolshevik line,
can occur only under the pressure of non-proletarian classes. This
pressure, considered generally, has grown to extraordinary proportions
in the course of the last five years, cutting across violent
oscillations in both directions, throughout the world as well as inside
the USSR. The more the apparatus freed itself from the criticism and
control of its own party, so much the more did the leadership become
susceptible and conciliatory to the aspirations and suggestions of
non-proletarian classes, transmitted through the medium of the
apparatus. This operated to shift the political line still further to
the Right and consequently required even harsher bureaucratic measures
in order to impose it on the proletarian vanguard.

The process of political back-sliding was thus inevitably completed by
organizational repressive measures. Under these conditions the
leadership refused absolutely to tolerate Marxian criticism any longer.
The bureaucratic regime is “formalistic”; scholasticism is the ideology
most suitable to it. The last five years constitute in their entirety a
period devoted to the scholastic distortion of Marxism and Leninism, to
their slavish adaptation to the requirements of political back-sliding
and the spirit of bureaucratic usurpation. “Allow the kulak to grow into
socialism,” “enrich yourselves!” the recommendations “not to leap over
stages,” the “bloc of four classes,” the “two-class parties,” “socialism
in one country”’all these ideas and slogans of Centrism sliding to the
Right have inevitably engendered the application of articles of the
Penal Code against the real disciples of Marx and of Lenin.

It goes without saying that the Marxian interpretation of the causes of
scholastic impoverishment, of the progress of bureaucratism and
arbitrariness, does not in the least absolve the leadership from
personal responsibility, but on the contrary makes that responsibility
even greater.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. MINUTES, p.805.

The Third International After Lenin



WHAT NOW? (PART 2)


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

3. The Policy of 1923-1927

Unquestionably, one of the prime motives behind the repeated
postponements of the call for the Sixth Congress was the desire to await
some great international victory. In such cases, men are apt more easily
to forget recent defeats. But no victories were forthcoming, nor is this
accidental.

During this period, European and world capitalism found themselves
granted a new and serious reprieve. The social democracy strengthened
itself considerably after 1923. The communist parties grew
insignificantly’in any case, infinitely less than was presaged in the
prophecies which inspired the Fifth Congress. We must note that this
applies both to the organizations of the Comintern and to their
influence among the masses. Taken together, the latter followed a
declining curve from the Autumn of 1923 and during the whole period
under consideration. It is doubtful if anyone can be found bold enough
to assert that the communist parties were able in these four or five
years to maintain the continuity and stability of their leadership. On
the contrary, these qualities were found to be completely impaired even
in the party where they were formerly most guaranteed: in the Communist
Party of the USSR.

The Soviet republic made serious progress from the standpoint of economy
and culture in the course of the elapsed period, demonstrating to the
world for the first time the power and importance of socialist methods
of management and especially the great possibilities lodged in them. But
these successes developed on the basis of the so-called stabilization of
capitalism, which itself was the result of a whole series of defeats of
the world revolution. Not only did that considerably worsen the external
situation of the Soviet republic, but it exercised a great influence
upon the internal relation of forces in a direction hostile to the
proletariat.

The fact that the USSR continues to exist, according to Lenin’s
expression, as an “isolated frontier in a completely capitalist world,”
has led, by virtue of an erroneous leadership, to forms of development
of the national economy in which capitalist forces and tendencies have
acquired a serious, or, more exactly, an alarming scope. Contrary to
optimistic assertions, the internal relation of forces in economy and
politics has changed to the disadvantage of the proletariat. Hence, a
series of painful crises from which the CPSU has failed to emerge.

The _fundamental_ cause of the crisis of the October Revolution is the
retardation of the world revolution, caused by a whole series of cruel
defeats of the proletariat. Up to 1923, these were the defeats of
post-war movements and insurrections confronted with the non-existence
of the communist parties at the beginning, and their youth and weakness
subsequently. From 1923 on, the situation changed sharply. The no longer
have before us simply defeats of the proletariat, but routs of the
policy of the Comintern. The blunders committed by this policy in
Germany, England, China, and those of smaller scope which were
perpetrated in a whole series of other countries, are of such a nature
as cannot be duplicated in the history of the Bolshevik party; to
duplicate them, one is forced to examine the history of Menshevism
during the years 1905-1917, or the decades preceding.

The retardation in growth of the Comintern is the immediate result of
its erroneous policy during the last five years. There is no holding
that the “stabilization” is responsible for it, save by conceiving the
nature of the latter in a purely scholastic way, and particularly by
trying to dodge the responsibility. The stabilization did not fall from
the sky; it is not the fruit of an automatic change in the living
conditions of world capitalist economy. It is the result of an
unfavorable change in the political relation of class forces. The
proletariat saw its forces drained by the capitulation of the leadership
in Germany in 1923; it was tricked and betrayed in England by a
leadership with which the Comintern continued to maintain a bloc in
1926; in China, the policy of the Executive Committee of the Comintern
drove the proletariat into the noose of the Kuomintang in 1925-1927.
These are the immediate and indisputable causes of the defeats, and what
is no less important, these are the reasons for the _demoralizing
character_ of these failures. To try to prove that the defeats were
inevitable even if the policy followed had been correct, is to fall into
depraved fatalism and to renounce the Bolshevik conception of the role
and importance of a revolutionary leadership.

The rout of the proletariat, conditioned by a false policy, provided the
bourgeoisie with a respite from the political point of view. The
bourgeoisie utilized the respite to consolidate its economic positions.
These are the causes which furnished the point of departure for the
period of stabilization that began on the day in October 1923 when the
German Communist Party capitulated. To be sure, the consolidation of its
economic positions obtained by the bourgeoisie acts in its turn as a
“stabilizing” factor upon the political environment. But the fundamental
cause of the ascendancy of capitalism during the period of stabilization
of the last five years lies in the fact that the leadership of the
Comintern did not measure up to the events from any point of view.
Revolutionary situations were not lacking. But the leaders were
chronically incapable of taking advantage of them. This defect is not of
a personal or accidental character; it is the inevitable consequence of
the Centrist course, which may camouflage its inconsistency during a
period of lull but ineluctably brings about catastrophes during the
abrupt changes of a revolutionary period.

The internal evolution of the USSR and of the leading party reflected
completely the shifts in the international situation, thus refuting by
example the new reactionary theories of isolated development and of
socialism in one country. Naturally, the course of the leadership within
the USSR was the same as that of the ECCI: Centrism sliding to the
Right. In the internal policy, as well as on the international arena, it
caused the same profound harm, weakening the economic and political
positions of the proletariat.

In order to understand the significance of the turn to the Left now
being effected, it is necessary to become completely and clearly
cognizant not only of the general line of conduct swerving into Right
Centrism, which was completely unmasked in 1926-27, but also the course
during the preceding period of ultra-leftism of 1923-25 which prepared
the backsliding. It is thus a matter of passing judgement on the five
years after Lenin’s death, during which, under the pressure of hostile
class forces and because of the instability and short-sightedness of the
leadership, there ensued a correction, a modification, and an actual
revision of Leninism in the matter both of internal and international
problems.

As early as the Twelfth Congress of the CPSU, in the Spring of 1923, two
positions stood out clearly on the issue of the economic problems of the
Soviet Union; they developed during the five following years and may be
checked in the light of the crisis in grain collections during the past
winter. The Central Committee held that the principal danger threatening
the alliance with the peasantry arose from a premature development of
industry; it found confirmation of this point of view in the supposed
“selling crisis” of the Autumn of 1923. Despite the episodic character
of this crisis, it left a deep impression on the economic policy of the
official leadership. The point of view which I had developed at the
Twelfth Congress (Spring of 1923) advanced tile contrary estimate, that
the essential danger threatening the “_smychka_” and the dictatorship of
the proletariat lay in the “scissors” symbolizing the divergence between
the prices of agricultural and industrial products, reflecting the
_backwardness_ of industry; the continuation, and even more so the
accentuation, of this disproportion, would inevitably bring about a
differentiation in agriculture and handicrafts and a general growth of
capitalist forces. I had already developed this point of view very
clearly as early as the Twelfth Congress. At that time I also formulated
the idea, among others, that _if industry remained backward_, good
harvests would become a mainspring for capitalist and not socialist
tendencies; they would deliver into the hands of capitalist elements an
instrument for disorganizing socialist economy.

These fundamental formulas presented by the two sides subsequently cut
across the struggle of the succeeding five years. During these years,
accusations, absurd and reactionary in their essence, continually
resounded against the Opposition, declaring that “it is afraid of the
muzhik,” that “it fears a good crop,” that “it fears the enrichment of
the village,” or better yet, that “it wishes to plunder the peasant.”
Thus, as early as the Twelfth Congress, and especially during the
discussion of Autumn 1923, the official faction rejected class criteria
and operated with notions like “peasantry” in general, “good crop” in
general, “enrichment” in general. In this manner of treating the
question, there was already making itself felt the pressure of new
bourgeois layers, which were forming on the base of the NEP, which were
connecting themselves with the state apparatus, which resisted
repression and sought to evade the rays of the Leninist searchlight.

Events of an international order acquired a decisive importance in this
process. The second half of 1923 was a period of tense expectation of
the proletarian revolution in Germany.

The situation was evaluated at too late a date and in a hesitant way.
Great friction was generated within the official Stalin-Zinoviev
leadership; true, it remained within the framework of the common
Centrist line. Despite all warnings, a change in tempo was undertaken
only at the last moment; everything ended in a frightful capitulation by
the leadership of the German Communist Party, which surrendered the
decisive positions to the enemy without a struggle.

This defeat was of an alarming character in itself. But it acquired even
more painful significance because the leadership of the ECCI, which in a
very large measure caused this defeat by its policy of lagging at the
tail of events, did not understand the extent of the rout, did not
comprehend its great depth, simply failed to recognize it.

The leadership obstinately insisted that the revolutionary situation was
continuing to develop and that decisive battles were going to be waged
shortly. _It is on the basis of this radically false evaluation that the
Fifth Congress established its orientation towards the middle of 1924_.

As against this, the Opposition, during the second half of 1923, sounded
the alarm on the political _denouément_ which was approaching, demanded
a course truly directed towards armed insurrection, and insistently
warned that in such historic moments, a few weeks, and sometimes a few
days, decide the fate of the revolution for many years to come. On the
other hand, during the following six months which preceded the Fifth
Congress, the Opposition persistently repeated that the revolutionary
situation was already missed; that sail had to be taken in, in
expectation of contrary and unfavorable winds, that it was not the
insurrection that was on the agenda, but defensive battles against an
enemy which has assumed the offensive’uniting the masses for partial
demands, creating points of support in the trade unions, etc.

But the clear understanding of what had taken place and what was
imminent was branded as “Trotskyism,” and condemned as “liquidationism.”
The Fifth Congress demonstratively oriented towards insurrection in the
presence of a political ebb-tide. With a single stroke it disoriented
all the communist parties by sowing confusion among them.

The year 1924, the year of the abrupt and clear swing towards
stabilization, became the year of adventures in Bulgaria and in
Esthonia, of the ultra-left course in general, which ran counter to the
march of events with increasingly greater force. From this time dates
the beginning of the quest for ready-made revolutionary forces outside
the proletariat, whence the idealization of pseudo-peasant parties in
various countries, the flirtation with Radic and LaFollette, the
exaggeration of the role of the Peasant International to the detriment
of the Red Trade Union International, the false evaluation of the
English trade union leadership, a friendship above classes with the
Kuomintang, etc. All of these crutches upon which the ultra-left course
adventurously sought to support itself, subsequently became the
principal pillars of the obviously Rightward course, which replaced the
former after the ultra-leftists no longer found themselves faced with
the situations that crashed against the process of stabilization of
1924-25.

The defeat of the German proletariat was the shock which precipitated a
discussion in the Autumn of 1923 that had as its task, according to the
conception of the official leadership of the CPSU, to approve as an
internal policy the course of passive adaptation to spontaneous economic
developments (struggle against. “super-industrialization,” ridicule of
the planning principle, etc.). So far as international problems were
concerned, the most important thing was to conceal the fact that the
most assured of revolutionary situations had been missed.

Nevertheless, the fact of the rout of the German proletariat had
penetrated the consciousness of the masses, which had been brought to
high tension by the anxious waiting of 1923. The capitulation of the
German leadership introduced into the ranks of the workers, not only in
Germany but in the USSR as well, and also in other countries, elements
of bitter skepticism towards the world revolution in general. The
defeats in Bulgaria and Esthonia then came to add to this. Towards the
middle of 1925, it finally became necessary to admit officially the
existence of the stabilization (a year and a half after it visibly
began); that was done at a time when profound fissures were already
being produced in it (in England, in China). A certain disappointment in
the world revolution, which likewise partly seized the masses, pushed
the Centrist leadership towards strictly national perspectives, which
were soon wretchedly crowned by the theory of socialism in one country.

The ultra-Leftism of 1924-1925, incapable of understanding the
situation, was all the more brutally supplanted by a shift to the Right,
which under the star of the theory of “not leaping over stages,” brought
the policy of adaptation to the colonial bourgeoisie, to the petty
bourgeois democracy and the trade union bureaucracy, to the kulaks,
baptized as “powerful middle peasants,” and to the functionaries, in the
name of “order” and of “discipline.”

The Right-Centrist policy which kept up appearances of Bolshevism in
secondary questions was carried away by the flood-tide of great events
and found its strictly Menshevik and devastating coronation in the
question of the Chinese revolution and the Anglo-Russian Committee.
Never in the course of all revolutionary history had Centrism until then
described the rising and declining curve to such perfection; it is to be
doubted that it will ever again be able to describe a similar one, for
in this case it had at its disposal the powerful resources of the
Comintern in the material domain and in that of ideas; it could arm
itself in advance against any resistance, and against all criticism,
too, by means of all the resources which the proletarian state had at
its disposal.

The objective consequences of the policy of the ECCI provided new
mainsprings which fed the stabilization, still further postponed the
revolution, and tremendously aggravated the international position of
the USSR

***

It was in the course of the struggle of the two tendencies which began
in 1923 that the question of the tempo of socialist construction which,
from the standpoint of theory, bound into a solid knot the divergences
of views in internal and international questions.

The official leadership, deceived by the illusions of the period of
reconstruction (1923-1927) which was effected on the basis of capital
ready to hand, taken from the bourgeoisie, slid further and further
towards the position of isolated economic development as a goal in
itself. And it is precisely upon this grossest of errors that, thanks to
the blows dealt by the international defeats, there subsequently grew up
the theory of socialism in a single country. Rupture with world economy
was preached precisely at the moment when the conclusion of the period
of reconstruction made the need of connection with world economy
increasingly imperative.

The question of the tempo of our economic development was not posed at
all by the official leadership. This leadership did not in the slightest
understand that Soviet economy was regulated all the more rigidly by the
world market in proportion as it was obliged to link up with this market
through export and import trade.

When we insistently pointed out that the tempo of Soviet construction is
conditioned by world economy and world politics, the directors and
inspirers of the official line replied to us: “There is no need to
inject the international factor into our socialist development”
(Stalin), or on the other hand: “We will construct socialism if it be
only at a snail’s pace” (Bukharin). If one is not afraid to follow this
idea logically to its conclusion, that is to say, that there is “no need
to inject the international factor” into the question of the tempo of
our economic development, one will see that it means simply that there
is no need to “inject” the Comintern into the fate of the October
Revolution, for the Comintern is nothing else than the revolutionary
expression of the “international factor.” But the point is that Centrism
never pursues its ideas to their end.

The question of tempo is obviously of decisive importance not only in
economics but especially in politics, which is “concentrated economics.”

If in internal affairs we were being retarded because of the wrong way
of approaching economy, retarding it to an ever greater degree from fear
of too great an advance, then, on the contrary, in the face of the
problems of the international revolution, the systematic loss of tempo
was due to Centrist incapacity to estimate in full the revolutionary
situation and to take advantage of it at the critical moments. To be
sure, it would be vain pedantry to state that the German proletariat,
guided by a correct leadership, would _certainly_ have conquered and
held power; or that the English proletariat, if the leadership had seen
correctly, would _certainly_ have overthrown the General Council and
thus considerably hastened the hour of proletarian victory; or that the
Chinese proletariat, had it not been deceived by being forced under the
banner of the Kuomintang, would have brought the agrarian revolution to
a victorious conclusion and would _certainly_ have seized the power by
leading the poor peasants after it. _But the door was open to these
three eventualities_, and in Germany – wide open. As against this, the
leadership acted counter to the class struggle, strengthened the enemy
at the expense of its own class and thus did everything to guarantee
defeat.

The question of tempo is decisive in every struggle and all the more so
in a struggle on a world scale. The fate of the Soviet republic cannot
be separated from that of the world revolution. No one has placed
centuries or even many decades at our disposal so that we may use them
as we please. The question is settled by the dynamics of the struggle,
in which the enemy profits by each blunder, each oversight, and occupies
every inch of undefended territory. Without a correct economic policy,
the proletarian dictatorship in the USSR will crumble, mill be unable to
endure long enough to be saved from without, and will thereby inflict
infinite damage upon the international proletariat. Without a correct
policy of the Comintern, the world revolution will be delayed for an
indefinite historical period; but it is time that decides. What is lost
by the international revolution is gained by the bourgeoisie. The
construction of socialism is a contest between the Soviet state and not
only the internal bourgeoisie, but also the world bourgeoisie, a contest
waged on the basis of the world-wide class struggle. If the bourgeoisie
is able to wrest a new large historic period from the world proletariat,
it will, by basing itself on the powerful preponderance of its
technology, of its wealth, of its army and its navy, overthrow the
Soviet dictatorship; the question whether it will attain this by
economic, political, or military means, or a combination of the three,
is of secondary importance.

Time is a decisive factor, not merely an important one. It is not true
that we will be able to build “complete socialism,” if the Comintern
continues the policy which found its expression in the capitulation of
the German party in 1923, in the Esthonian putsch in 1924, in the
ultra-left errors of 1924-1925, in the infamous comedy of the
Angle-Russian Committee of 1926, in the uninterrupted series of blunders
which doomed the Chinese revolution of 1925-1927. The theory of
socialism in one country accustoms us to regard these errors with
indulgence, as if we had all the time we want at our disposal. A
profound error! Time is a decisive factor in politics, especially in
periods of sharp historic turns, when a life-and-death struggle between
two systems is unfolding. We must dispose of time with the greatest
economy: the Comintern will not survive five years of mistakes like
those which have been committed by its leadership since 1923. It holds,
thanks to the attraction that the October Revolution exercises over the
masses, the banner of Marx and Lenin; but it has been living during the
course of the last period on its basic capital. _The Communist
International will not survive five more years of similar mistakes_.
But, if the Comintern crumbles, neither will the USSR long endure. The
bureaucratic psalms announcing that socialism has been nine-tenths
realized in our country (Stalin) will then appear as stupid verbiage.
Certainly, even in this case the proletarian revolution would be able in
the end to pioneer new roads to victory. But when? And at the price of
what sacrifices and countless victims? The new generation of
international revolutionists would have to tie up anew the broken
threads of continuity and conquer anew the confidence of the masses in
the greatest banner in history, which may be compromised by an
uninterrupted chain of mistakes, upheavals, and falsifications in the
domain of ideas.

These words must be said clearly and distinctly to the international
proletarian vanguard, without in the least fearing the inevitable
howlings, screechings, and persecutions on the part of those whose
optimism survives only because they shut their eyes out of cowardice so
as not to see the reality.

That is why, for us, the policy of the Comintern dominates all other
questions. Without a correct international policy, all the possible
economic successes in the USSR will not save the October Revolution and
will not lead to socialism. To speak more exactly: without a correct
international policy, there can be no correct policy in internal affairs
either, for the line is one. The false way in which the chairman of a
Soviet district committee approaches the kulak is only a small link in
the chain whose largest links are constituted by the attitude of the Red
trade unions towards the General Council, or of the Central Committee of
the CPSU towards Chiang Kai-shek and Purcell.

The stabilization of the European bourgeoisie, the strengthening of the
social democracy, the retardation in the growth of the communist
parties, the strengthening of capitalist tendencies in the USSR, the
shift to the Right of the policy of the leadership of the CPSU and of
the Comintern, the bureaucratization of the entire regime, the rabid
campaign against the Left wing, driven into the Opposition all these
processes are indissolubly bound together, characterizing a period of
weakening, certainly provisional, but deep-going, of the positions of
the proletarian revolution, a period of pressure exerted by enemy forces
upon the proletarian vanguard.

 

4. Radicalization of the Masses and Question of Leadership

The February Plenum of the ECCI (1928) made an undeniable attempt at a
Leftward turn, that is to say, towards the opinions defended by the
Opposition, on two questions of paramount importance: the policy of the
English and French Communist Parties. One might attribute a decisive
importance, and not merely a symptomatic one, to this turn, despite all
its incoherence, if it had been accompanied by the application of the
fundamental rule of Lenin’s strategy: _condemn a false policy in order
to pave the way for a correct policy_. The united front in France, in
Germany, and in other countries was directed along the lines of the
Anglo-Russian Committee. The course of the latter was almost as
disastrous for the English Communist Party as was the course of the
Kuomintang for the Chinese Communist Party.

As far as the resolution on the Chinese question is concerned, not only
does it sanctify all the errors committed but it prepares for new ones
which are no less cruel.

The resolution of the February Plenum on the Russian question is a far
better mirror of the regime of the Comintern than any one political
line. It will suffice to state that this resolution contains the
following assertion:

“The Trotskyists, together with the social democracy, are banking on the
overthrow of the power of the Soviets.” [2]

Men who out of docility raise their hands to vote for such affirmations
without believing a single word (for only a complete idiot can _believe_
that the Opposition is banking on the overthrow of the power of the
Soviets), such men do not always find the courage, as experience
testifies, to raise their hands in a determined struggle against the
class enemy.

Taken altogether, the February Plenum symbolizes a contradictory attempt
at a Left turn. From the political point of view this attempt is
conditioned upon an undeniable shift that is taking place in the mood of
the great working class masses, principally in Europe and especially in
Germany. There can be no talk of a correct leadership without a clear
understanding of the character of this shift and the perspectives that
it opens.

In his speech, or rather in the broadside of insults which he flung at
the Opposition, Thalmann stated at the February Plenum of the ECCI:

“The Trotskyists fail to perceive the radicalization of the
international working class and do not notice that the situation is
becoming more and more revolutionary.” [3]

Then he passes, as is customary, to the ritualistic demonstration which
seeks to prove that together with Hilferding we are burying the world
revolution. One might ignore these puerile tales, if what were involved
here were not the second largest party of the Comintern, represented in
the ECCI by Thälmann. What is this radicalization of the working class
which the Opposition fails to perceive? It is what ThÄalmann and many
others with him had likewise termed as “radicalization” in 1921, in
1925, in 1926, and in 1927. The decline in influence of the communist
party after its capitulation in 1923 and the growth of the social
democracy did not exist for them. They did not even ask themselves what
were the causes of these phenomena. It is difficult to speak to a man
who does not want to learn the first letters of the political alphabet.
Unfortunately it is not solely a, question of ThÄlmann; he is not even
of any importance by himself. Nor is Semard. The Third Congress was a
real school of revolutionary strategy. It taught how to _differentiate_.
That is the first condition, no matter what the job. There are periods
of high-tide and periods of ebb-tide. But the former and the latter pass
in turn through various phases of development. It is necessary from the
point of view of tactic, to adapt the policy of each of these stages
being experienced, while maintaining at the same time the general line
of conduct in its orientation towards the conquest of power and being
always prepared, so as not to be taken unawares by a sharp change in the
situation. The Fifth Congress turned topsy-turvy the lessons of the
Third. It turned its back to the objective situation; it substituted for
analysis of events an agitational rubber-stamp: “The working class is
becoming more and more radicalized, the situation is becoming more and
more revolutionary.”

In reality, it is only during the past year that the German working
class has begun to recover from the consequences of the 1923 defeat. The
Opposition was the first to notice it. In a document published by us,
from which Thälmann quoted, we state the following:

“An undeniable shift to the Left is occurring in the European working
class. It is manifesting itself in a sharpening of the strike struggles
and a growth in the number of communist votes. But this is only the
first stage in the shift. The number of social democratic voters is
increasing, parallel with the growth of the communist votes, and in part
outstripping the latter. If this process develops and deepens, we will
enter the following phase, when the shift will begin, from the social
democracy to communism. [4]

In so far as the data relating to the latest elections in Germany and in
France permit us to judge, the above evaluation of the condition of the
European working class, especially the German, can be regarded almost as
beyond dispute. Unfortunately the press of the Comintern, including that
of the CPSU, furnishes absolutely no analyses which are serious,
thorough, documented, illustrated by figures, of the moods and
tendencies existing in the proletariat. Statistics, in so far as they
are presented, are simply adjusted to a particular tendency having as
its aim the preservation of the leadership’s “prestige.” They
continually pass in silence over the factual data of exceptional
importance which determine the curve of the workers’ movement during the
1923-1928 period if these data refute false judgments and instructions.
All this makes it extremely difficult to judge the dynamics of the
radicalization of the masses, its tempo, its scope, its possibilities.

Thälmann did not have the slightest right to say to the February Plenum
of the ECCI that “… The Trotskyists fail to perceive the radicalization
of the international working class.” Not only had we perceived the
radicalization of the _European_ proletariat, but in that connection we
had established, as early as last year, our evaluation of the
conjuncture. The latter was completely confirmed by the May (1928)
elections to the Reichstag. The radicalization is passing through its
first phase, still directing the masses into the social democratic
channels. In February, Thälmann refused to see this; he insisted: “The
situation is becoming more and more revolutionary.” In such a general
form, this statement is only a hollow phrase. Can one say that “the
situation is becoming more and more [?] revolutionary” if the social
democracy, the main prop of the bourgeois regime, is growing?

In order to approach a revolutionary situation the “radicalization” of
the masses must in any case still pass through a preliminary phase in
which the workers will flock from the social democracy to the communist
party. Assuredly, as a partial phenomenon, this is already taking place
now. But the principal direction of the flow is not yet that at all. To
confound an initial stage of radicalization, which is still
half-pacifist, half-collaborationist, with a revolutionary stage, is to
head towards cruel blunders. It is necessary to learn how to
differentiate. Anyone who merely repeats from year to year that “the
masses are becoming radicalized, the situation is revolutionary,” is not
a Bolshevik leader, but a tub-thumping agitator; it is certain that he
will not recognize the revolution when it really approaches.

The social democracy is the chief prop of the bourgeois regime. But this
prop contains contradictions within itself. If the workers were passing
from the communist party to the social democracy, one could speak with
perfect certainty of the consolidation of the bourgeois regime. It was
so in 1924. At that time Thalmann and the other leaders of the Fifth
Congress were unable to understand it: that is why they replied with
insults to our arguments and advice. At present the situation is
different. The communist party is growing _alongside_ of the social
democracy, but not yet directly _at the expense_ of the latter. The
masses are streaming in parallel lines to the two parties; up to now the
flow towards the social democracy is the larger. The abandonment of the
bourgeois parties by the workers and their awakening from political
apathy, which lie at bottom of these processes, obviously do not
constitute a strengthening of the bourgeoisie. But neither does the
growth of the social democracy constitute a revolutionary situation. It
is necessary to learn how to differentiate. How should the present
situation be qualified then? It is a transitional situation, containing
contradictions, not yet differentiated, still disclosing various
possibilities. The subsequent development of this process must be
vigilantly watched, without one’s getting drunk on cut and dried
phrases, and holding oneself always ready for sharp turns in the
situation.

The social democracy is not merely gratified by the growth of the number
of its voters; it is following the flood of workers with great anxiety
for it creates great difficulties for it. Before the workers begin to
pass _en masse_ from the social democracy to the communist party (and
the arrival of such a moment is inevitable), we must expect new and
great friction inside the social democracy itself, the formation of more
deep-going groupings and splits, etc. That will very probably open up
the field to active, offensive, tactical operations on the part of the
communist party along the line of the “united front” in order to hasten
the process of revolutionary differentiation of the masses, that is to
say, primarily the pulling away of workers from the social democracy.
But woe unto us if the “maneuvers” reduce themselves to the fact that
the communist party will again look into the mouth of the “Left” social
democrats (and they may still go far to the Left), while waiting for
their wisdom teeth to grow. We saw “maneuvers” of this kind practiced on
a small scale in Saxony in 1923, and on it large scale in England and
China in 1925-1927. In all these cases they led to the missing of the
revolutionary situation and to great defeats.

The judgment of Thälmann is not his own; this can be seen from the draft
program which states:

“The process of radicalization of the masses which is sharpening, the
growth of the influence and of the authority of the communist parties …
all this clearly shows that a new revolutionary wave is mounting in the
imperialist centers.”

To the extent that this is a programmatic generalization, it is
radically false. The epoch of imperialism and of proletarian revolutions
has already known and will again know in the future not only a “process
of radicalization which is sharpening,” but also periods when the masses
move to the Right; not only of growth of the influence of the communist
parties, but also of a temporary decline of that influence, especially
in the event of errors, blunders, capitulations. If it is a question of
judging from the standpoint of _conjucture_, more or less true for
certain countries, in the given period, but not at all for the entire
world, then the place for this judgment is in a resolution and not in a
program. The program is written for the entire epoch of proletarian
revolutions. Unfortunately, in the course of these five years, the
leadership of the Comintern has given no proof of comprehension in
matters of dialectic regarding the growth and the disappearance of
revolutionary situations. On these subjects it has remained in a
permanent scholasticism, treating of “radicalization” without studying
in a fundamental way the living stages of the struggle of the world
proletariat.

By reason of the defeat experienced by Germany in the course of the
great war, the political life of the country was distinguished by the
special character of its crises; this placed the German proletarian
vanguard in the presence of situations fraught with responsibilities.
The defeats of the German proletariat during the five post-war years
were immediately due to the extraordinary weakness of the revolutionary
party; in the course of the subsequent five years they were due to the
errors of the leadership.

In 1918-1919, the revolutionary situation still completely lacked a
revolutionary proletarian party. In 1921 when the ebb set in, the
communist party which was already fairly strong, attempted to provoke a
revolution despite the fact that the immediate premises for it were
lacking. The preparatory work (“the struggle for the masses”) which then
followed resulted in a Right deviation in the party. The leadership,
deprived of revolutionary scope and initiative, suffered shipwreck in
the sharp Leftward shift in the whole situation (Autumn of 1923). The
Right wing was supplanted by the Left wing, whose domination
nevertheless already coincided with the revolutionary ebb. But the Lefts
refused to understand it and obstinately maintained “the course towards
insurrection.” From that, new errors were born which weakened the party
and brought about the overthrow of the Left leadership. The present
Central Committee, leaning secretly upon a section of the “Rights,”
mercilessly struggled all the time against the Left, repeating all the
while mechanically that the masses were becoming radicalized, that the
revolution was near.

The history of the evolution of the German Communist Party presents a
picture of abrupt alternation of factions assuming power, depending upon
the oscillations of the political curve: each directing group, at the
time of each abrupt upward or downward turn of the political curve, that
is, either towards a provisional “stabilization” or, on the contrary,
towards a revolutionary crisis, suffers shipwreck and yields place to
the competing group. It so happened that the Right group had as its
weakness an incapacity for knowing how, in case of a change in the
situation, to switch all activity on to the rails of the revolutionary
struggle for the conquest of power. As against this, the weakness of the
Left group was due to the fact that it could neither recognize nor
understand the necessity of mobilizing the masses for transitional
demands, springing from the objective situation during the preparatory
period. The weak side of one group was supplemented by the weaknesses of
the other. Since the leadership was replaced at the time of each break
in the situation, the leading cadres of the party were unable to acquire
a wider experience, extending through advance and decline, through flood
and ebb, through retreat and attack. A truly revolutionary leadership
cannot be educated unless it understands our epoch as an epoch of sudden
shifts and sharp turns. The selection of leaders in random fashion,
chosen by appointment, inevitably contains within itself the latent
danger of a new bankruptcy of the leadership at the very first major
social crisis.

To lead means to foresee. It is necessary, in a reasonable interval, to
stop flattering Thalmann solely because he grubs in the gutter for the
vilest epithets to fling at the Opposition, just as Tang Ping-shan was
petted at the Seventh Plenum simply because he translated Thalmann’s
insults into Chinese. The German party must be told that the judgment
passed by Thalmann in February on the political situation is vulgar,
arbitrary, and false. It is necessary to recognize openly the strategic
and tactical blunders committed during the last five years and to study
them conscientiously before the wounds they caused have had time to
heal: strategic lessons can take root only when they follow events step
by step. It is necessary to stop replacing party leaders in order to
punish them for mistakes committed by the ECCI or because they do not
approve of the GPU when it punishes proletarian revolutionists
(Belgium). It is necessary to allow the young cadres to stand on their
own feet, helping them, but not ordering them about. It is necessary to
stop “appointing” heads simply on the basis of their certificates of
good behavior (that is to say, if they are against the Opposition). It
is necessary once and for all to give up the system of the Central
Committees of protection.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

2. PRAVDA, February 19, 1928.

3. PRAVDA, February l7, 1928.

4. Trotsky, ON THE NEW STAGE.

The Third International After Lenin



WHAT NOW? (PART 3)


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

5. How the Current Swing Toward the Left in the CPSU Was Prepared

It is indispensable that we sketch in this summary the policy and regime
of the Comintern in order to find the correct place which corresponds to
the swing of the leadership to the Left. Since this swing issued
_directly_ from conditions which caused the economic crisis in the USSR,
and since it is developing according to a line which particularly
touches internal questions, it is indispensable that we examine more
closely, and in greater detail, how these questions were presented in
the past, up to recently, and what is new in the latest resolutions and
measures of the Central Committee of the CPSU. It is only in this way
that the correct line of the policy to follow subsequently will be
outlined before us.

***

The altogether exceptional difficulties experienced this year (1928) in
the grain collections have an enormous importance not only in the
economic domain but likewise in that of politics and of the party. It is
not accidental that these difficulties have unleashed the turn to the
Left. On the other hand, by themselves these difficulties establish the
balance sheet of a vast period of economic and general policy.

The transition from war communism to socialist economy could have been
realized without being accompanied by _great_ retreats only if the
proletarian revolution had been immediately extended to the _advanced_
countries. The fact that this extension was delayed for years led us to
the great retreat of the NEP, a deep and lasting retreat, in the Spring
of 1921. The proportions of the indispensable retreat were established
not only theoretically but also by feeling out the ground in practice.
In the Autumn of 1921 it was already necessary further to deepen the
retreat.

On October 29, 1921, that is, seven months after the transition to the
NEP, Lenin stated at the Moscow District Conference:

“This transition to the New Economic Policy which was effected in the
Spring, this retreat on our part … has it proved adequate so that we can
stop retreating, so that we can prepare to take the offensive? No, it
has still proved inadequate … And we are now obliged to admit it, if we
do not want to hide our heads in ostrich fashion, if we don’t want to
appear like fellows who do not see their own defeat, if we are not
afraid of seeing the danger that confronts us. We must recognize that
the retreat has proved to be inadequate, that it is necessary to execute
a supplementary retreat, a further retreat in the course of which we
will pass from state capitalism to the creation of purchases, of sales,
and of monetary circulation regulated by the state. That is why we are
in the situation of men who still continue to be forced to retreat in
order finally to pass to the offensive at a further stage.” [5]

And later, in the same speech:

“To conceal from oneself, from the working class, from the masses, that
in the economic domain, in the Spring of 1921 and at present, too, in
the Autumn-Winter of 1921-1922, we are still continuing to retreat, is
to condemn ourselves to complete unconsciousness, is to be devoid of the
courage to face the situation squarely. Under such conditions, work and
struggle would be impossible.” [6]

It was only in the Spring of the following year, in 1922, that Lenin
decided to give the signal to halt the retreat. He spoke of it for the
first time on March 6, 1922, at a session of the fraction of the Metal
Workers’ Congress:

“We can now say that this retreat, in the sense of concessions which we
made to capitalists, is completed. And I hope, and L am certain, that
the party congress will also state so officially in the name of the
leading party of Russia.” [7]

And immediately he added an explanation, frank and honest as always,
truly Leninist:

“All talk of the cessation of the retreat must not be understood in the
sense that we have already created the foundation of the new economy and
that we can proceed tranquilly. No, the foundation has not yet been
created.” [8]

The Eleventh Congress, on the basis of Lenin’s report, adopted the
following resolution on this question:

“The Congress takes note that the sum total of the measures applied and
decided upon during the course of the past year exhausts the necessary
concessions made by the party to private capitalism and considers that
in this sense the retreat is completed.” [9]

This resolution, deeply pondered, and, as we have seen, carefully
prepared, presupposed consequently that the new points of departure
occupied by the party would furnish the possibility of inaugurating the
socialist offensive, slowly, but _without new movements of retreat_.

Nevertheless, the hopes of the last congress which Lenin led did not
prove accurate on this point. In the Spring of 1925 there came the
necessity of executing a new retreat: granting to the rich classes of
the village the right to exploit lower strata by hiring labor and
renting land.

The necessity for this new retreat, immense in its consequences, which
had not been foreseen by the strategic plan of Lenin in 1922, was due
not only to the fact that the limits of the retreat had been drawn “too
short” (the most elementary prudence made that imperative) but also
because during 1923-1924, the leadership understood neither the
situation nor the tasks which devolved upon it, and lost time while
under the delusion that it was “gaining” time.

But that is not all. The new painful retreat in April 1925 was not
called, as Lenin would have called it, a profound defeat and retreat; it
was presented as a victorious step of the _smychka_, as a mere link in
the general mechanism of building socialism. It is precisely against
such proceedings that Lenin had warned all his life, and especially in
the Autumn of 1921 when it became necessary to continue and deepen the
retreat begun in the Spring.

“It is not the defeat which is so dangerous,” said Lenin in the above
quoted speech at the Moscow District Conference, “as the fear of
admitting one’s defeat, the fear of drawing from it all the conclusions
… We must not be afraid of admitting defeats. We must learn from the
experience of the defeats. If we adopt the opinion that by admitting
defeats we induce despondency and a weakening of energy for the
struggle, similar to a surrender of positions, me would have to say that
such revolutionists are absolutely not worth a damn…. Our strength in
the past was, as it will remain in the future, that we can take the
heaviest defeats into account with perfect coolness, learning from their
experience what must be modified in our activity. That is why it is
necessary to speak candidly. This is vital and important not alone for
the purpose of theoretical correctness, but also from the practical
point of view. _We cannot learn to solve the problems of today by new
methods if yesterday’s experience has not made us open our eyes in order
to see wherein the old methods were at fault._” [10]

But this remarkable warning was completely forgotten the day after Lenin
departed from leadership; it has not been really remembered a single
time up to now.

Inasmuch as the decisions of April 1925 legalized the developing
differentiation in the village and opened the floodgates to it, the
_smychka_ signified in the future an ever-growing commodity exchange
between the workers’ state and the kulak. Instead of recognizing this
terrible danger, the servile theory of integrating the kulak into
socialism was immediately created. For the first time, this process in
its entirety was presented to the party conference, in the name of the
party, as the “building of socialism in one country” independent of
world economy and world revolution. Thus the very appearance of this
petty bourgeois, reactionary theory is due not to the real successes of
socialist construction, which are indisputable, but precisely to the
setbacks of the latter and to the need thereby engendered among the
leaders to provide the proletariat a “moral” solace as a counterbalance
to the new material concessions granted to capitalism.

The resolution of the Fourteenth Congress (January 1926) on
industrialization voiced a whole series of correct theses, repeating
almost word for word certain ideas that the Opposition had developed on
this subject during 1923-1925. But alongside of this resolution a
campaign was waged against the Left wing, labeled as
“super-industrialists,” that is to say, against those who did not want
the adopted decisions simply to remain on paper; our warnings about the
kulak danger were presented under the absurd designation of “panic”; the
positing of the fact that the differentiation of classes was taking
place in the village was punished as anti-Soviet propaganda; the demand
for the exercise of stronger pressure upon the kulak to the advantage of
industry was labeled as a tendency to “plunder the peasants”
(Stalin-Rykov-Kuibyshev manifesto); after all this the resolution on
industrialization had as little influence on the real economic process
as had been the case with certain other resolutions of the Fourteenth
Congress on party democracy and on collective leadership in the
Comintern.

In 1926 the Opposition formulated the discussion on the _smychka_, which
began as far back as the Spring of 1923, in the following way:

“QUESTION: Is it true that the policy of the Opposition threatens to
disrupt the _smychka_ between the proletariat and the peasantry?

“ANSWER: This accusation is false to the core. The _smychka_ is
threatened at this moment by the lag in industry, on the one hand, and
by the growth of the kulak, on the other. The lack of industrial
products is driving a wedge between country and city. In the political
and economic domains, the kulak is beginning to dominate the middle and
poor peasants, opposing them to the proletariat. _This development is
still in it’s very first stages_. It is precisely this that threatens
the _smychka_. The underestimation of the lag in industry and of the
growth of the kulak disrupts the correct, Leninist leadership of the
alliance between the two classes, this basis of the dictatorship under
the conditions in our country.” [11]

Let us stress here that in this question also the Opposition exaggerated
nothing, despite the bitterness of the struggle, when, rising in
opposition to the renegade theory of integrating the kulak into
socialism, good only for paving the way to our integration into
capitalism, we stated in 1926 that the kulak danger was “still in its
very first stages.” We had pointed out, from 1923 on, the direction from
which the danger was coming. We had pictured its growth at each new
stage. In what else does the art of leadership consist if not in being
able to grasp a danger in time, that is to say, when it is still “in its
first stages,” and to prevent the possibility of its further
development? _To lead is to foresee_ – not to persecute those who are
able to foresee.

To the greatest misfortune of the party, it was impossible even to make
public the above-quoted lines. For having propagated them, the best
militants were expelled from the party by functionaries without an idea
in their heads, who did not want to think of tomorrow, and who were,
moreover, incapable of doing so.

On December 9, 1926, at the Seventh Plenum of the ECCI, Bukharin
denounced the Opposition in the following terms, on the subject of the
_smychka_ and of the grain collections:

“What was the most powerful argument that our Opposition used against
the Central Committee of the party (I have in mind here the Autumn of
1925)? They said then: the contradictions are growing monstrously, and
the CC of the party fails to understand this. They said: the kulaks, in
whose hands almost the entire grain surplus is concentrated, have
organized ‘the grain strike’ against us. That is why the grains are
coming in so poorly. We all heard this … The Opposition estimated that
all the rest was only the political expression of this fundamental
phenomenon. Subsequently the same comrades intervened to state: the
kulak has intrenched himself still further, the danger has still further
increased. Comrades, if the first and second affirmations had been
correct, we would have even a stronger ‘kulaks’ strike’ against the
proletariat this year … The Opposition slanders us by stating that we
are contributing to the growth of the kulaks, that we are continually
making concessions, that we are helping the kulaks to organize the grain
strike; the real results are proof of just the contrary …” [12]

Does not this single quotation from Bukharin demonstrate by itself the
complete blindness of the leadership on the key question of our economic
policy?

Bukharin, however, was no exception. He only “generalized” theoretically
the blindness of the leadership. The most responsible leaders of the
party and of economy vied with each other in declaring that we had
overcome crises (Rykov), that we were dominating the peasant market, and
that the question of grain collections had become strictly a purely
organizational question of the Soviet apparatus (Mikoyan). The
resolution of the July Plenum of the Central Committee in 1927 announced
that the development of economic activity during the course of that year
had been, taken together, without any crises. At the same time, the
official press affirmed in unison that the scarcity of goods in the
country had, if not completely disappeared, at least been considerably
ameliorated.

To counterbalance all this the Opposition wrote anew in its theses for
the Fifteenth Congress:

“The decrease in the total amount of grains collected is, on the one
hand, direct evidence of the profound disturbance existing in the
relations between the city and the country and, on the other hand, it is
a source of new difficulties which threaten us.”

Where is the root of our difficulties? The Opposition replied :

“In the course of recent years industry developed too slowly, lagging
behind the development of national economy as a whole … Owing to this,
the dependence of state economy on kulak and capitalist elements is
growing in the domain of raw materials, in export, and in foodstuffs.”

Let us recall also that the sharpest intervention of the Opposition was
the one during the anniversary demonstration on November 7, 1927; the
sharpest slogan formulated in this intervention was: “Let us turn our
fire against the Right: against the kulak, the jober, and the
bureaucrat; against the kulak and the jober sabotaging the grain
collections; against the bureaucrat organizing or sleeping during the
Donetz trial.” The controversy, which was no minor one, and wherein the
head of the revolution was at stake, ended in the Winter of 1927-1928
accompanied by threats of GPU agents, while decisions were hurriedly
signed punishing by exile, in conformity with Article 58, the
“deviations” which varied from the general Centrist blindness, from that
of Bukharin in particular.

Had it not been for the whole preceding work of the Opposition beginning
with the theses of 1923 and ending with the placards of November 7,
1927; had not the Opposition established a correct prognosis in advance,
and had it not raised a justified alarm in the party and working class
ranks, the crisis in the grain collections would have only hastened the
development of the Right wing course towards the further unleashing of
capitalist forces.

More than once before in history has the proletarian vanguard, or even
the vanguard of the vanguard, paid with its own destruction for a new
step forward by its class or for checking an offensive by its enemies.

 

6. One Step Forward, Half a Step Backward

It was the crisis in grain collections, unlike the Chinese,
Anglo-Russian, and other crises, that could not be passed over in
silence, that provided an impulse towards a new phase in policy. It had
its immediate repercussions not only in the entire economy but also in
the daily life of each worker. That is why the new political period
dates from the grain collections.

Without any connection at all with the past, the party was treated on
February 15, 1928, in PRAVDA, to a leading article which might have been
taken for a restatement, and in part for an almost literal reproduction,
of the PLATFORM OF THE OPPOSITION presented at the Fifteenth Congress.

This unexpected article, written under the direct pressure of the crisis
in grain collections, announced:

“Among a whole number of causes which have determined the difficulties
experienced in grain collections, it is necessary to single out the
following. The village has expanded and enriched itself. Above all it is
the kulak who has expanded and enriched himself. Three years of good
crops have not passed without leaving their mark.”

Thus, the refusal of the village to give the city grain is due to the
fact that the “village has enriched itself,” that is to say, that it has
realized as best it could Bukharin’s slogan: “Enrich yourselves!” But
why then does the enrichment of the village undermine the _smychka_
instead of consolidating it? Because, the article replies, “_Above all
it is the kulak who has expanded and enriched himself_.” Thus the theory
affirming that the middle peasant had expanded during these years at the
expense of the kulak and the poor peasant, was abruptly rejected as so
much useless rubish. “_Above all_ it is the kulak who has expanded and
enriched himself.”

However, even the enrichment of the kulaks in the villages does not by
itself explain the disorganization of the exchange between the city and
the country. The alliance with the kulak is not a socialist alliance.
But the grain crisis consists in the fact that even this _smychka_ is
non-existent. Ergo, not only has the kulak expanded and enriched himself
but he does not even find it necessary to exchange his hoarded natural
produce for the _chervonetz_; as for the goods that he wants and is able
to get in town, he pays for them with a quantity of grain, which is
absolutely inadequate for the city. PRAVDA also formulates the second
cause, which is at bottom the fundamental reason of the grain crisis.

“The increase in the income of the peasantry … in the presence of a
relative backwardness in the supply of industrial products permits the
peasants in general and the kulak in particular to hoard grain.”

Now the picture is clear. The fundamental cause is the lag in industry
and the scarcity of industrial goods. Under these conditions, not only
was there no socialist _smychka_ established with the poor and middle
peasants belonging to the cooperative, but there is not even a
capitalist _smychka_ with the kulak. If the two quotations from PRAVDA
to which we have just referred are compared with those of the Opposition
documents presented in the preceding chapter, then it must be admitted
that PRAVDA repeats practically _verbatim_ the expressions and ideas of
my _Questions and Answers_, the penalty for typing which was expulsion
from the party.

However, the PRAVDA article does not stop here. While still making the
reservation that the kulak is not “the principal hoarder of grains” the
article admits that he is the economic authority in the village, that
“he has established a _smychka_ with the city speculator who pays higher
prices for grain,” that “he [the kulak] has the possibility of drawing
the middle peasant behind him.” This description, which characterizes
with precision the relations existing in the village, has nothing in
common with the official legends of recent years on the dominant and
continually increasing economic role of the middle peasant; but for that
it coincides entirely with our platform which was considered as
anti-party document. After eleven years of proletarian dictatorship it
appears that the kulak is the “economic authority of the village,” that
“he has the possibility of drawing the middle peasant behind him” – the
middle peasant who, while continuing to be the central village figure
from the numerical standpoint, finds himself held on the economic leash
of the kulak. The reservation to the effect that the kulak is not “the
principal hoarder of grain,” does not at all soften the picture but
makes it more somber. If we accept the rather dubious figure of 20% as
the share of the grain trade which is currently attributed to the kulak,
the fact that the latter can “draw behind him” the middle peasant in the
market, that is to say, lead him to sabotage the state grain
collections, is made to stand out all the more sharply. The New York
banks do not own the totality of goods in circulation either; Net they
are the ones who dominate it. Whoever attempts to place this “modest”
20% in evidence, only emphasizes thereby that it is enough for the kulak
to have a fifth of the grain in his hands for him to seize the dominant
role on the grain market. That is how weak an influence the state exerts
on the rural economy under conditions of a lagging industry.

Another inevitable reservation, to the effect that the “leading” role of
the kulak has been recorded only in several regions and not in all of
them, is no palliative either; on the contrary, it even sharpens the
alarming meaning of what is happening. These “several” regions were
already sufficient to shake the _smychka_ between the city and the
country to its very foundations. What would have happened had this
process been extended in the same degree to all regions?

We are dealing here with a living economic process and not with a stable
statistical mean. It is not at all a question of measuring,
quantitatively and with precision, this most complex and extensive
process as we march along, but it is necessary to determine its quality,
that is to say, to show _in what direction the phenomena are growing_.
Today, we have 20% ; tomorrow there may be a great deal more. Certain
regions have gone ahead; others lag behind. In point of fact, the
authority of the kulak in the village and the possibility he has of
drawing the middle peasant behind him are not directly survivals from
the past; no, in the latter we have new facts which have arisen on the
groundwork of the NEP, following upon the kulak suppression; in this
sense, the regions where the phenomenon is more sharply apparent are
only pointing the way to the more “backward” ones, providing, naturally,
that the course of the economic policy, which has ruled for five years,
especially since April 1925, will be continued.

At whose expense has the new “Soviet” kulak gained in authority in the
village? At the expense of the dominating workers’ state and its
instruments, state industry and cooperation. If the kulak has obtained
the possibility of drawing the middle peasant behind him, against whom
will he lead him? Against the workers’ state! Therein lies the serious
and profound _break_ in the _economic smychka_, a premise of another,
far greater danger, namely, _the break in the political alliance_.

It is no longer a question today, as was the case in the Spring of 1923,
of anticipating events, nor one of theoretical considerations, but of
rigorously verified facts. Despite the dictatorship of the proletariat,
despite the nationalization of the land, despite state-protected
cooperation, the retardation experienced by industry has in a few years
placed the reins in the village in the hands of the mortal enemies of
socialist construction. This was certified by PRAVDA for the first time
on February 15, 1928.

From all this, despairing conclusions need not at all be drawn. But
before everything else, the clear and complete truth must be presented
to the party. Nothing must be underrated or embellished. That is why the
article of PRAVDA, in spite of its petty, equivocal reservations,
constitutes a serious step forward. By that alone, it considerably
reduces the distance, on this question, separating the line of the
Opposition from that followed by the leadership in the course of the
past five years. All Oppositionists can only welcome this. But after
this step forward there ensued at least half a step backward. As soon as
the situation became less acute, from the standpoint of the grain
collections, thanks to emergency administrative measures, the machine of
official optimism was set into motion again.

The last programmatic manifesto of the Central Committee of June 3,
1928, states:

“The resistance of the kulaks grew on the basis of a general increase in
the productive forces of the country, _despite a still greater growth of
the socialist sector of the economy_.”

If that is the case, if that is true, there is no room for alarm. Then
there remains only to keep calmly building “socialism in one country”
without disrupting the line of activity. If the specific weight of
capitalist elements, that is to say, the kulak especially, is annually
declining within economy, then what is the occasion for so sudden a
“panic” before the kulak? The question is resolved by the dynamic
relationship between two struggling forces: socialism and capitalism –
who will vanquish whom? The kulak is either “terrifying” or “harmless”
depending solely upon the direction in which this relationship shifts.
The manifesto of the CC vainly seeks to salvage, in this section, the
resolution of the Fifteenth Congress, which proceeded from the alleged
constantly growing preponderance of socialist elements in economy over
the capitalist elements. But indeed the article in the February 15 issue
of PRAVDA is a public refutation of this incorrect thesis which has been
disproved in practice by the entire course of operations necessitated
during the grain collections. How does this jibe logically?

Had the socialist sector grown more rapidly than the non-socialist
during these three years of good harvests, we might perhaps have still
had a commercial and industrial crisis, manifesting itself in a surplus
of products of state industry that could not find agricultural
equivalents. Instead, we have had a crisis in grain collections, which
the February 15 issue of PRAVDA correctly explains as the result of the
accumulation of the agricultural products on the part of the peasantry
and especially the kulaks, products for which there were lacking
equivalents in industrial goods. The aggravation of the crisis in grain
collections, i.e., the crisis of the _smychka_, as a result of three
good crops, can only imply that in the general dynamics of the economic
process the socialist sector has become _weaker_ as compared with the
capitalist and private commodity sector in general.

The correction which has been introduced into this relationship by
administrative pressure, absolutely inevitable once the leadership had
proved blind, does not in any way change the fundamental conclusion. We
are here dealing with a political force in which the kulak is already
taking part, even if only partially. However, the very necessity of
resorting to emergency methods from the arsenal of war communism is
evidence precisely of an unfavorable change in the relationship of
forces within the sphere of economic life.

But there is still another criterion which is equally decisive and even
more important: the material condition of the working class. If it is
true that the national economy is growing (and this is true); if it is
true that socialist accumulation is growing more rapidly than private
accumulation (as the CC declares, contrary to reality), then it is
entirely incomprehensible why the condition of the working class has
grown worse during the recent period, and why the recent collective
contracts were the source of grave friction and bitter struggle. Not a
single worker can posit a “predominance,” of this sort of socialist
elements over those of growing capitalism, when the standard of living
of the non-proletarian elements is rising while that of the proletarian
elements is on the decline. This practical criterion, which affects the
worker vitally, is completely in harmony with the theoretical criterion
and is a refutation of the superficial and formal optimism of the CC.

In face of this objective verification, given by economy and life
itself, all attempts to prove “statistically” the pre-dominance of the
growth of the socialist sector are rendered absurd. This would be
tantamount to an attempt on the part of the head of an army, forced to
retreat with losses after a battle, after surrendering important
positions, to prove with cunning statistical coefficients that the
preponderance lay on his side. No, the kulak has proved (and his
arguments are more convincing than statistical combinations, made to
comply with optimism) that in this very important battle, to the extent
that it was waged with _economic_ weapons, the preponderance proved to
be on the side of the kulak. The household budget of the working woman
also bears witness to this. The question of who will vanquish whom is
resolved by the living dynamics of economy. If figures contradict the
incontrovertible results of the struggle, and the testimony of life
itself, then the figures lie, or, at best, the answer they give refers
to a totally different question.

Indeed, we have already had in 1927 instances not only of the entirely
admissible administrative intervention into grain collections, but also
entirely inadmissible intervention into statistics. On the eve of the
Fourteenth Congress, the statistical data refurbished by the secretariat
of the CC “absorbed” the kulak almost completely. Merely a few days were
required for this socialist victory.

But even if we were to set aside the accommodating nature of statistics,
which like all other things suffer from the arbitrariness of the
apparatus, there still remains the fact that statistics, especially
among us, given the extreme atomization of the most important processes,
are always belated. Statistics provide a momentary cross-section of the
processes, without catching their tendencies. Herein theory must come to
our assistance. Our correct theoretical evaluation of the dynamics of
the process predicted beforehand that the lag in industry will turn even
the good crops against socialist construction and engender the growth of
the kulak in the village and breadlines in the cities. The facts came
and they gave their incontrovertible verification.

In the lessons of the crisis in grain collections, summarized in the
February article of PRAVDA, we have a compulsory and therefore all the
more indisputable confirmation of the increasing disproportion, with the
deficit on the side of state economy, i.e., with the decrease of the
specific weight of the economic foundations of the proletarian
dictatorship. Along with this we have a confirmation of a
differentiation in the peasantry already so profound as to place the
fate of the grain collections, in other words, the fate of the
_smychka_, under the immediate and direct control of the kulak, leading
behind him the middle peasant.

If the disproportion between the city and the country has been inherited
from the past; if a certain growth of capitalist forces flows inevitably
from the very nature of our present economy, then the _aggravation_ of
the disproportion during the last year and the _shift_ in the relation
of forces to the side of the kulak is entirely the result of the false
class policy of the leadership, which failed to regulate methodically
the distribution of the national income, either permitting the reins to
slip completely free or hysterically checking them.

In contradistinction to this, the Opposition, since 1923, has been
insisting that only a firm planned course based upon a systematic
year-to-year overcoming of the disproportion would enable us to endow
state industry with a real leading role in relation to the village; and
that, on the contrary, the lag of industry would inevitably engender the
deepening of class contradictions in the country and the lowering of the
specific weight of the economic summits of the proletarian dictatorship.

Consequently we approached the kulak, not as an isolated phenomenon, as
Zinoviev and Kamenev attempted to do during the Fourteenth Congress, but
on the basis of the decisive relationship between state industry and the
private commodity form of rural economy as a whole. Within the confines
of village economy we took the kulak, once again not as an isolated
phenomenon, but in connection with his economic influence upon the more
prosperous layers of the middle peasants and the village as a whole.
Finally we took these two fundamental internal processes, not as
isolated, but in their relation with the world market, which through
export and import exerts an ever more determining influence upon the
tempo of our economic development.

Taking all this as our starting point, we wrote in our theses submitted
to the Fifteenth Congress:

“Inasmuch as we obtain the grain and the raw material surpluses for
export trade primarily from the well-to-do layers of the village, and
inasmuch as it is precisely these layers that are hoarding grain the
most, it turns out that we are ‘regulated’ through export trade
primarily by the kulak and the well-to-do peasant.”

But an objection may be raised that the Opposition was “premature” in
posing questions for which the leadership had already set a date for
some time in the future. After all that has been said, it is hardly
necessary to dwell upon this puerile Stalinist argument which is fed to
the party each time it becomes essential to make up for lost time. Let
us present a single piece of telling evidence. On March 9, 1928, at a
session of the Moscow Soviet, Rykov said the following on the subject of
grain collections:

“This campaign indubitably bears all the distinctive traits of
shock-brigade work. If I were asked whether it would not have been
better to manage in a more normal way, that is to say, without resorting
to such a shock-brigade campaign, in order to overcome the crisis in
grain collections, I would give the candid reply that it would have been
better. We must recognize that _we have lost time, we were asleep at the
beginning_ of the difficulties in grain collection, _we failed to take a
whole series of measures in time_ which were necessary for a successful
development of the grain collections campaign.” [13]

If the delay is recognized in these words primarily from the
administrative standpoint, then it is not difficult to supplement them
politically. In order to have applied the indispensable administrative
measures in time, the party, inspiring and directing the state
apparatus, should have been supplied in due time with at least the rough
data for a general orientation, such as was given in the leading article
of PRAVDA of February 15. The delay consequently bears not an
administrative but a party-political character. The principled warnings
of the Opposition should have been attentively listened to in time and
the practical measures we proposed should have been discussed in a
business-like manner.

Last year the Opposition proposed, in part, to enforce a compulsory loan
to the amount of 150 to 200 million _poods_ of grain from 10% of the
peasant enterprises, i.e., the wealthiest. At that time this proposal
was castigated as being a measure of war communism. The party was taught
that it is impossible to squeeze the kulak without harming the middle
peasant [14], or that the kulak does not represent any danger since, you
see, he is constrained _a priori_: within the framework of the
proletarian dictatorship (Bukharin). But this year recourse had to be
taken to article 107 (i.e., to repressive measures of collecting grain);
after which, the CC had to explain that talk about war communism is
counter-revolutionary slander, although the Committee itself had on the
very eve labeled as war communism much more cautious and methodical
proposals of the Opposition.

So long as white is called white and black is called black, the correct
point of view will be the one which provides the possibility of
understanding what is occurring and to foresee the future. The viewpoint
of the Opposition comes under this definition, but that of the official
leadership never does. In the last analysis, facts stand above the
highest institutions. Only in a fit of hierarchic hysteria could anyone
demand today, _after_ the grain collection campaign of last Winter, and
the resulting acute crisis in the official policy and ideology, that the
Opposition admit its “error.” Such a condition has never yet brought
anyone any good.

The question here is not _who was right_. This question has a meaning
only in connection with the question _which line was correct_. To slur
over this last question after the first signs of a turn on the part of
the leadership would be the most contemptible and infamous crime against
the party. The party has not yet had a chance to find out. All measures,
controversies, and steps have real value depending only on whether the
party has or has not clarified itself. A principled position has not get
been won. The future has not been secured. For every step forward there
follows a half-step back.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

5. WORKS, Vol.XVIII, pp.397f.

6. IBID., pp.399f.

7. WORKS, Vol.XVIII, part 2, p.13.

8. WORKS, Vol.XVIII, part 2, p.13.

9. MINUTES, p.143.

10. WORKS, Vol.XVIII, part 1, p.396.

11. _Questions and Answers_.

12. MINUTES, Vol.II, p.118.

13. PRAVDA, March 11, 1928.

14. Stalin at the Fourteenth Congress.

The Third International After Lenin



WHAT NOW? (PART 4)


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

7. A Maneuver or a New Course?

How should the present turn to the Left be evaluated? Are we to see in
it a combinationist maneuver or a serious new course, i.e., the
resurgence of a proletarian line and international policy? Distrust is
entirely in order.

The mere adoption of a decision in order to distract the party’s
attention – such has become the fundamental method of the present
leadership. On the question of industrialization, the poor peasantry,
the Chinese revolution, they adopted, one after another, resolutions
intended not to clarify, explain, and lead, but, on the contrary, to
dissimulate and camouflage what had occurred in reality. Lenin has said
that in politics only idiots put faith in words. The post-Leninist
period must teach even idiots to rid themselves of this gullibility.

The question whether this is a maneuver or a new course is a question
that involves the class interrelations and their reflection in the CPSU,
which, as the only party in the country, reacts differently to the
pressure of various classes through the various groups within it.

The above-quoted “historical” article of PRAVDA of February 15, contains
a remarkable admission relating to this question, that is to say,the
reflection of new class groupings within our own party. This is perhaps
the most striking section of this article. It reads as follows:

“In our organizations, both in the party and elsewhere, certain elements
alien to the party have emerged during the recent period who do not see
classes in the village, who do not understand the foundations of our
class policy and who attempt to conduct the work in such a way as to
offend nobody in the village, to live in peace with the kulak, and
generally to maintain popularity among ‘all the layers’ of the village.”

Although reference is made here to members of the party, the above words
provide a well-nigh finished portrait of the neo-bourgeois, Thermidorian
politician-realist, in contrast to the communist. PRAVDA, however,
doesn’t say a single word in explanation of how these elements got into
the party. They have “emerged” – and that’s all! Whence have they come,
through what gates did they enter? Did they penetrate into the party
from the outside? And how did they wedge their way in? Or did they
sprout inside, and upon what soil? And, mind you, all this has taken
place under the conditions of an uninterrupted “Bolshevization” of the
party along the line of the peasant question. The article does not go on
to explain how the party, despite repeated warnings, could have
overlooked the Oustrialovists and Thermidorians up to the very moment
when they revealed their _administrative power_ in the policy of grain
collections, nor how the party allowed itself to lose sight of the kulak
up to the very moment when he obtained authority, led the middle peasant
behind him, and sabotaged the grain collections. PRAVDA explains none of
this. Why bother! In February 1928, we heard for the first time from the
central organ what we knew long ago and what we had expressed more than
once, namely, that in the party of Lenin there has not only “emerged”
but also taken shape a strong Right wing which is pulling toward a
neo-NEP, i.e., to capitalism by gradations.

Towards the end of 1927, here is what I wrote on this subject:

“The official struggle against the Opposition is being waged under two
basic slogans: _Against Two Parties and Against ‘Trotskyism.’_ The fake
Stalinist struggle against two parties camouflaged the growth of dual
power in the country and the _formation of a bourgeois party at the
Right wing of the CPSU_, and under the cover of its banner. In a whole
series of chancellories and in the cabinets of secretaries, secret
conferences were being held between the party retainers of the apparatus
and the specialists, Oustrialovist professors, for the purpose of
elaborating methods and slogans of the struggle against the Opposition.
This is the _genuine_ formation of a second party, which seeks by might
and main to subordinate to itself, and, in part, does subordinate, the
proletarian core of our party and to exterminate its Left wing. While
screening the formation of this second party, the apparatus accused the
Opposition of striving to create a second party – precisely because the
Opposition is seeking to tear the proletarian core of the party from
under the growing bourgeois influence and pressure, failing which, it is
altogether impossible to save the unity of a Bolshevik party. It is
sheer illusion to think that the dictatorship of the proletariat can be
preserved by spellbinding phrases about an indivisible party. The
question of one party or two parties (in the materialistic, class, and
not a verbal, agitational sense of the term) is decided precisely by the
measure in which it will be possible to arouse and mobilize the forces
of resistance inside the party and the proletariat.” [15]

In June, Stalin gave the following explanation to the students of the
highest institutes in Moscow on the subject of a second party:

“There are people who see a way out of the situation in a return to
kulak economy, in a development and an unfolding of kulak economy. These
people do not dare to speak of a return to landlord economy, since they
apparently understand that it is dangerous to babble about such things
in our time. But they speak all the more readily about the necessity of
an all-sided development of kulak economy … in the interest of the
Soviet power. These people presuppose that Soviet power could base
itself at one and the same time upon two opposite classes: the class of
kulaks, whose economic principle is the exploitation of the working
class, and the class of workers, whose economic principle is the
destruction of all exploitation. This is a hocus-pocus worthy of
reactionaries. It is not worth while to prove that these reactionary
plans have nothing in common with the interests of the working class,
with the principles of Marxism and the tasks of Leninism.”

These words represent a somewhat simplified exposition of a section of
the introduction of the first chapter of the PLATFORM OF THE OPPOSITION.
We do not keep this a secret only because in our opinion Stalin is not
threatened with exile for it as yet. To be sure, there is no open
mention of the formation of a second party in the Stalinist speech. But
if, within the proletarian party there are “people” (which people?) who
are steering a course toward a kulak capitalist economy and who refrain
from speaking about large-scale landlord economy only out of caution; if
these “people,” whose address is not given, are bound up with each other
by this sort of platform, and are guided by it during grain collections,
during the elaboration of industrial plans, wage scales, etc., etc.,
then this is precisely the cadre of a neo-bourgeois, i.e., Thermidorian
party. It is possible to be in a Bolshevik party and not steer a course
toward Chiang Kai-shek, Purcell, the kulak, and the bureaucrat; or
rather, that is the only condition on which one call be in a Bolshevik
party. But it is.impossible to be in a Bolshevik party and steer a
course towards capitalist development. This is the simple idea expressed
in our document, _On the New Stage_.

Thus, the Right wing “emerging” from an unknown cause was for the first
time officially noticed during the grain collections. On the day
following the Fifteenth Congress, which once again gave proof of 100%
monolithism, it was discovered that the kulak does not bring his grain
to market because, among other things, there are influential groupings
in the party desirous of living in peace with all classes, in accordance
with the teachings of Tao Tsi-tao, the court philosopher of Chiang
Kai-shek. These internal Kuomintangists did not make themselves heard
either during the so-called discussion or at the Congress. These valiant
“party members” were of course the first to vote for the expulsion of
the Opposition as a “social-democratic” deviation. They also voted for
all the Left resolutions, for they have long since learned to understand
the resolutions don’t count. The Thermidorians in the party are not
phrasemongers but men of action. They establish their own special
_smychka_ with the new proprietors, the petty bourgeois intellectuals,
and the bureaucracy; and they direct the most important branches of
economic, cultural, and even party activity from the “national-state”
standpoint. But can it be that the Rights are so weak that there is no
need to struggle against them?

A clear reply to this question is of decisive importance for the fate of
the entire present turn to the Left. The first impression is that the
Rights are extremely weak. A shout from above proved sufficient to
direct immediately along the “Left” channel the grain collections and,
in part, the general peasant policy. But precisely this extraordinary
ease with which results were obtained should serve as a warning against
over-hasty conclusions about the weakness of the Rights.

The Right wing is a petty bourgeois, opportunistic, bureaucratic,
Menshevik, conciliationist wing that pulls toward the bourgeoisie. It
would be an absolutely inconceivable phenomenon, if, in a party
containing the revolutionary cadres of Bolshevism and hundreds of
thousands of workers, the Right wing could become, within a space of a
few years, an independent force and openly apply its tendencies,
mobilizing the working-class masses. Of course, such a situation does
not exist. The Right wing is strong as a _transmitting apparatus for the
pressure of the non-proletarian classes on the working class_. This
implies that the strength of the Right wing of the party is located
outside the party, beyond the confines of the latter. It is the force of
the bureaucratic apparatus, of the new proprietors, of the world
bourgeoisie. Consequently it is a colossal force. But precisely because
the Right wing reflects the pressure of other classes within the party,
it is incapable as yet of presenting its platform openly and mobilizing
the public opinion of the party. It requires a cover; it must lull the
vigilance of the proletarian core of the party. The regime of the
apparatus provides it with both the former and the latter. Under the
inflated monolithism of the party the apparatus conceals the Right wing
from the view of the revolutionary workers and, at the same time, it
terrorizes the workers by dealing blows to the Opposition, which is only
the conscious expression of the alarm of the proletariat for the fate of
its dictatorship.

The existing breach between the apparatus and the Right wing compels the
latter to contract its front, strike while retreating, and provisionally
bide its time. The Rights well understand that if the apparatus
seriously invited the party to analyze the situation, to purge itself by
eliminating the Thermidorians, the Right wing would find itself
completely swept away by the rank and file, who would have no need of
resorting to gangs of disrupters and thugs. Thus there would no longer
be a lever inside the party upon which the internal bourgeoisie and that
of the entire world could lean. To be sure, the onslaught of the
bourgeoisie would not disappear immediately or even diminish. But it
would have to exert itself directly against the party, which would then
see its enemy face to face, and be able to judge coolly the forces and
intentions of the latter. The clandestine and underground forms of the
pressure of the bourgeoisie, operating through infiltration against the
party and the Soviet power, would become impossible. That in itself
would be half a victory.

The Rights understand the position they find themselves in. But they
also take into account another fact, namely, that it is impossible to
invite the party to make a serious purge of its ideas and ranks, that
have become considerably encrusted during recent years, by adopting
different slogans and pursuing different aims from those presented up to
now by the Bolshevik-Leninists (Opposition). But it would then be
necessary to change sharply the whole attitude towards the Opposition
itself; otherwise the cynical lack of principles of the Centrist
apparatus would stand crudely in the Open. The Right wing believes, and
not without good cause, that the Center will not dare boldly to change
its front. The Right wingers retreat, grinding their teeth, and they
show thereby that they are not at all desirous of a struggle equally
dangerous to themselves and to the Center. At the same time they put
their demands to the latter: not to change the _status quo_ within the
party, that is to say, not to break the bloc between the Right and the
Center against the Left; not to incline further to the Left than is
absolutely required by the present exigency; in other words, to keep in
reserve the possibility of returning to the old path and to pass from
there onto the road of the neo-NEP.

The Right wingers understand that for the moment they must concede the
turn to the Left as silently as possible. In any case, _for them_ it is
_simply a maneuver_. They keep quiet and make their preparations. They
expect the Left experiment to fail, thanks to the class response from
the outside, thanks to internal friction, the secret resistance of the
bureaucratic apparatus, and above all, thanks to the innate inclination
of Centrism to zigzags. The Right wing is well acquainted with its
allies. Meanwhile, it zealously compromises the Center, demonstrating
right and left that the latter has invented nothing but is simply
repeating what the Opposition said from the very beginning.

So far as the Center is concerned, in order not to appear in an awkward
position, it continues to clap the Oppositionists into jail. The Rights
understand that the more blows the apparatus deals to the Left, the more
it becomes dependent upon them. They aim to pass from the defensive to
the offensive and to take their revenge when the Left experiment will be
terminated by a defeat (and the Rights, under the present conditions,
firmly count on that). Will this happen? Such an eventuality is not at
all excluded. It can take place so long as the turn rests upon the
_status quo_ in the party. Not only can this happen, _but_ it will
probably take place, even more, it is inevitable.

Does this imply that the present zigzag excludes the possibility of its
developing into a Left course? Let us be candid: not only the policy
pursued by the leadership during the recent years but also its present
conduct must impel us to give a skeptical reply to the above question,
in so far as the matter depends upon the foresight and the consistency
of the leadership. But the gist of the matter lies precisely in the fact
that the initial maneuver has grown over into a profound political
zigzag, seizing in its vise ever wider circles of the party and wider
class strata. The latter are not interested in the mechanics of the
maneuver, in the art of leadership practiced by the leadership for art’s
sake, but rather in the objective economic and political results arising
from the turn. Matters in this sphere have reached a point where the
good will, consistency, and, in general, the very intentions of the
initiators of the turn find themselves seriously altered by the will and
interests of much vested circles. That is why it would be incorrect to
deny the _possibility_ of the present zigzag developing in a direction
of a consistent proletarian course.

In any case, the Opposition, by virtue of its views and tendencies, must
do all in its power to see that the present zigzag is extended into a
serious turn onto the Leninist road. Such an outcome would be the
healthiest one, that is to say, involving the least convulsions for the
party and the dictatorship. This would be the _road of a profound party
reform, the indispensable promise of the reform of the Soviet state._

 

8. The Social Basis of the Present Crisis

The sounds of the struggle within the party are only an echo of far more
profound turmoils. Changes have accumulated within the classes which, if
they are not translated in time into the language of Bolshevism, will
place the October Revolution in its entirety before a painful crisis.

The haste with which, hardly two months after the Fifteenth Congress,
the leadership broke with a course which was considered correct at the
time of the congress, is in itself an unfailing symptom of the fact that
the process of class shifts taking place in the country, in connection
with the whole international situation, has reached a critical stage
wherein economic quantities are changing into political qualities. A
prognosis in this sense was propounded on several occasions since 1923;
it was expressed in the following manner in the theses of the Opposition
at the time of the Fifteenth Congress:

“In a country with an overwhelming majority of small and even dwarfish
peasants and petty proprietors in general, the most important processes
take place up to a certain moment in an atomized and subterranean
manner, only in order subsequently to burst into the open in an
‘unexpected’ manner.”

“Unexpected,” obviously, only for those who are incapable of making a
Marxist evaluation of processes taking place when these are still only
at the beginning of their development.

The grain strike of the kulaks, who drew behind them the middle
peasants; the collusion of the Shakhty specialists with capitalists; the
protection or semi-protection of the kulak strike by an influential
section of the State and party apparatus; the fact that communists were
able to shut their eyes to the counter-revolutionary secret maneuvers of
technicians and functionaries; the vile license of scoundrels in
Smolensks and elsewhere, under the cover of “iron discipline” – all
these are already incontrovertible facts of the utmost importance. No
communist reasoning in a healthy way would dare affirm that these are
casual phenomena which are not characteristic, which have not grown
thanks to economic and political processes and thanks to the policy of
the party leadership in the course of the last five years. These facts
could and should have been foreseen. The theses published by the
Opposition at the Fifteenth Congress, which are available to all, state:

“The amalgamation between the kulak, the proprietor, and the bourgeois
intellectual, on the one hand, and numerous links of the bureaucracy not
alone of the state but also of the party, on the other:hand, constitutes
the most incontrovertible but at the same time most alarming process of
our social life. Thence are being born the germs of _dual power_ which
is threatening the dictatorship of the proletariat.”

The manifesto or circular letter issued by the CC on June 3, 1928,
admitted the existence of the “most vicious bureaucratism” in the state
apparatus as well as in the party and the trade unions. The circular
letter attempts to explain this bureaucratism as follows:

-   survivals from the bureaucratic heritage of the past;
-   product of the backwardness and obscurantism of the masses;
-   their “inadequate knowledge of administration”;
-   failure to draw the masses rapidly enough into the state
    administration.

The above-cited four circumstances do in fact exist. They all serve to
explain bureaucratism in some fashion. But none permits of understanding
its wild and unrestrained _growth_. The cultural level of the masses
should have risen during the past five years. The party apparatus should
have learned how to draw the masses into administrative work with
greater rapidity. A new generation, raised under Soviet conditions,
should have been substituted in considerable proportion for the old
functionaries. Bureaucratism should then have declined as a consequence.
But the crux of the question lies precisely in the fact that it has
grown monstrously; it has become “most vicious bureaucratism”; it has
erected into a system such administrative methods as suppression by
orders from above, intimidation, repression by economic measures,
favoritism, collusion of functionaries through mutual agreement,
concessions to the strong, oppression of the weak. The excessively rapid
regeneration of these tendencies of the old class apparatus, despite the
growth of Soviet economy and the cultural development of the masses, is
due to _class_ causes, namely, the social consolidation of proprietors,
their interlacing with the state apparatus, and their pressure exercised
upon the party through the apparatus. Unless one understands the class
causes of the growing bureaucratization of the regime, the struggle
against the evil resembles too of ten a windmill flapping its wings but
not grinding any grain.

The retarded growth of industry has created.an intolerable “scissors” in
prices. The bureaucratic struggle to lower prices has only convulsed the
market, depriving the worker without giving anything to the peasant. The
enormous advantages obtained by the peasantry from the agrarian
revolution accomplished by the October are being devoured by the prices
of the industrial goods. This corrodes the _smychka_, impelling wide
strata in the village to the side of the kulak with his slogan of free
trade, internally and externally. Under these conditions the trader in
the interior finds favorable soil and cover, while the bourgeoisie
abroad acquires a base.

The proletariat naturally marched to the revolution with by far the
greatest hopes, and in its overwhelming mass, with great illusions.
Hence, given a retarded tempo of development, and an extremely low
material level of existence, there must inevitably flow a diminution of
the hopes in the ability of the Soviet power to alter profoundly the
entire social system within the more or less immediate future.

The defeats of the world revolution, particularly during the last few
years, when the leadership was already in the hands of the Comintern,
have tended in the same direction. They could not fail to introduce a
new note into the attitude of the working class toward the world
revolution: great reservations in hopes; skepticism among the tired
elements; downright suspicion and even surly exasperation among the
immature.

These new thoughts and new evaluations sought for their expression. Had
they found it in the party, the most advanced layers might perhaps have
adopted a different attitude towards the international revolution, and
above all towards that in their own country; it might have been less
naive and exalted and more critical but, in return, more balanced and
stable. However, the new thoughts, judgments, aspirations, and anxieties
were driven inward. For five years the proletariat lived under the old
and well known slogan: “No thinking! Those at the top have more brains
than you.” At first this engendered indignation, then passivity, and
finally a circumscribed existence, compelling men to withdraw into a
political shell. From all sides the worker was told, until he ended by
saying himself, “You, there! This is not the year 1918.”

The classes and groups hostile or semi-hostile to the proletariat take
into account the diminution in the latter’s specific weight which is
felt not only through the state apparatus or the trade unions but also
through the day-to-day economic life, and the daily existence. Hence
flows an influx of self-confidence that has manifested itself among the
politically active layers of the petty bourgeoisie and the growing
middle bourgeoisie. The latter has reestablished its friendship, and
reconstituted its intimate and family bonds with the entire “apparatus,”
and it holds the firm opinion that its day is coming.

The worsening of the international position of the USSR, the growth of
the hostile pressure on the part of world capitalism, under the
leadership of the most experienced and rabid British bourgeoisie – all
this enables the most intransigent elements of the internal bourgeoisie
to raise their heads again.

These are the most important elements of the crisis of the October
Revolution. It had its partial manifestation in the recent grain strike
on the part of the kulaks and the bureaucrats. The crisis in the party
is its most general and dangerous reflection.

It follows as a matter of course that it is impossible to forecast as
yet, at any rate, from a distance, at what time and in what form these
processes towards dual power, which are still semi-subterranean, will
seek to assume an open political expression. This depends largely upon
international conditions, and not only upon internal policy. One thing
is clear: the revolutionary line does not consist in waiting and
guessing until the ever-increasing enemy seizes a favorable moment to
assume the offensive, but in assuming the offensive ourselves before the
enemy, as the German saying goes, towers above the trees. There is no
returning the lost years. It is a good thing that the CC has finally
sounded the alarm about the ominous facts, which are in large measure
due to its own policy. But it is not enough merely to sound the alarm,
and to issue general appeals. Even prior to the Fifteenth Congress, at a
time when the slogan of squeezing the kulak was still invested with a
purely literary character by the leading faction, the Opposition wrote
in its theses:

“The slogan of squeezing the kulak and the Nepman … if taken seriously,
presupposes a change in the entire policy, a new orientation for all the
state organs. It is necessary to say this precisely and clearly. For,
neither the kulak, on the one hand, nor the poor peasant, on tile
otherB7, has forgotten that in the course of two years (between the
Fourteenth and Fifteenth Congresses) the CC held a totally different
policy. It is entirely obvious that by keeping mum about their former
position, the authors of the theses proceed from the idea that it is
presumably sufficient to issue a new decree in order to effect a change
in the policy. Yet, it is impossible to realize the new slogan, not in
words but in action, without overcoming the bitter resistance of some
classes and without mobilizing the forces of other classes.”

These words retain their full force even at the present moment. It was
no easy matter to turn the party from the Leninist road onto the
Right-Centrist road. In order to create and consolidate within the
Bolshevik party an influential wing that did not “recognize” classes; in
order that the party should not take official notice of the existence of
this wing and in order for the leadership to be able to deny its
existence for years; in order for this wing, which was not exposed by
the Fifteenth Congress, to reveal itself officially _not through the
party but through … the Grain Exchange_ – all this took five years of
incessant propaganda in favor of the new orientation, plus thousands of
Stalinist and Bukharinist cribs on the integration of the kulak into
socialism, and in mockery of the parasitic psychology of hungry men;
plus pogroms of statistical bureaus simply because they took note of the
existence of the kulak; plus the triumph of mindless functionaries all
along the line; plus the formation of a new propagandist school of
_Katheder-Sozialisten_ , sophists in Marxism, and many other things. But
above all it took a vicious, unreflecting, rude, disloyal, and arbitrary
persecution of the proletarian left wing. Meanwhile, all the
Thermidorian elements in the party (who “emerged” according to the
winged expression of PRAVDA ) took form and consolidated themselves,
invested themselves with connections, ties, and sympathies, and shot out
their roots far beyond the confines of the party deeply into the soil of
great classes. All this cannot be eliminated by means of a tiny circular
letter, no matter how snappy its style. It is necessary to re-educate.
It is necessary to revise. It is necessary to achieve regroupings. It is
necessary to till the field overgrown with weeds with the deep plow of
Marxism.

The attempt to lull oneself and the party with the notion the Opposition
is weak and impotent cannot be reconciled with the rabid struggle
against the latter. The Opposition has a program of action that has been
tested in events and cadres that have been tempered in the fire of
persecutions and did not waver in their loyalty to the party. Such
cadres, expressing the mounting historical line, cannot be uprooted or
destroyed. The Opposition is the cutting edge of the party sword. To
break this edge is to dull the sword raised against the enemy. The
question of the Opposition is the pivot point of the entire Left course.

Only a victorious development of the world revolution will bring a real
and complete liberation not only from external but also internal crisis.
This is ABC for a Marxist. But an unbridgeable abyss yawns between this
and the hopeless fatalism dished up to us by Bukharinist scholasticism.
There are crises and crises. Capitalist society, by its very nature,
cannot free itself from crises. This does not at all mean to say that
the policy of a ruling bourgeoisie is of no importance. A correct policy
raised up bourgeois states, a false policy either ruined or retarded
them.

Official scholasticism is utterly incapable of understanding that
between mechanistic determinism (fatalism) and subjective self-will
there stands the materialist dialectic. Fatalism says: “In the face of
such backwardness, nothing will ever come.” Vulgar subjectivism says:
“It’s a cinch! We have willed it, and we build socialism!” Marxism says:
“If you are conscious of your dependency upon world conditions and upon
the internal backwardness then, with a correct policy, you will rise,
intrench yourself, and integrate yourself into the victorious world
revolution.”

Crises are inevitable in a transitional Soviet regime, until the
proletariat of advanced countries will have seized power firmly and
decisively. But the task of the ruling policy lies in preventing crises
within the Soviet regime from accumulating to the point when they become
crises of the regime as a whole. The primary condition for this is: that
the position and self-consciousness of the proletariat as the ruling
class be preserved, developed, and strengthened. And the sole instrument
for this is: a self-acting, flexible, and active proletarian party.

 

9. The Party Crisis

A correct economic policy, as well as a general policy, is not assured
by merely a correct formulation, which has not obtained since 1923. The
policy of the proletarian dictatorship is conceivable only on the basis
of continually feeling out all the class strata in society. Moreover,
this cannot be done through the medium of a bureaucratic apparatus which
is tardy, inadequate on many points, inflexible, and insensitive. It
must be effected through a living and active proletarian party, through
communist scouts, pioneers, and builders of socialism. Before the
growing role of, the kulaks can be registered statistically, before
theoreticians can generalize it, and politicians translate it into the
language of directives, the party must be able to _sense_ it through its
countless tentacles, and sound the alarm. But for all this, the party in
its entire mass must be sensitive and flexible, and above all it must
not be afraid to look, to understand, and speak up.

The socialist character of our state industry – considerably atomized as
it is: with the competition between the various trusts and factories;
with the onerous material position of the working masses; with the
inadequate cultural level of important circles of the toilers – the
socialist character of industry is determined and secured in a decisive
measure by the role of the party, the voluntary internal cohesion of the
proletarian vanguard, the conscious discipline of the administrators,
trade union functionaries, members of the shop nuclei, etc. If we allow
that this web is weakening, disintegrating, and ripping, then it becomes
absolutely self-evident that within a brief period nothing will remain
of the socialist character of state industry, transport, etc. The trusts
and individual factories mill begin living an independent life. Not a
trace will be left of the planned beginnings, so weak at the present
time. The economic struggle of the workers will acquire a scope
unrestricted save by the relation of forces. The state ownership of the
means of production will be first transformed into a juridical fiction,
and later on, even the latter will be swept away. Thus, here, too, the
question reduces itself to the conscious cohesiveness of the proletarian
vanguard, to the protection of the latter from the rust of bureaucratism
and the pus of Oustrialovism.

A correct political line, as a system, is entirely inconceivable without
correct methods for elaborating and applying it in the party. While on
this or another question, under the influence of certain impulsions, the
bureaucratic leadership might stumble upon the traces of a correct line,
there are absolutely no guarantees that this line will be actually
followed up, and will not be broken anew tomorrow.

Under the conditions of the dictatorship of the party, such a great
power is concentrated in the hands of the leadership as was wielded by
no single political organization in the history of mankind. Under these
conditions, more than ever before, is it vitally necessary to maintain
proletarian, communist methods of leadership. Each bureaucratic
distortion, each false step has its immediate repercussion in the entire
working class. Meanwhile, the post-Leninist leadership has gradually
accustomed itself to extend the hostility of the proletarian
dictatorship toward bourgeois pseudo-democracy over to the vital
guarantees of the conscious proletarian democracy, upon which the party
thrives, and by means of which it is alone possible to lead the working
class and the workers’ state.

This was one of the cardinal cares in Lenin’s mind during the last
period of his life. He pondered over it in its full historic scope, and
all its concrete day-to-day aspects. Returning to work after his first
illness, Lenin was horrified by the growth of bureaucratism, especially
within the party. This is why he proposed the Central Control
Commission; naturally, not the one now existing which represents the
direct opposite of what Lenin had in view. Lenin reminded the party that
there were no few cases in history of conquerors degenerating, and
adopting the morals of the vanquished. He burned with indignation at
every piece of news about deliberate injustice, or brutal behavior on
the part of a communist in the post of power toward his subordinates
(the episode of Ordjonikidze’s fist-work). He warned the party against
Stalin’s _rudeness_ and against internal moral _brutality_ which is the
blood-sister of perfidy, and which becomes, when wielding all power, a
terrible instrument for destroying the party. This is also the reason
for Lenin’s impassioned appeals for culture and cultural development –
not in the sense of Bukharin’s present cheap little schemes, but in the
sense of a communist struggle against Asiatic morals, against the legacy
of feudalism and boorishness, and against the exploitation by
functionaries of the innocence and ignorance of the masses.

Meanwhile, during the last five years, the party apparatus has pursued
just the opposite course; it has become utterly permeated with the
bureaucratic deformations of the state apparatus, superimposing upon the
latter the specific distortions – fraud, camouflage, duplicity –
elaborated by the bourgeois parliamentary “democracy.” As a consequence,
a leadership has been formed which, instead of the conscious party
democracy, provides: a falsification and an adaptation of Leninism
designed to strengthen the party bureaucracy; a monstrous and an
intolerable abuse of power in relation to communists and workers; a
fraudulent operation of the entire electoral machinery of the party; an
application of methods during discussion which might be the boast of a
bourgeois-Fascist power, but never of a proletarian party (picked gangs
of thugs, whistling and jeering to order, throwing speakers from the
platform, and similar abominations); and last but not least, an absence
of comradely cohesiveness and conscientiousness all along the line in
the relations between the apparatus and the party.

The party press has made public the Artemovsk, Smolensk, and other cases
in the guise of sensational exposures. The CC has issued appeals to
struggle against corruption. And this seems to have exhausted the
question. As a matter of fact, it has not even been broached as yet.

In the first place, wide party circles could not but be aware that only
a small part has been made public – not dealing with what is generally
taking place, but only with what has been exposed. Almost every province
has its own “Smolensk” affair of greater or lesser proportions, and,
moreover, not for the first day, or even the first year. Long before the
epoch of “self-criticism” the affairs in Chita, Khersonsk, Vladimirsk,
and many other places flared up, only to be immediately extinguished;
100% secretaries of district committees were exposed who secretly and
without any supervision wasted enormous sums on the upkeep of their
family retinue. Each time such an affair was exposed, it was
incontrovertibly established that the crimes were known quite well to
hundreds of people, sometimes by a thousand men, a thousand party
members who kept mum. Often they kept silent for a year, two, and even
three. This circumstance was even mentioned in the papers. But no
conclusions were drawn. For it would have been necessary simply to
repeat what had been stated very discreetly and mildly in the documents
of the Opposition. Without drawing the necessary conclusions, the
Smolensk and other exposures remain sensations which arouse the party,
do not teach it, but rather, distract its attention.

The crux of the matter lies in the fact that the more independent the
apparatus becomes from the party, the more do the apparatus retainers
depend upon one another. _Mutual insurance is no local “detail” but the
basic trait of the bureaucratic regime_. Some apparatus retainers
indulge in abominations, while the rest keep quiet. And what about the
party mass? The party mass is terrorized. Yes, in the party of Lenin
that achieved the October Revolution, worker-communists are _afraid_ to
sag out loud that such and such a 100% apparatus retainer is a
scoundrel, an embezzler, a bully. This is the fundamental lesson of the
“Smolensk” exposures. And he is no revolutionist who does not blush with
shame at this lesson.

Who is the hero, in the social sense of the term, of the Artemovsk,
Smolensk, etc., affairs? He is a bureaucrat who has freed himself from
the active control of the party and who has ceased to be the
banner-bearer of the proletarian dictatorship. Ideologically, he has
become drained; morally, he is unrestrained. He is a privileged and an
irresponsible functionary, in most cases very uncultured, a drunkard, a
wastrel, and a bully, in short, the old familiar type of _Derjimorda_
(see Lenin’s letter on the national question kept hidden from the
party). But our hero has his own “peculiarities”: showering kicks and
wallops, wasting national resources or taking bribes, the Soviet
_Derjimorda_ swears not by the “Will of God” but by the “construction of
socialism.” When any attempt is made from below to point him out,
instead of the old cry “Mutiny!” he raises the howl, “Trotskyist!” – and
emerges victorious.

An article of one of the leaders of the CCC printed in the May 16 issue
of PRAVDA contains the following moral drawn from the Smolensk affair:

“_We must decisively change our attitude toward those members of the
party and class-conscious workers who are aware of the abuses and keep
quiet._”

“Change our attitude?” Is it then possible to have two different
attitudes on the matter? Yes. This is admitted by Yakovlev, a member of
the Presidium of the CCC, the alternate of the People’s Commissar of
Workers’ and Peasants’ Inspection. People who know about crimes and keep
quiet are considered criminals themselves. The only mitigating
circumstance for their guilt lies in their own ignorance, or in their
being terrorized. Yet Yakovlev refers not to ignorant people but to
“members of the party and class-conscious workers.” What sort of
pressure and what sort of terror is it that compels worker-party members
to keep silent ignominiously about the crimes of individuals whom they
themselves presumably elect and who are presumably responsible to them?
Can this really be the terror of the proletarian dictatorship? No,
because it is directed against the party, against the interests of the
proletariat. Does this mean to say then that this is the pressure and
the terror of other classes? Obviously it is, for there is no
supra-class social pressure. We have already defined the class character
of the oppression that weighs down upon our party: the collusion of the
retainers of the party apparatus; the amalgamation of many links in the
party apparatus with the state bureaucracy, with the bourgeois
_intelligentsia_, with the petty bourgeoisie, and the kulaks in the
villages; the pressure of the world bourgeoisie upon the internal
mechanics of forces – all this together creates the elements of social
dual power, which exerts pressure on the party through tile party
apparatus. It is precisely this social pressure, which has grown during
the recent years, and which has been utilized by the apparatus to
terrorize the proletarian core of the party, to hound the Opposition,
and to exterminate it physically by organizational methods. This process
is one and indivisible.

Within certain limits, the alien class pressure raised the apparatus
above the party, reinforced it, and instilled it with confidence. The
apparatus did not bother to give itself an accounting of the mainsprings
of its own “power.” Its victories over the party, over the Leninist
line, were smugly attributed by it to its own sagacity. But the
pressure, increasing because it has encountered no resistance, has
passed beyond the limit where it merely threatens the domination of the
apparatus. It threatens something a great deal more important. The tail
is beginning to deal blows to the head.

A situation such as makes party members and class conscious workers in
their overwhelming mass afraid to talk about the crimes of the retainers
of the party apparatus has not arisen accidentally, nor overnight, nor
can it be eliminated by a single stroke of the pen. We are confronted
not only with the powerful routine of bureaucratism in the apparatus but
also with great encrustations of interests and connections around the
apparatus. And we have _a leadership that is powerless before its own
apparatus_ . Here we have also something in the nature of a historical
law: the less the leadership depends upon the party, the more it is a
captive of the apparatus. All talk to the effect that the Opposition is
allegedly desirous of weakening the centralized leadership is absurd and
fantastic. A proletarian line is inconceivable without iron centralism.
But the misfortune lies precisely in the fact that the present
leadership is all-powerful only by reason of its bureaucratic force,
that is to say, it is powerful in relation to an artificially atomized
party mass, but it is impotent in relation to its own apparatus.

Seeking to escape from the consequences of their own policy the
Centrists have pushed to the fore the homeopathy of “self-criticism.”
Stalin unexpectedly referred himself to Marx who had spoken of
“self-criticism as a method of strengthening the proletarian
revolution.” But in this quotation Stalin approaches a boundary which he
is forbidden to trespass. For Marx in reality meant by self-criticism
above all a complete destruction by the proletariat of the false
illusions from which it must liberate itself, such as the “bloc of four
classes”; socialism in one country; the conservative trade union
leaders; the slogans: “We must not frighten the bourgeoisie”; the
“two-class” parties for the East; and other reactionary rubbish imposed
by Stalin and Bukharin during the last period in which, for three years,
they slashed away at the Chinese revolution with the scythe of
Menshevism until they finally slaughtered it. That is where the scalpel
of Marxian self-criticism should really be applied!

But it is precisely here that it is forbidden to apply it, as
heretofore. Stalin threatens once again to fight self-criticism of this
sort “with all our might and all the means at our disposal.” He is
unable to understand that there do not exist such forces or means as
could prevent Marxian criticism from triumphing in the ranks of the
international proletarian vanguard.

***

During one of the plenums in the year 1927, in reply to an Opposition
speech which stated that the Opposition had the right to appeal to the
party against the leadership, Monotone said, “This is mutiny!” and
Stalin made himself clear by saying, “These cadres can be removed only
by a civil war.” This was the most consummate and candid formulation
made in the heat of the struggle of the “supra-party,” “supra-class,”
and self-sufficing character of the ruling apparatus. This idea is
directly opposite to the idea lodged in the foundations of our party and
of the Soviet system. _The idea of bureaucratic supermen is the source
of the present usurpation on a retail scale and of the unconscious
preparation of a possible usurpation wholesale_. This ideology has taken
shape during the last five years in the process of the interminable fake
“re-evaluations,” tightening up from above, appointments from above,
hounding from above, faking elections, brushing Congresses and
Conventions aside for a year, two, or four … in short, a struggle “with
all our might and all the means at our disposal.”

At the summits this was a desperate struggle of views that came into an
ever greater conflict with life itself; at the base, in the majority of
cases this was a furious gamble for posts, for the right to command, for
privileged positions. But the enemy is one and the same in either case:
the Opposition. The arguments and the methods are the same: “with all
our might and all the means at our disposal.” Needless to say, the
majority of the retainers of the party apparatus are honest and devoted
men, capable of self-sacrifice. But the whole thing lies in the system.
And the system is such as makes Smolensk affairs its inevitable fruits.

Well-meaning functionaries see the solution of the greatest historical
task in the formula: “We must decisively change.” The party must say in
answer: “It is not you who must do the changing, but it is _yourselves_
who must be decisively changed, and in the majority of cases – removed
and replaced.”

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

15. _On the New Stage_.
